<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88805-0046 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-05-88.f2.A1045</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 151 / Friday, August 5, 1988 /Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Health Care Financing Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">42 CFR Parts 74, 405, 416, 440, 482, 483, 488, and 493</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[HSQ-146-P]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Medicare, Medicaid and CLIA Programs; Revision of the Clinical LaboratoryRegulations for the Medicare, Medicaid, and Clinical Laboratories ImprovementAct of 1967 Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The proposed rule would revise regulations for laboratoriesregulated under the Medicare, Medicaid and Clinical Laboratories ImprovementAct of 1967 (CLIA) programs. The revisions would recodify the regulationsfor these programs into a new Part 493 in order to simplify administrationand unify the health and safety requirements for all programs as much aspossible. We propose to have a single set of regulations for the threeprograms, with an additional subpart for the licensure procedures uniqueto the CLIA program.We propose to revise the regulations to remove outdated, obsolete and redundantrequirements, make provision for new technologies, place increased relianceon outcome measures of performance, and emphasize the responsibilitiesand duties of personnel rather than the formal credentialing requirementsand detailed personnel standards in existing regulations. We would providefor new uniform proficiency testing standards and add requirements foradditional specialties, such as cytogenetics.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>To ensure consideration, comments must be received by November3, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Address comments in writing to: Health Care FinancingAdministration, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Attention:HSQ-146-P, P.O. Box 26676, Baltimore, Maryland 21207.If you prefer, you may deliver your comments to one of the following addresses:<ITAG tagnum="15">Room 309-G, Hubert H Humphrey Building, 200 Independence Avenue, SW.,Washington, DC, or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Room 132, East High Rise Building, 6325 Security Boulevard, Baltimore,Maryland.</ITAG>Please address a copy of comments on information collection requirementsto: Allison Herron, Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Room3208 New Executive Office Building, Washington, DC 20503.In commenting, please refer to file code HSQ-146-P. Comments will be availablefor public inspection as they are received, beginning approximately threeweeks after publication of this document, in Room 309-G of the Department'soffices at 200 Independence Avenue, SW., Washington, DC, on Monday throughFriday of each week from 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. (202-245-7890).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Pamela Renner, (301) 966-6818.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Multiple Laboratory ActivitiesUnder the Medicare program, we pay for diagnostic services furnished tobeneficiaries by a variety of laboratories. These include a laboratorythat is ``hospital-based'' (that is, it is located in or it is under thesupervision of a hospital), located in a physician's office, or is ``independent''(not a hospital-based and not a rural health clinic, a group medical practiceor a physician's office). By statute, the definition of a hospital containedin Section 1861(e) of the Social Security Act (the Act) extends Medicareparticipation to hospital laboratories. The paragraph following section1861(s)(11) and sections 1861(s) (12) and (13) provide coverage for independentlaboratory services.Under the Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967 (CLIA), laboratoriesengaged in testing in interstate commerce must meet the requirements ofSection 353 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 263a) in orderto be licensed or remain licensed for testing in interstate commerce.Medicaid, under the authority of Section 1902(a)(9)(C) of the Social SecurityAct, pays for services furnished only by laboratories that meet Medicareconditions for coverage. Because participation in the Medicaid programis governed by Medicare rules, henceforth when we refer to Medicare weare including Medicaid.Various State laws govern licensure requirements for laboratories engagedin intrastate commerce. There are also Medicare-Medicaid requirements thatlaboratories must meet in terms of personnel qualifications and accuracyof test results. Under existing regulations, the laboratory requirementsare integrated with other requirements applicable to the provider or supplier.Thus, conditions of participation for a hospital-based laboratory are foundin the hospital conditions of participation in 42 CFR 482.27. Laboratoriesin skilled nursing facilities must meet the same conditions of participationas laboratories in hospitals. Conditions for coverage of independent laboratoryservices are found at 42 CFR 405.1310 to 405.1317. Except for laboratoryservices furnished by a physician, group medical practice, or rural healthclinic or a few services furnished by an end-stage renal disease facility,which are not subject to our rules, laboratory services furnished by anyentity other than a hospital or skilled nursing facility are governed byour rules concerning independent laboratories.Regulations found at 42 CFR Part 74 implement Section 353 of CLIA.A CLIA laboratory and any other entity identified as a laboratory undertitle XVIII of the Social Security Act that wishes to receive payment forits services from Medicare or Medicaid must meet Medicare's conditionsof participation or conditions for coverage of services.A laboratory that fails to meet the Medicare conditions for coverage fora given specialty is not ``approved'' for payment of services for thatspecialty. The loss of approval (``termination of approval'') or failureto be approved initially results in no payment from Medicare or Medicaidfor the services in the failed specialty. Failure to meet CLIA requirementsfor a category of services or a specific test results in the loss of licensure,or licensure is denied, for the category of services or that test. A laboratorymay fail general conditions and fail to become approved for Medicare reimbursementfor any specialty; similarly, a CLIA laboratory failing to meet generalrequirements would not be licensed for any tests.Federal Oversight ActivitiesHCFA, under an interagency agreement and a memorandum of understanding(MOU) with the Public Health Service (PHS), has administrative responsibilityfor both the Medicare and CLIA programs. However, PHS (for the Food andDrug Administration (FDA)) has primary responsibility for the provisionof technical advice on blood bank programs, including the revision of regulationsconcerning blood and blood products. An MOU in 1980 between HCFA and PHS(FDA) resulted in a reduction in the duplication of the inspection responsibilitiesin the area of blood banking and transfusion services and in a more coordinatedfollow-up on the transfusion related fatalities reported to FDA. Beforethe establishment of HCFA in 1977 and the signing of an interagency agreement,PHS, through the Centers for Disease Control (CDC), was responsible forthe CLIA program. The most recent MOU between HCFA and CDC further delineatedresponsibilities by specifying that HCFA is responsible for developingregulations that relate to Medicare and CLIA and that CDC is responsiblefor assisting HCFA in obtaining technical and scientific expertise.Over the past few years, we have been working with CDC and FDA in reviewingthe various departmental regulations concerning laboratories to determinethe appropriate modifications and revisions. This process has includedmeetings of HCFA, FDA and CDC with various private-sector organizations,concerned members of the laboratory industry and the public, State healthofficials, and other Federal agencies. Our review indicated the need forrevising the regulations because of a lack of uniformity in the variouslaboratory program requirements, obsolete or redundant requirements, andthe numerous changes in technology and data management systems that haveoccurred since the regulations were originally written.The Department commissioned a study on clinical laboratories (Final Reporton Assessment of Clinical Laboratory Regulations (April 1986)) that recommendedthat HHS review the existing regulations to determine how to improve theassurance of quality laboratory testing and to achieve as much programuniformity as possible. We determined that the best approach to achievethese goals was to revise both the CLIA and Medicare/Medicaid regulationsconcerning laboratories, since the various regulations are interrelated.LegislationSection 4064 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (OBRA' 87),Pub. L. 100-203, enacted on December 22, 1987, amended the sentence followingsection 1861(s)(11) by requiring that physicians' offices that performmore than 5000 tests per year must meet conditions relating to the healthand safety of individuals with respect for whom such tests are performed.This amendment applies to tests performed on or after January 1, 1990.We are not proposing regulations at this time to implement this legislation.However, we recognize that some of the standards in this proposed rulemight also be applicable to tests run in physician office laboratories.Therefore, we ask commenters to inform us whether and on what basis theybelieve the standards we are proposing in this rule would be appropriateto apply to tests run in physician office laboratories.Consolidation of RegulationsIn this proposed rule we propose to consolidate all CLIA and Medicare-Medicaidlaboratory requirements in a new 42 CFR Part 493. We propose to removeoutdated and overly prescriptive requirements. We would require laboratoriesto comply with the health and safety standards of other Federal, Stateand local agencies and our decisions to approve or license laboratorieswould be affected by their compliance with these laws. We would also addprovisions requiring facilities to develop and implement their own internalquality assurance programs, and we would also provide for increased relianceon outcome measures by using quality control and proficiency testing datain the assessment of laboratory performance.Laboratory testing in both physicians' offices and rural health clinicsthat perform no tests on referral would not be subject to these revisionsbecause both the Medicare and CLIA statutes (the sentence following andSection;1861(s)(11) of the Act and section 351(i) of the PHS Act, respectively)preclude the regulation at this time of physician office laboratories andof rural health clinics that perform tests only for their own patients.(As mentioned earlier, section 4064 of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1987 amended section 1861(s) of the Social Security Act to requirethe regulation of physician office laboratories performing more than 5000tests a year effective January 1, 1990.)<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Purposes of the Proposed Revisions</ITAG>We propose to recodify and revise existing laboratory regulations to accomplishseveral goals.andbullet; We intend, as stated above, to consolidate current laboratoryrequirements into one new part to make these requirements uniform_to theextent possible_from one provider or supplier to another and between CLIAand Medicare. Thus, a laboratory seeking CLIA licensure or approval forpayment for services to Medicare or Medicaid beneficiaries would look inonly one part of the regulations. Similarly, a laboratory operated by askilled nursing facility would not be governed by regulations in two separateparts (one for hospitals and one for independent laboratories) as it iscurrently.andbullet; Another major goal of the proposed regulation is to have, to theextent possible, the same requirements for both CLIA and Medicare. HCFAis responsible for implementing the requirements for both CLIA and Medicare;approximately 1300 of the 1500 CLIA laboratories also participate in Medicare.One agency imposing different program requirements on the same laboratoryis confusing. As the major difference between CLIA and Medicare is thatCLIA laboratories engage in interstate commerce, there is no compellingreason (other than where the statute requires) for having dissimilar requirements.These regulations would require that a laboratory that is denied approvalfor Medicare or Medicaid coverage also be denied licensure under CLIA.To this end, we are proposing to revise requirements relating to personnel,proficiency testing, quality control, the applicability of the regulations,compliance with State and local laws, recordkeeping and inspection.andbullet; We intend to revise our personnel standards so that personnelrequirements are not focused primarily on qualifications but on the accurateperformance of laboraory tests. Current hospital laboratory personnel requirementsare not based on credentials for individuals other than the laboratorydirector, but current independent laboratory requirements specify credentialsfor laboratory director, technical and general supervisors, technologists,cytotechnologists, technicians and technician trainees. We would combinehospital-based and independent laboratory requirements and establish consistentrequirements for all laboratories.andbullet; We would impose a new quality assurance program on all laboratories.This provision would require a laboratory to be responsible for the qualityof its services and provide the laboratory with the flexibility to evaluatethe competency of technical staff.andbullet; We also intend to update current internal quality control requirementsfor each specialty and subspecialty, taking into consideration currentand future technological advances. We propose to emphasize the importanceof quality control and we would make failure of quality control in a specialtyor subspeciality result in the loss of approval or licensure in that specialtyor subspecialty.andbullet; We intend to revise the current Medicare and CLIA proficiencytesting requirements considerably. We would require every laboratory toenroll and participate successfully in an approved proficiency testingprogram for each specialty and subspecialty for which there is an approvedprogram and for which the laboratory seeks or has Medicare approval orCLIA licensure. The proficiency testing programs would have to meet ourrequirements, including grading criteria, in order to be considered anapproved program for purposes of our regulations.andbullet; We propose to update the licensure requirements applicable onlyto CLIA laboratories by eliminating overly-prescriptive requirements, suchas those involved with annual license renewal.andbullet; We propose to require Medicare laboratories to comply with Federallaws concerning health and safety and CLIA laboratories to comply withFederal, State and local laws concerning health and safety. Currently,a laboratory out of compliance with a State or local law may lose its Medicareapproval but retain CLIA licensure, an inconsistency that this regulationwould eliminate.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Proposed Rule</ITAG>General ApproachWe propose to revise the standards for all laboratories participating inMedicare or Medicaid or licensed under CLIA to provide as much uniformityas possible within these programs. (For these proposed regulations we wouldnot consider a physician or group of physicians that performs tests onlyon his, her, or their own patients as a laboratory; however, the OBRA'schange concerning physicians performing 5000 tests does not distinguishbetween tests done on referral and those that are not.) There are certainlimitations on the extent to which the regulations can be unified becauseof differences in the Medicare and CLIA statutes.The new Part 493 would have ten subparts dealing with general provisions,administration, proficiency testing, proficiency testing programs, patienttest management, quality control, personnel, quality assurance, inspection,and requirements unique to CLIA laboratories and CLIA licensure procedures.The regulations affecting other facilities that have requirements for laboratoryservices would be modified by cross-referring them to the new regulations.Under the Medicare program, conditions of participation or for coverageare the requirements that an entity, such as a laboratory, must meet inorder to participate and have tests paid for by Medicare or Medicaid. Eachcondition is usually comprised of one or more standards, which enumerateactivities, outcomes, or other requirements that, upon evaluation by HCFAor a State survey agency under contract with HCFA, serve as the basis fordetermining that a particular condition has been satisfied. If the laboratoryfails to comply with any condition for coverage, we initiate an adverseaction to terminate the laboratory's participation in Medicare or revokethe laboratory's licensure under CLIA. The adverse action may be takenby terminating a laboratory's participation or licensure in a specialtyor subspecialty if the deficiencies are limited to particular categoriesof testing or the laboratory's approval for all services may be terminatedif the deficiencies are pervasive, affecting the overall services offeredby the laboratory.Unless otherwise identified in our regulations, standards refer to thecondition immediately preceding them. Depending on the complexity of thesubject matter a standard may be designated as a regulation section orsubsection. A subordinate designation does not imply that some standardsare more important than others.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG>I. Section 493.1, Basis and ScopeIn a new andSection; 493.1, Basis and scope, we would indicate the sectionsof the laws that apply to the new part_sections 1861 (e) and (j), the sentencefollowing section 1861(s)(11), sections 1861(s) (12) and (13) and 1902of the Social Security Act and section 353 of the Public Health ServiceAct. We intend for this part to apply to all independent and hospital-basedlaboratories, intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded, skillednursing facilities and ambulatory surgical centers that perform laboratoryservices, rural health clinics that perform tests on referral, and physicians'offices that perform any tests on referral.2. Section 493.2, DefinitionsIt is our practice to define terms whose meanings may not be clear fromtheir context or where we apply an interpretation that may not be commonlyused. This section would contain definitions that are applicable to bothMedicare and CLIA. We would eliminate requirements of present regulationsthat we feel are unnecessarily prescriptive; hence, many definitions foundin current andSection;andSection; 405.1310 and 74.2 are no longer necessary.andbullet; Independent laboratory_Currently, ``independent laboratory'' is defined in andSection; 405.1310(a).We propose to delete the definition of ``independent laboratory'' fromthe definition section because it placed emphasis on location and ownership,conditions no longer considered relevant under this proposal. We wouldremove the exception in the present definition for laboratories maintainedby physicians that accept no more than 100 specimens on referral in anycategory during any calendar year because our experience has not shownthat the definition is effective in assuring that physician office laboratorieslimit testing of specimens received on referral. Rather, we will continueto enforce rigorously our requirement that Medicare-approved laboratoriesrefer tests only to approved laboratories. We would maintain the exceptionfor physician office and rural health clinic laboratories that performno tests on referral. Under this proposed rule these rural health clinicsand physician office laboratories that perform any tests on referral wouldbe required to meet these conditions for coverage of services of laboratories.In addition, on January 1, 1990, the legislative provision requiring thatphysicians performing 5,000 or more tests per year must meet health andsafety conditions will go into effect.andbullet; Clinical Laboratory_Currently, under andSection; 405.1310 a clinical laboratory is a facilityfor the examination of the microbiological, serological, chemical, hematological,radiobioassay, cytological, immunohematological, pathological, or otherexamination of materials derived from the human body for purpose of diagnosis,prevention or treatment of disease or assessment of a medical condition.Section 74.2(a) makes Part 74 applicable to laboratories engaged in thelaboratory examination of, or other laboratory procedures relating to,specimens solicited or accepted in interstate commerce for the purposeof providing information for the diagnosis, prevention or treatment ofany disease or impairment, or the assessment of the health, of human beings.Our proposed definition of a clinical laboratory would remove the word``clinical''. It does not add anything to the definition and may createconfusion, since we also pay for the services of independent laboratories,hospital laboratories, etc., which perform anatomic services, which aregenerally not considered part of clinical laboratory services. In addition,our definition would differ from that currently in andSection; 405.1310(b)and andSection; 74.2(a) since we would include in the examination of materialderived from the human body screening tests and any test where a measurementis made on an analyte (test) or where a procedure is performed.We would make this modification because, in the case of CLIA laboratories,there have been questions concerning the applicability of CLIA to certainscreening procedures, such as drug testing or HIV (AIDS) testing. Somepeople believe that these tests are not subject to regulation because theywould indicate a drug level or presence of HIV virus and are not a diagnosisor an assessment of health and thus subject to regulation. However, thesetests are currently reimbursed under Medicare and Medicaid and are consideredtest procedures for health assessment. Therefore, in moving the definitionin andSection; 74.2(a) and andSection; 405.1310(b) to new andSection; 493.2 wewould expand it to provide uniformity between Medicare and CLIA and toclarify the types of procedures covered by the regulations.We would not consider as laboratories those facilities that only collectspecimens and do not perform testing. We also would not consider mailingservices as laboratories if they just send out reports, the testing laboratoryassumes responsibility for the report, and the name and address of thetesting laboratory is on the report.andbullet; Proficiency testing_We would not include a definition of proficiency testing because the twoproposed subparts, C and D, include extensive discussion of proficiencytesting. We propose to provide criteria for State and private-sector programsto meet in order to be approved for use in the Medicare and CLIA programs.Laboratories would have to enroll in these approved programs to meet DHHS'requirements for successful participation in a proficiency testing programfor both CLIA and Medicare.andbullet; Personnel requirements_Terms currently contained in paragraphs (d), (e), (g), (h), (i) and (k)in andSection; 405.1310 and in andSection; 74.1(c) would not appear in ourproposed rule. Therefore, these definitions are no longer required.andbullet; Radiobioassay and histocompatibility_We would not include the current definitions for radiobioassay and histocompatibilityin andSection; 405.1310 (l) and (m) and for radiobioassay in andSection; 74.1(i)since these terms are cleary explained elsewhere in the proposed regulations.andbullet; Authorized person_We would add a definition of ``authorized person'' as the person authorizedto order and receive tests. Under Medicare that person is a physician asdefined in section 1861(r) of the Act. We would permit other individuals,including patients, to be ``authorized persons'' when State law and Medicaidallows. This would reduce the conflict between Federal and State law overwho can order and receive tests and would defer to the States for Medicaidpurposes as well as to the State where Federal funding under Medicare orMedicaid is not involved.andbullet; Consultation_We would not include two definitions currently contained in andSection; 405.1310.``Consultation'' and ``Secretary'' do not appear in proposed new Part 493.(We use, instead of ``Secretary,'' ``HHS,'' which is defined in Part 400.)andbullet; Miscellaneous_+ ``Referee laboratory'', which is a laboratory used for comparison ofproficiency test results, would be defined as it is currently in andSection;74.1(j).+ Reference laboratory'', currently defined in Part 74.1(k), would be deletedbecause the proposed proficiency testing program does not include the term``reference laboratory'' in defining grading criteria.  + We would explain what ``CLIA'' stands for.  + We would define ``accredited laboratory'' based on current andSection;74.1(c),including the current definition of ``approved accreditation body'' thatis now in andSection;74.1(e)  + Accredited institution,'' ``director,'' ``health insurance program,''and ``physician'' now defined in Part 74 would be excluded from our proposedrule as duplicative or unnecessary. ``Specimen'' would be defined as itappears in current andSection;405.1310 and andSection;74.1(b).  + We would define ``challenge'' and ``target value,'' which are relatedto the proficiency testing requirements.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart B_Administration  </ITAG>Section 493.11 Condition_Compliance With Federal, State and Local Laws Present Medicare requirements in andSection;405.1311 relating to compliancewith State and local laws do not include compliance with Federal laws relatedto health and safety nor do current requirements under CLIA. We do notbelieve that a laboratory should be certified if it is not in compliancewith other Federal regulations concerning patient health and safety. NewandSection;493.11 would include this requirement.  The requirement to comply with Federal, State and local laws would alsoapply to CLIA laboratories. This requirement is more stringent that CLIArequirements currently in andSection;74.30, which requires compliance withState laws for personnel standards only, by cross-referring to the Medicarestandards. The inclusion of these provisions for CLIA laboratories wouldeliminate the requirement for a State survey agency to inspect the laboratoryfor CLIA licensure purposes when the laboratory cannot operate in the Statebecause of noncompliance with State laws. In the case of laboratories participatingin both the Medicare and CLIA programs, which are the majority of interstatelaboratories, unifying the requirements to assure compliance with Stateand local laws would eliminate the possibility of laboratories being acceptableunder CLIA and unacceptable in the Medicare program for the same test procedures. We would require compliance with the existing regulatory programs coveredby State and local laws for fire safety and with State, Federal and locallaws on environment and health-related matters.  Proposed andSection;493.11 would not include the requirements in presentandSection;405.1316(c) concerning who may draw specimens from a patient,as this issue is governed by State law if such requirements exist.  <ITAG tagnum="85">Subpart C_Participation in Proficiency Testing  </ITAG>Present regulations at 42 CFR 405.1314(a) and Part 74, Subpart E requirelaboratories to participate in proficiency testing (PT) programs. We wouldgreatly expand these requirements. A new Subpart C would contain the generalrequirements a laboratory must meet for PT and would elevate current requirementsfor enrollment and successful participation to the condition level.  The new PT requirements would emphasize the increased importance attachedto obtaining a passing score on samples with known contents as an outcomemeasure of the quality of testing in laboratories. CDC, under an InteragencyAgreement with HCFA, established a Task Force that developed proposed PTrequirements in response to our request for a PT program that could beapplied to both Medicare and CLIA laboratories.  Although specific requirements for a PT program are included for CLIA laboratoriesin 42 CFR Part 74, minimally acceptable requirements for Medicare-approvedlaboratories have never been described by HHS in terms of program content,challenge, frequency of PT shipments or testing events and grading criteriafor individual analytes and specialties and subspecialties. As a consequence,State and private organizations have offered PT programs that have beenapproved for Medicare purposes. These programs vary considerably in degreeof challenge and grading criteria from each other and from the existingCLIA PT requirements.  Our proposed regulatory revisions would focus on assessing the qualityof laboratory tests that are commonly performed or have results criticalto the patient's health (e.g., an incorrect result has a moderate to highrisk of death), or both. In the future we hope to include additional testsin areas such as histopathology, cytogenetics and drug abuse testing. Wealso propose to exclude from the proposed PT program those test areas forwhich no performance problems are evident, such as routine urinalysis,and to continue to reevaluate the necessity for PT for other test areasin the future.The regulations would include a PT grading system by specialty and subspecialty.The current CLIA requirements in 42 CFR Part 74 include a composite scorefor a few specialty areas but do not include a scoring system for mostareas that would provide for a determination to be made of the overallperformance of the laboratory in each specialty and subspecialty.The proposed PT requirements would apply to selected tests, named in theregulations. It is neither possible nor currently feasible to evaluateevery test a laboratory can perform by PT, since many tests are not availablein PT programs presently offered. The tests and analytes we selected forchallenge are representative of the laboratory's ability to perform ineach specialty and subspecialty.These proposed regulations would make adverse actions based on unsuccessfulPT performances consistent for laboratories approved under Medicare andthose licensed under CLIA.The Medicare program currently requires successful participation in a PTprogram in each specialty and subspecialty. We do not currently provideStates with criteria for determining successful participation for specialtiesand subspecialties. Hence, under Medicare, States may establish individualprotocols for evaluating PT performance and these evaluations vary fromState to State.Under CLIA, HCFA may take an adverse action against a laboratory by removinglicensure for individual tests. However, current CLIA PT regulations donot provide for grading PT performance by specialty or subspecialty exceptfor bacteriology, mycology and parasitology, which are not graded by testbut are graded by overall subspecialties.Therefore, with the exception of the subspecialties of bacteriology, mycologyand parasitology, adverse actions proceed test by test as unsatisfactoryperformance occurs with no provisions for removing licensure by specialtyor subspecialty even though the laboratory may be performing related methodologiesin the same specialty or subspecialty. Moreover, a laboratory could failall PT testing in a particular specialty or subspecialty and lose its licensefor those tests but would still be allowed to perform related testing inthe specialty or subspecialty because PT testing is not offered for alltests categorized in a specialty or subspecialty.In the Medicare program, we approve and disapprove independent laboratoriesby specialties and subspecialties rather than by individual tests. TheMedicare carrier is notified of the laboratory's approval by specialtyand subspecialty, not by test(s) performed. It is not feasible under Medicareto terminate approval for individual tests since thousands of tests areinvolved. Monitoring laboratories' continuous changes in approval statusby individual tests is not effective since test offerings change frequentlyand updates to the States, regions and carriers would always lag behindchanges in laboratory services.We have decided that the development of a specialty and subspecialty gradingsystem is the most reasonable and appropriate mechanism to monitor qualityof testing. Since our intent is to make the Medicare and CLIA programsas consistent as possible and to provide an overall assurance of the quality,we propose to require identical mechanisms of assessing PT performancefor CLIA and Medicare laboratories. We propose a unified assessment tobe made by the Medicare State survey agency or HHS in determining the licensureand Medicare approval status of a laboratory by specialty and subspecialty.The State survey agencies would receive a single set of PT data and wouldconsistently determine compliance for the two programs at the same time.A laboratory failing the PT requirements and the enhanced PT requirementswould lose Medicare approval for the specialty or subspecialty. Similarly,a CLIA licensed laboratory would be notified of any PT failure and, ifa hearing is not requested, the license would be revoked for the specialtyor subspecialty.Currently, a laboratory may enroll in one or more PT programs to satisfyMedicare requirements and a different program to satisfy requirements underCLIA. The proposed modification of the regulation would require laboratoriesto specify the PT program it is using to meet the Medicare or CLIA requirements(or both). It would not preclude a State or private-sector accreditationprogram from having different standards for its own program purposes butit would require that laboratories be enrolled and successfully participatein a PT program that meets the Federal criteria.We would introduce requirements for an enhanced PT program in andSection;493.25, Condition: Enhanced proficiency testing. If a laboratory were toperform unsuccessfully in PT, it would be able to request enrollment inan enhanced PT program within 15 days of notification of unsuccessful performancein order to prevent immediate termination for that failed specialty orsubspecialty. While the laboratory is participating in the enhanced PTprogram, Medicare approval and CLIA licensure, as applicable, for the testsperformed under the specialty or subspecialty would continue. If the laboratoryalso fails the enhanced PT, we would initiate termination of Medicare approvalor revocation of CLIA licensure, as applicable, for the failed specialtyor subspecialty. By instituting the enhanced PT program, we would not bepenalizing a laboratory for one set of aberrant results. The laboratoryduring this period of participation in enhanced PT would be able to undertakeany necessary corrective action while also demonstrating sustained successfulperformance in the failed specialty or subspecialty.In the new section on enhanced PT (andSection; 493.25), we propose that laboratoriesthat fail PT must successfully participate in an enhanced PT program forthree consecutive shipments, testing events or combination thereof in thefailed specialty or subspecialty in order to prevent immediate terminationof approval or licensure for the specialty or subspecialty. The enhancedPT program would consist of more specimens per shipment or testing eventthan what is required in the routine PT and may be at a frequency greaterthan quarterly. Enhanced PT may consist of challenges to cover the overallspecialty or subspecialty or it may consist of individual analyte challenges,depending upon the laboratory's PT failure. If laboratory performance fallsbelow the acceptable level after one, two or three shipments or testingevents of enhanced PT, approval of the applicable specialty or subspecialtywould be terminated, licensure revocation proceedings instituted, or both.If a laboratory's Medicare participation were terminated or its CLIA licensewere revoked as a result of a PT failure, the laboratory's participationor licensure for the applicable specialty or subspecialty could not bereinstated until the laboratory demonstrated sustained successful performancein three consecutive shipments or testing events (or combination) of enhancedPT. The proposed acceptable levels for enhanced PT (80 percent of resultswithin limits for categories of testing; and for individual analysis: 5of 6 results for one shipment, 10 of 12 for two shipments and 15 of 18for three shipments) are based on statistical calculations and intendedto detect substandard performance without falsely identifying competentlaboratories. For these calculations, a competent laboratory is assumedto have less than a one percent chance of exceeding the acceptable limitsestablished for each analyte. We ask for comments regarding other alternativeenhanced PT schemes, for example, the desirability of requiring satisfactoryscores on five of six results for each of two shipments, rather than requiringsatisfactory scores on five of six results for each of three shipments.We seek comments on the ability of laboratories, including physician officelaboratories, to meet these criteria, and the adequacy of these criteriafor protecting health and safety.We are not considering enhanced PT for cytology at this time but are insteadproposing different remedial actions a laboratory failing PT in cytologywould have to take to remain approved or licensed. See ``Remedial actionsfor cytology'' below.The revised regulations would establish an evaluation system based on successfulparticipation for each testing event or shipment of PT at approximatelyquarterly intervals. Under current Medicare practice we disapprove a facilityif three out of four shipment scores are unsatisfactory. Currently, ifa laboratory has three unsatisfactory shipments out of four, it takes overa year to initiate a termination. Under the proposed revision we coulddecrease this time interval to as short as two months if the laboratorydoes not enroll in enhanced PT. (The PT program has one month to notifyus of PT results; we notify the laboratory of its loss of approval withinone month.)The proposal for revision of the PT requirements also would include a provisionfor action against a laboratory when there is unsatisfactory performancefor the same single analyte in any PT shipment or testing event or whenthere is unsatisfactory performance for one of two challenges for the sameanalyte in each of two consecutive shipments or testing events (or combination).We would terminate approval of the entire specialty or subspecialty inwhich the failed analyte is categorized unless the laboratory requestsenrollment in the enhanced PT program, since under the Medicare programthere is no mechanism for taking action to deny payment for a single test.Since the tests that we have selected for participation in the PT programare critical to patient health and are representative of the universe oftests frequently performed in the specialty or subspecialty, poor performancein even one test, if uncorrected, is indicative of more widespread problemsin testing, management and proper quality assurance procedures. If a laboratoryperforms unsatisfactorily on the individual analytes selected for PT andthe same analytes in the enhanced PT program, we would take terminationaction against the laboratory within 15 days of notification by the PTprogram to protect the health and safety of the individuals being tested.We would also institute an overall PT evaluation by specialty in chemistry,immunology and microbiology. Our objective is to assess overall performanceto the extent possible. Thus, poor performance in one subspecialty wouldresult in the laboratory failing the specialty as well and the laboratorywould be unable to obtain approval for any of the other subspecialtiesin the same category. The laboratory would therefore have an additionalincentive to participate successfully in PT.Laboratory Requirements<ITAG tagnum="81">andbullet; General</ITAG>In new andSection; 493.21, Condition: Enrollment and testing of samples,we would have two standards: (1) If a PT program has been approved undernew Subpart D for a specialty or subspecialty for which a laboratory seeksor has approval or licensure, a laboratory must enroll in an approved PTprogram for each specialty and subspecialty for which it seeks approval(Medicare or Medicaid) or licensure (CLIA); and (2) the laboratory musttest or examine the PT samples in the laboratory's routine manner.This section would require the laboratory to notify HHS of the PT programit has chosen; it would be able to designate no more than one PT programper specialty (in specialties without subspecialties) or subspecialty forthe purposes of meeting the PT enrollment requirements. A laboratory couldchange its selection of PT programs after four quarterly shipments butwould have to notify us. The laboratory would have to agree to allow thePT program to release any data to us that we need to evaluate the laboratory'sperformance.Section 493.21 would contain a standard concerning how the laboratory isto run the PT samples it receives from the PT program. The laboratory wouldhave to run the samples with its regular work and by personnel who ordinarilyperform the laboratory's testing; it could not run tests in replicate unlessit usually does so; and it could not send the samples to another laboratoryfor analysis.In andSection; 493.22, Condition: Successful participation, a laboratorythat does not successfully participate in PT for a given specialty andsubspecialty for which it seeks approval for Medicare or Medicaid participationor licensure under CLIA may request enrollment in an enhanced PT programto prevent immediate termination of approval or institution of licenserevocation proceedings for the failure specialty or subspecialty. If weinstitute an enhanced PT program, good laboratories would not be penalizedfor a single PT failure since the laboratory would be afforded the opportunityto demonstrate sustained successful PT performance through enrollment inthe enhanced PT program. The enhanced PT program would identify marginaland poorly performing laboratories (those that cannot demonstrate sustainedsuccessful performance) for expeditious adverse action.In andSection; 493.24, Reinstatement after failure to participate successfully,we propose that a laboratory failing PT in any specialty or subspecialtymust demonstrate successful performance for three consecutive shipmentsor testing events (or combination) of enhanced PT in that failed specialtyor subspecialty before it may discontinue enhanced PT, or, if it has beenterminated, before it can be reinstated in the specialty or subspecialty.When a laboratory performs poorly over an extended period of time, it shouldnot be allowed back into the program until it has demonstrated its abilityto perform successfully for a sufficient length of time to assure thatit has not made just a temporary improvement in its testing performance.Therefore, we determined that ap-proval for the failed specialty or subspecialtywould be terminated for a period of no less than six months. Reinstatementof approval in the specialty or subspecialty that had been the subjectof an adverse action would not be considered until the laboratory has demonstratedsuccessful performance over three consecutive enhanced PT shipments ortesting events (or combination). We are extending the successful performanceperiod for reinstatement from two shipments to three shipments or testingevents to assure that the laboratory demonstrates sustained improvement.<ITAG tagnum="81">andbullet; Proficiency Testing by Specialty and Subspecialty</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">+ General</ITAG>Sections 493.31 through 493.63 would contain the criteria for acceptableperformance a laboratory would have to meet to participate successfullyin a PT program for each specialty and subspecialty. The specialties andsubspecialties named in these proposed regulations would be microbiology(bacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology, and parasitology), diagnosticimmunology (syphilis serology and general immunology), chemistry (routinechemistry, endocrinology, and toxicology), hematology, pathology (includingcytology for gynecologic examinations) and immunohematology.As stated earlier, PT would consist of four annual shipments from the PTprogram for each specialty and subspecialty. In addition, we are consideringconducting onsite PT, through the State survey agencies. (All cytologyPT might be conducted onsite; see proposal below.)Whenever possible, we determined a composite performance score for specialtiesand subspecialties of quantitative testing after evaluating historicalaccreditation program PT performance data from 1986. We consider a gradeof 80% for an overall specialty or subspecialty of testing to be a reasonable,achievable level of performance. In immunohematology in which even oneerror may have serious and immediate consequences, we would require a performancelevel of 100% for subspecialties of testing.The 80% composite score for specialties and subspecialties of service togetherwith the evaluation of analyte performance, which focuses on identifyinganalyte testing problems, would provide the basis for assessing laboratoryperformance to permit detection of laboratories whose results are consistentlymarginal or worse, while not penalizing a laboratory that rarely producesmarginal results. The unique feature of including the enhanced PT program,although not currently offered by PT programs, would provide an improvedmeasure for separating a rare single laboratory error from a true laboratoryperformance problem ensuring that poor performers are recognized as suchand that good performers retain Medicare approval or CLIA licensure (orboth).After we have implemented the PT program and collected and examined PTperformance data, we anticipate that additional refinements in the PT programgrading criteria would be necessary.Whenever changes are necessary, we would expedite the rulemaking processto ensure the most rapid implementation in order to have dynamic requirementsto respond timely to new testing procedures and methodologies as well asrefinements in performance and evaluation criteria.We would publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> before revising PT program requirements. <ITAG tagnum="81">+ Cytology </ITAG>While we recognize especially the importance of developing a national consistentstandard for a PT program for cytology, we also acknowledge the complexityand uniqueness of this area of laboratory testing. Cytology PT differsfrom most other PT programs because (1) cytology testing remains a manualprocess that is totally dependent upon the judgment of the person viewingthe specimen; (2) a cytology PT program tests the accuracy of each individualengaged in the examination of cytologic preparations more than the overallperformance of the laboratory; and (3) there is a substantial degree ofdifficulty in obtaining cytology specimens for PT. Currently, most PT programs do not test cytology services. As a result,we do not have as much information as in other areas from which to assesscytology PT. We are therefore proposing three options (onsite testing,mailed shipments of specimens, and a combination) for interested partiesto comment upon. All options include ranges for accuracy rates, numberof challenges per testing event and number of testing events per year.We would appreciate comments concerning which accuracy rate in each rangecommenters prefer (and why) as well as which PT option is preferred andwhy. We are proposing at this time to require cytological PT only for gynecologicexaminations; thus we are proposing standards at this time for a nationalPT program in cytology for Pap smears only. We are proposing that Cytology:Gynecologic examinations be a subspecialty under the specialty of pathology.Other tests, such as fine needle aspiration, breast fluid, etc., whichare non-gynecologic cytology tests, constitute a small portion of cytologytests, and all cases are ultimately reviewed by qualified pathologists.Therefore, we are not proposing standards for a PT program for non-gynecologicalcytology testing at this time. We considered numerous approaches to cytology PT, some of which were foundto be impractical as the basis for a national standard for PT in cytology.For example, we considered ``blind'' PT as one approach. In blind PT, samplesare submitted through cooperative clients (physicians) to the laboratory.These slides are theoretically undetected as PT test cases because theyresemble routine specimens received by the laboratory. We decided thisapproach would not be practical to use on a national basis because of thedifficulty in obtaining enough specimens as well as the cooperation ofphysicians to distribute PT samples to the laboratories and assuring thatthese specimens are, in actuality, not easily identified as PT challenges.While we agree that a true ``blind'' PT program is a valuable methodology,we could not implement such a complex program on a national basis becauseof the logistics. Therefore, we propose to include the ``blind'' submittalof known specimens as an option for the laboratory to use as part of itsown internal quality assurance program to evaluate cytotechnologist performanceand to document the quality of laboratory performance (See Subpart H_QualityAssurance). We also considered a retrospective PT program approach and likewise foundit to be impractical to implement on a large scale. This system involvesthe selection of previously screened slides for screening by either exchangingslides with another laboratory as a ``round robin'' scheme, rescreeningone laboratory's cytology cases by a reference laboratory with recognizedexpertise in cytology, or rescreening by a panel of cytology experts ina State. The slides selected would have to be representative of the laboratory'sworkload and would have to include some abnormal specimens. Since managinga retrospective program would be highly labor-intensive and complicatedto conduct and maintain, and criteria do not exist for selecting the laboratorieswhich would have final responsibility for determining correctness of diagnosis,we have also decided to propose including the retrospective PT approachas an option for the laboratory to use as part of its own quality assuranceprogram. Retrospective PT may be used to evaluate individual cytotechnologistperformance and overall laboratory performance and as one of several approachesfor remedial action if any cytotechnologists fail the national standardsfor the cytology PT program ultimately selected. <ITAG tagnum="81">^ Options </ITAG>We would like to develop a program that will be feasible and practicaland that will serve as a strong measure of performance evaluation in cytologytesting. We are seeking public comment on three possible approaches tocytology PT. 1. The first approach to cytology PT standards about which we seek commentinvolves an ``onsite'' methodology. This system involves taking actualPT slides to the laboratory or testing the individuals engaged in examinationof cytologic preparations at an offsite testing center and directly observingthe individuals as they review the slides. This system, to be conductedby the State survey agency, would allow us to test all individuals in thelaboratory who are involved in the examination of slides and has the advantageof permitting immediate feedback if a performance problem is detected.Disadvantages are: slides are pre-stained and may differ from the laboratory'susual staining quality; positives may sometimes be present in greater frequencythan would ordinarily be found in the laboratory's regular screening workload;and a set time limit for review per slide, imposed to expedite the testingprocess, may be discomforting to some examinees and may not reflect theconditions under which cytotechnologists routinely examine slides. In addition,though the onsite PT methodology is practical as a standard for a nationalPT program it is expensive to operate, especially in terms of the personnelneeded to transport the slides and conduct the PT program. We are proposing that satisfactory performance for each individual wouldbe based on a 80 to 100 percent correct response on each PT survey andover the span of three testing events. Successful performance for the laboratory,which includes all individuals engaged in slide examination, would alsobe based on 80 to 100 percent correct responses on each testing event.A correct response would be an 80 percent or greater agreement of participants.We are interested in receiving comments regarding instances when thereis not agreement of a minimum 80% of the response or when a graded responsemay be close to the consensus but not exact. 2. The second approach to cytology PT standards about which we seek commentinvolves mailed specimens. This system involves mailing sets of slidesor photographs or interactive video discs that represent a spectrum ofpossible cytologic findings. Each individual in the laboratory who is engagedin slide examination analyzes the set of samples and reports his or herresults in a standardized format. Problems with this approach include slide breakage in transit, poor reproducibilityof colors in photographs and variations in slide staining. However, videodiscs may offer solutions to these problems. Overall, this option wouldtend to reflect the best rather than the usual performance by individualand laboratory. We are proposing the same scoring system for this option as for the ``onsite''option, but hope to receive comments on more stringent grading criteria.3. The third approach is simply a combination of onsite and mailed cytologyPT. We are seeking detailed comments on how we could set standards fora cytology PT program that would contain features of both onsite and mailedPT. <ITAG tagnum="81">+ Remedial Actions for Cytology (Gynecologic Preparations Only) </ITAG>The principal purpose of any PT program is to identify areas of performancethat need correction or improvement and to ensure that good performanceis maintained over time. Because correct cytology performance involvesthe skill and judgment of individuals viewing slide preparations (as opposedto a machine making correct analyses of fluids, for example) and becausethe results are especially critical to diagnosis and treatment, we areproposing different remedial actions that would be taken when individualsfail the cytology PT program. We are proposing remedial actions applicable to individuals who do notdemonstrate satisfactory performance and penalties applicable to laboratoriesthat fail to maintain overall successful performance in their cytologytesting programs. The remedial actions would be the same for any of thecytology PT options: mailed specimens, onsite testing and a combinationof the two. We are inviting comments on this proposal, especially in terms of wayswe can improve the process of remedial actions when individuals fail thePT program. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Remedial Actions Concerning Individuals </ITAG>The first time an individual fails any part of a cytology PT survey, thelaboratory would have to provide the individual with immediate remedialtraining and education in the area of the failure and a review in thoseareas passed. If the individual's score is 50 percent or less in each oftwo testing events, we would require a more stringent form of remedialaction up to prohibiting the individual from reporting negative slidesuntil the individual has been retrained and demonstrates necessary accuracyby scoring 100 percent on two consecutive PT testing events. If eithertwo or more or ten percent or more of the individuals in a laboratory,whichever number is greater, fail any PT testing event, all individualsengaged in the examination of slides would have to undergo additional trainingand education in addition to that required in Subpart G (personnel requirements)<T3>and</T3> the laboratory would have to participate in a retrospectivePT program until the laboratory achieves an overall score of 95 percentor more correct responses over three subsequent consecutive PT testingevents. The 95 percent score for the laboratory represents the compositescore of all cytotechnologists <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Fiscal Penalties for Laboratories </ITAG>We are proposing that if the laboratory fails to take required remedialactions (as described above) when an individual fails the PT program orif either two or more or ten percent or more of the individuals in a laboratory,whichever number is greater, fail two or more of PT testing events, wewould terminate the laboratory's Medicare approval for the subspecialtyof gynecologic examinations, revoke its CLIA licensure, or both as applicable.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart D_Proficiency Testing Programs </ITAG>A new Subpart D would contain the requirements a PT program would haveto meet before a laboratory could use it to meet the PT requirements ofSubpart C. Subpart D would indicate for each specialty and subspecialty(a) program content and frequency of challenge; (b) the number of challengesper quarter; and (c) how to evaluate analytes or test performance. Before 1986 CDC operated a PT program for CLIA licensed laboratories. Therevised regulations would not include a federally-operated PT program.We would depend on private-sector and State-operated programs to providethe PT. We would evaluate the programs against the standards establishedin these regulations in Subpart D. Ideally, the criteria for acceptable laboratory performance should be basedon clinical usefulness of test results; however, there are no generallyagreed upon medical usefulness criteria. In the absence of medical criteriafor acceptable performance, we would define acceptable performance usingfixed criteria, when appropriate, and statistical limits elsewhere. Thisapproach corresponds to current laboratory performance evaluations basedon the state of the practice. We would use a three standard deviation limitto identify laboratories requiring regulatory intervention; this is similarto laboratory internal quality control systems that currently use a threestandard deviation limit to identify serious problems requiring remedialaction. We are interested, however, in receiving comments on the marginaleffectiveness of using two standard deviations for any analyte. Basically, programs wishing to qualify as a PT program under these regulationswould have to offer a minimum of at least two challenges per quarter foreach test or analyte for the subspecialities included in the specialitiesof diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology, and immunohematology andsix challenges per quarter for the specialty of microbiology, which includesthe subspecialities of bacteriology, mycology, mycobacteriology and parasitology.For the enhanced PT program, we would require six challenges per shipmentfor each test or analyte for the subspecialties, include in the specialtiesof diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology and immunohematology andtwelve challenges per shipment for the specialty of microbiology. Whereappropriate, the regulations would describe the different types of servicesa laboratory could perform for that specialty or subspecialty. The laboratorywould be expected to perform tests on PT samples to the same extent thattesting is performed on patient samples. Subpart D would describe criteria for acceptable performance. The criteriafor grading was developed through an evaluation of the current criteriain use by States and private sector programs and an evaluation of dataCDC had for the performance characteristics of laboratories. A PT program would evaluate a laboratory in a manner that reflects thescope and level of services the laboratory offers as oppposed to the currentCLIA PT requirements that specify that laboratories enroll only in programsof fixed size, regardless of their scope of services. After the PT program has been in operation for two years we would considerrevisions to the program based on the performance of laboratories. We wouldsolicit comments from all concerned groups regarding the need to modifythe PT program requirements. Changes in the PT program might be made toincorporate new analytes, tests, or organisms of clinical significance,to delete obsolete or well-performed tests, or to improve the evaluationscheme based on new data describing actual distributions of test scores,and the relationship of test errors to physician practices and patientoutcomes. When we have decided to include new challenges or evaluationcriteria in future PT, we would expect these changes to be provided byapproved PT programs within two years of our approval and announcement.We would review the standards for PT on a regular basis and make such changesas are necessary and provide notice of these changes to all affected. The requirements for program content and number of challenges per quarterwould be implemented through an expedited rulemaking process to enableus to drop or add tests timely to reflect current technologies. <ITAG tagnum="81">andbullet; Cytology (Gynecologic Examinations) </ITAG>As noted above in the discussion concerning Subpart C, we are proposingthree options for cytology. For all options, we are proposing one to fourPT testing events per year, with five to 12 slide preparations per individualper testing event. We are proposing that the type of challenges include``normals,'' infectious agents, benign reactive processes, pre-malignantprocesses, and malignant processes. We would require the program to provide previously ``referenced'' slides:``positive'' slides would have been confirmed by tissue biopsy and ``negative''slides would have been confirmed by 95 percent consensus agreement. <ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart E_Patient test management </ITAG>We would establish a new subpart E and a new condition_andSection; 493.201,Condition_Patient test management. This condition would provide a uniformset of requirements for all laboratories (CLIA and Medicare) for specimensubmission and requisition and would more clearly define the actual recordsthat must be kept and why they are required. The proposed requirement would be based on current Medicare requirementsdealing with clinical laboratory management (andSection;andSection; 405.1316(d), (e), (f), and (g)), quality control (405.1317(a)(7)), and CLIA laboratoryrequirements dealing with reports and records (andSection;andSection; 74.53and 74.54). The existing requirements would be modified to allow for electronic requisitionof laboratory tests to keep pace with modern technolgy and the advancesthat allow for computer systems to interact directly. We expect these computersystems to be provided with security systems and ``keys'' to assure thatonly authorized persons can order tests. In addition, we would add to thespecimen requisition requirement for cytology examinations, in andSection;493.201(b)(5), the provision that pertinent clinical information necessaryfor accurate diagnosis of cytology specimens must be provided to the laboratory,including for Pap smear testing, an indication of whether the patient isat risk for developing cervical cancer or its precursors. The existing requirement for retention of reports in pathology would beincreased from two years to ten years because a two-year time period isinsufficient to assure adequate patient tracking for cancer screening,diagnosis and follow up. The proposed standard on specimen records would indicate that the criticalrequirement is for the laboratory to have a system that ensures identificationof the specimen being treated through all stages of testing. The laboratorywould not be required to maintain the name of patients as long as thereis some mechanism in place to assure specimen identification and enableresults to be reported to the person ordering or requiring the test. Theregulations would require patient confidentially to be maintained but stillprovide for the correct identification and reporting of the specimen results.However, the Medicare carriers and intermediaries would continue to beable to require names or other identifiers in assuring payment of a claim.The proposed rule would remove the restrictive standards under Medicarethat only persons authorized under the Medicare program to request or receiveresults could obtain such results even if they were not seeking Medicarepayment. Several State laws permit individuals to order and obtain theirown test results and this conflicts with the Medicare regulations. Theproposed modification would allow flexibility for those tests performedon non-Medicare beneficiaries, provided State laws have no restrictionson who can order tests. The laboratory would have to determine or verify normal ranges used forreporting patient test results through validation studies required in andSection;493.235. The new section also would require the laboratory to make available toclients, information on factors that may affect the interpretation of testresults (if they are known), including interferences, detection limits,sensitivities, specificity, accuracy, precision and validity of these testmesaurements. In addition, laboratories would be required to notify clientswhenever changes occur in testing methodology that affects test resultsor interpretation of test results. This would enable the individual requestingand receiving test results to evaluate the laboratory's quality and anylimitations on the information they receive. This is the type of informationthat any laboratory should know in order to perform and report tests andis obtained through its quality control and quality assurance program and,in many instances, is available from the manufacturers of the test systems.We would add a requirement on test referral (standard (e)) to indicatethat each laboratory performing tests either directly or on referral musthave its name and other identifier on the report to the individual requestingor receiving test results so that the individual receiving the report willknow which laboratory actually performed the test. The current regulationsare not clear on whether all testing facilities must be indicated on thereport so that it is possible that multiple referrals do not include thename of all testing facilities on the report. Under the proposed requirements the laboratory must maintain a legallyreproduced copy, rather than an exact duplicate as is required by currentandSection; 405.1316(g), to make these regulations consistent with otherMedicare recordkeeping requirements and to allow for the use of new technologiesin the storage and transmittal of data.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart F_Quality Control </ITAG>Existing quality control requirements are in andSection; 405.1317 and Part74, Subpart C. We would revise and move them to Part 493 and form separateconditions. New andSection; 493.221, Condition; General quality control,would be applicable to all the specialities and subspecialties. New andSection;493.241 would specify that failure to meet the condition unique to a particularspecialty or subspecialty would result in the loss of Medicare approvalor CLIA licensure (or both) of that specialty or subspecialty. The revision of these requlations would reflect changes in technology aswell as clarify the specific requirements for each standard. The clarificationswould reflect the current Medicare guidelines and would more explicitlyinform the laboratories of their responsibilities under the regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. General Quality Control (andSection; 493.221) </ITAG>The general quality control regulations in andSection;andSection;405.1317(a)and 74.20 would be combined into one uniform condition as andSection; 493.221.We have made the general quality control a condition to indicate its importance.We would divide the requirements in current andSection;andSection; 405.1317(a)(1)and 74.20(a) into several standards in new sections in order to definemore clearly what the requirements are and to separate the various requirementsin the current regulatory factor into several distinct and related categoriesso that each is equal in importance. New andSection; 493.221 would elaborate on what such items as ``adequacyof equipment'' and ``test systems'' consist of beyond descriptions in currentandSection; 405.1317(a). We would add a requirement that the laboratory specify the procedure thestaff is to follow in case quality control results or patterns do not followthe expected patterns established by the laboratory. There would also beprocedures for reporting patient results when test method limitations areexceeded. These are critical elements in the performance and reportingof test results and are necessary to assure that accurate and reliableresults are obtained and reported. Since these factors are essential, thelaboratory staff should be aware of these procedures and the quality assuranceprogram (described in andSection; 493.451) would assure that these proceduresare in place and followed. We would also require the laboratory to verify the validity of its procedures.This requirement is contained in the current regulations in andSection; 405.1317(a)(1)but we would spell out in detail what constitutes the validation of eachtest method. We would also add a requirement that the laboratory have a mechanism inplace to verify the accuracy and reliability of data management and reportingsystems to assure that the data is accurately analyzed, processed and reported.This is a critical requirement since no matter how accurate and precisea method is, data not analyzed properly or reported correctly could resultin incorrect patient diagnosis or treatment. We also would revise the regulationsto indicate the importance of detecting errors in test results and reportingand promptly correcting these errors since the detection of the errorsis a critical element in assuring accurate and reliable test results.We would add a requirement under the general quality control conditionfor the frequency of running quality control materials. The frequenciesare currently indicated in andSection; 405.1317(b). We would place the requirementin the general section, rather than with each specialty, to provide flexibilityand eliminate the arbitrary classification of procedures to match the placementof certain quality control requirements in a specialty area. This revisionwould also reflect the changes in laboratory technology. We would alsoadd provisions to these regulations to allow for lesser frequencies aschanges in technology lead to methodological improvements. Our new requirements on equipment maintenance and function checks wouldindicate that the laboratory must define its own program based on the manufacturer'sinstructions. This is a revision from current requirements at andSection;405.1317(a). The laboratory would have to demonstrate that its proceduresproduce accurate and reliable test results. We have decided not to specifydetailed requirements for these procedures in the regulations; we wouldallow flexibility and the utilization of the manufacturer's protocols.We are seeking comment on the appropriateness of relying on manufacturers'protocols. The new requirement would also provide for technological change.We would not specify performance characteristics but would specify thatthe laboratory must determine its own performance characteristics basedon validation studies and must adhere to these established performancecharacteristics. We would require the laboratory to make the performancecharacteristics available upon request to individuals ordering and receivingtest results. The quality assurance subpart, Subpart H, would require thelaboratory to adhere to its quality assurance program and established protocols.We would define validation of methods and remedial actions and specificallyindicate what is required. The requirements would match our current guidelinesand would better inform the laboratories of their responsibilities. Whenever possible we would place similar requirements in the general sectionthat apply to more than one specialty area. For example, we would combinethe references on recalibration from the sections on hematology, chemistry,and radiobioassay, into a general section. In addition, because of theadvent of certain new technologies, we would no longer require daily instrumentverifications separate from quality control checks. Rather, we would specifythe basis and frequency for performing instrument checks, which correspondto our current guidelines in this area. We would also define the timeframes in which control samples must be testedwith patient specimens to assure accurate results. The current requirementfor including controls with each test run of patient specimens is clarifiedin these proposed requirements. We would include alternatives to the useof two standards or two controls since these materials are not always available.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Specific Quality Control Requirements (andSection; 493.243-andSection;493.315) </ITAG>We would transfer the contents of current andSection;405.1317(b), Standard;Quality control system methodologies, to this new subpart and create foreach specialty a new condition and for each subspecialty new standard.A laboratory must meet the conditions corresponding to the specialtiesand the standards corresponding to the subspecialities for which it wishesto be approved or licensed. These conditions and standards would appearin andSection;andSection; 493.243 through 493.315. Any laboratory found outof compliance with a condition for a specialty or standard for a specialtywould not become or remain approved or licensed for that specialty or subspecialty.In andSection; 493.243 we would include revised microbiology requirementsto indicate that the frequency of performing controls has been changedto reflect standards for current technology and state of the art developedby HCFA and CDC working with the National Committee for Clinical LaboratoryStandards (NCCLS). The NCCLS is a national voluntary standards organizationconsisting of representatives including manufacturer, laboratories andFederal and State regulatory agencies that develop and publish guidelinesand standards for laboratories. The NCCLS standards for microbiology mediaquality control and susceptibility testing quality control have been implementedthrough the HCFA State Operations Manual for Survey and Certification andhave been in place for approximately two years with no alteration in thequality of testing observed. The regulations would be modified to reflectthese changes. The laboratory community has estimated that the implementationof these changes has saved several million dollars per year in qualitycontrol costs with no adverse effects on microbiology testing. HHS is continuing to work with NCCLS and other groups to develop beneficialand cost effective standards. The standards would be modified as data becomeavailable and can be assessed to justify additional changes. We would also revise (in andSection; 493.255) the serology (diagnostic immunology)requirements to reflect the fact that the CDC no longer publishes a referencemanual on tests for syphilis serology. We would require the laboratoriesto follow the manufacturers' instructions. We intend to revise this sectionat a later date if the CDC revises its manual. We would also add the hepatitistesting and human immunodeficiency virus test requirements for facilitiesperforming this testing on blood and blood products used for transfusions.We would consolidate the requirements for serologic testing of the bloodin this section since they relate to this area and we would not requirereference laboratories performing this testing for blood banks to obtainadditional certification in immunohematology. The requirements would coincidewith the PT categories being developed for these regulations.We would revise the chemistry regulations (in andSection;493.261) by addingrequirements for three subspecialty areas: routine chemistry, endocrinologyand toxicology. All three areas, at this time, would have to meet the applicablegeneral quality control requirements and, for routine chemistry, laboratoriesperforming blood gases, urinalysis, or both, would have to meet the subspecialtyrequirements.  The revised hematology section (andSection;493.267) would reflect the factthat most of the requirements have been moved to the general quality controlsection. We would not retain current provisions for allowing an exemptionfrom running specimens in duplicate for coagulation tests such as prothrombintime since there is no scientific evidence at this time available to justifyretaining the current provisions. When criteria are available they wouldbe published.  The requirements for cytology would be revised to assure that the laboratoryhas a quality control program to detect errors and assure accurate laboratorydiagnosis. We would specify that gynecologic preparations must be stainedusing the Papanicolaou stain because it is the stain of choice for demonstratingabnormal cells. We would impose requirements for staining procedures toprotect slide preparations from cross-contamination from other specimens. We are seeking comments on whether we should establish workload requirementsfor individuals examining cytology slides. Because of the complexity anddifficulty of establishing regulations in this area, we have decided notto include a specific provision in the proposed regulation. However, dependingupon the comments, we may do so in the final regulation. Our deliberationson establishing workload requirements resulted in consideration of severaloptions. We seek specific comments on each option as well as the effectivenessand workability of any limitation of this kind.  One option we are considering is setting a limit on the number of slidesthat may be reviewed by each cytotechnologist in a day. Specifically, wecould require that each full-time cytotechnologist who reviews only gynecologicslides may review no more than from 80 to 100 slides in each 8 hour workdayof each twenty-four hour period. For part-time cytotechnololgists, we wouldrequire the number of slides that may be reviewed to be prorated usingthe same 80 to 100 slide limit per eight hour workday. If the full-timecytotechnologist performs duties other than slide examination, we wouldrequire the 80 to 100 slide limit to be prorated to correlate with theactual time spent in slide examinations using the formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/9,g1,t1,aw,22,1,22  </C> <H1>Hours worked on gynecologic slides</H1><H2>Total hours worked</H2><H1/>andmultiply;<H1>(80 to 100 slide limit)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>  With respect to the 80 to 100 slide limit, we are identifying what we believeto be a range of acceptable workloads and are interested in comments aboutthe precise number that we should select, or if we should retain a range,leaving the choice of the specific number of slides for each cytotechnologistto review up to the technical supervisor.  Under this option we would require that each full-time cytotechnololgistwho reviews only nongynecologic slides may review no more than 30 slidesin each 8 hour workday or each twenty-four hour period. If the cytotechnologistis part-time or performs duties other than slide examination, we wouldrequire the 30 slide limit to be prorated to correlate with the actualtime spent in slide examination using the formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/9,g1,t1,aw,22,1,22  </C> <H1>Hours worked on nongynecologic slides</H1><H2>Total hours worked</H2><H1/>andmultiply;<H1>30</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>   We would also require that the number of slides of both gynecologic andnongynecologic preparations a full-time cytotechnologist may examine beprorated by multiplying the ratio of hours worked on a given type of slideto the total number hours worked by the selected value in the 80 to 100range for gynecological slides and 30 for nongynecological slides. (Seeabove paragraphs for formulas.)  A second option we are considering is setting an annual volume limit basedon reasonable staffing patterns for cytology laboratories. For example,we could set a limit of 12,000 gynecology cases with 2 slides per caseas the maximum for each full-time cytotechnologist who reviews only gynecologicslides and a limit of 3,000 cases for each full-time cytotechnologist whoreveiws only nongynecologic slides. Calculations of annual volume for cytotechnologistswho are not engaged in examining slides on a full-time basis would be proratedas previously described in the first option.  An alternative that we also are considering to specifying a Federal workloadlimitation for cytotechnologists is placing with the technical supervisorresponsibility for determining the number of slides that can be reviewedcompetently and accurately by each full-time cytotechnologist in an eighthour day or for part-time cytotechnologists in a lesser time period. Thetechnical supervisor would document the competency of each cytotechnologistand would base the individual workload of each cytotechnologist on assessmentsof the accuracy of diagnosis for each cytotechnologist at a particularworkload rate. We seek comments on this alternative proposal particularlyon whether it is feasible for a technical supervisor to determine workloadlimits based on accuracy assessments.  Finally, we are interested in systematic studies that demonstrate a linkbetween quality and the number of slides examined per day, and whetherthere is an optimum relationship. We also seek comments on whether sucha requirement would necessitate record systems and workload supervisionso complex that it would interfer with laboratory performance; whetherchanges in technology (e.g., computer assisted imaging) would soon makeany such limitation counter productive; and whether proficiency testingwould render such a limitation unnecessary.We would revise our current requirements for rescreening of gynecologicor Pap smears interpreted to be negative from our current requirement ofa ten percent random sample to either a ten percent rescreen of all negativecases screened by each cytotechnologist or a rescreen of all cases fromwomen who are at risk for developing cervical cancer or its precursors.We would strengthen our requirements for rescreening in response to manycomments that our current rescreening requirement is ineffective in detectingfalse-negative cases and to improve the quality of slide review. We wouldspecify that the laboratory must complete the rescreening before it issuesfinal reports in order to detect and correct any false-negative resultsin a timely manner. Also, the laboratory would not have to report Pap smearexaminations immediately except in cases of viral infections in pregnantpatients, dysplasia or abnormal results. The proposed standards for correlating abnormal Pap smear findings withtissue biopsy reports and for retrospectively reviewing previous cytologyresults whenever abnormal results are identified are the best approachesto quality control in cytology. However, many laboratories do not haveaccess to tissue biopsy reports and also may not have slides from previouscytology cases; therefore, these requirements, although preferred, mayhave limited applicability. We are proposing that laboratories calculate annual data reflecting volumeof cases processed by specimen type, number of cases by diagnosis, errorrates and number of unsatisfactory specimens in order to develop a statisticalapproach to evaluate laboratory performance. Evaluating cytotechnologistcase diagnosis with overall laboratory performance by diagnosis is an approachto determining outlier performance and focusing case reviews and interactionbetween cytotechnologists and technical supervisors to improve slide examinationperformance. We would specify information that must be on the laboratory report to assurethat the individual ordering the cytology exmaination has all of the factsneeded to interpret the results reported. The importance of cytology testingand the significance of the examination results makes it critical for laboratoriesto provide all specimen findings including follow up recommendations, ifindicated. We are increasing our requirements for retention of slides and reportsto assure that laboratories correlate previous diagnosis with current findings.The requirements for histocompatibility testing (andSection;493.277) arethe same as those that already apply to Medicare laboratories but wouldnow also apply to CLIA laboratories. We would update technical requirementsnow in Medicare regulations and include the explicit requirements for whichHLA antigens are to be identified. We would not retain certain frequencychecks for the components of the serum trays found in current regulationsbecause we now believe the requirements are overly burdensome and are nolonger necessary to assure quality. We would also make the requirementsmore explicit with regard to what is required under each section of theregulation. These changes would reflect the current guidelines for thepractice of histocompatibility. We would also consolidate all the requirements for histocompatibility testinginto one section. Previously, the requirements were divided between a sectionon end-stage renal disease and the independent laboratory general qualitycontrol requirements. We would move these to one location in order to clarifythe exact nature of the requirements and to make the requirements morereadily accessible to those seeking requirements for histocompatibilitytesting. We would also make these requirements applicable to other areascurrently mentioned in the regulations, such as liver transplantation andbone marrow transplantation as well as other transplantation areas. Wetherefore propose to move material from andSection;405.2171 and include itin this section. The new section would also provide uniform standards for Medicare and CLIAlaboratories for histocompatibility testing. This requirement would imposeno additional burden on laboratories currently in both programs but wouldprovide consistency in the regulations and requirements since CLIA histocompatibilitytesting laboratories are currently classified in serology and Medicarelaboratories are classified in a separate category for histocompatibility.In new andSection;493.281 we propose to revise the immunohematology requirementsnow in andSection;74.25 to make them consistent with the Medicare requirements.The CLIA requirements were not revised at the time Medicare adopted theFDA standards in 1981. We propose to adopt these same standards for CLIAlaboratories. We would also cross-refer this standard to all of 21 CFRPart 640 to provide total consistency between Medicare and FDA regulationsand to assure that any changes in the FDA regulations are reflected inthe Medicare regulations. We also propose to add a requirement that laboratoriescollecting, processing and transfusing blood and blood products meet therequirements in 21 CFR Part 606 to make the Medicare regulations consistentwith the FDA regulations on this subject. The need to refer to Part 606was inadvertently overlooked during the promulgation of the Medicare regulationsin 1981. The revision would clarify the precise requirements that are expectedof the facilities. We would also add explicit requirements for cytogenetics testing becauseof the importance of this area in testing for genetic defects and the factthat the existing general quality control requirements do not adequatelyaddress this area. In addition, laboratories seeking payment for theseservices have been classified in the anatomic pathology or serology areasunder a less than precise methodology and the anatomic pathology and serologyrequirements are not applicable to cytogenetics testing. The revisionsof the regulations would be based on the standards of the private sectorand New York State, which are the only existing models for quality controlstandards.We propose to add a condition to quality control on blood banking and transfusionservices (andSection; 493.301) to consolidate all the requirements in theregulations relating to the collection, processing, transfusion and storageof blood and blood products in one section of the regulations. Currentlythere are requirements relating to blood collection and storage in boththe quality control sections of the independent laboratory conditions forcoverage and in the hospital conditions of participation. The provisionscontained in andSection; 405.1317(b)(4)(ii) are more appropriate to a sectionon collection and processing than a section on the quality control of thetesting performed in blood banks and transfusion services.The regulations in andSection; 405.1317(b)(4)(ii) were adopted as part ofthe revision of the requirements under the MOU with FDA. However, the establishmentof a new condition on blood banking and transfusion services and the consolidationof these requirements would simplify and clarify the regulations; thosesubject to the provisions of the regulations would be better able to determinethe specific requirements applicable to them.We have reviewed the causes of fatal transfusion reactions since 1976,based on the files of the FDA and HCFA, and have concluded that the facilities'own internal quality assurance programs are an important segment in preventingtransfusion reactions and deaths. Therefore, we would modify the existingregulations that were adopted from 42 CFR 482.27(d) to include the importanceof a quality assurance review. This would also be emphasized in the generalquality assurance standards (Subpart H). It is our intent for the conditionon blood banking and transfusion service to apply to all facilities werethese services are offered. Therefore, we would not retain in andSection;493.303 the hospital-specific language contained in andSection; 482.27(d)and would move the remainder to Subpart F and cross-refer all other applicableregulations to this subpart. Facilities not offering these types of serviceswould not have to comply with these requirements.We also propose to cross-refer the condition on bloodbanking and transfusionservices to all of 21 CFR Part 640 rather than just certain sections, asdoes andSection; 405.1317(b)(4)(ii), since the broader cross-reference would(1) give greater assurance of quality for the bloodbanking activities,(2) reduce the necessity for revising the regulations whenever FDA addsrequirements into these sections and (3) reduce duplicative requirements,policies and procedures between HCFA and FDA.We would also include the reference to 21 CFR Part 606 in this new conditionsince it contains the specific FDA recordkeeping requirements for thisarea. This would reduce the uncertainty of what records must be kept, consolidaterecordkeeping requirements for collection, processing, and transfusioninto the section where they are applicable, and make the survey of thefacility and the citation of specific deficiencies easier for the surveyagency.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart G_Personnel Standards</ITAG>The current Medicare independent laboratory regulations (andSection;andSection;405.1312, 405.1313, 405.1314(b) and 405.1315), and CLIA personnel standards(andSection;andSection; 74.30 through 74.31) contain detailed education andexperience requirements for individuals at the director, technical supervisor,general supervisor, technologist and technician level (CLIA does not havea technician level requirement). The Medicare conditions of participationfor hospitals (42 CFR Part 482) have specific requirements only for thelaboratory director, who has responsibility for determining the qualificationsof the supervisory personnel and the individuals performing the tests atthe bench. These latter regulations provide the director with the maximumflexibility in the selection and utilization of personnel.We believe it important to retain technical supervision qualificationsfor some specialty and subspecialty testing areas currently contained inthe regulations. Therefore, qualifications for individuals providing technicalsupervision of tests in the areas of histopathology, including skin pathology,and oral pathology currently in andSection; 482.27(a)(3)(ii)-(iv) would bemoved to andSection; 493.403, as would be the qualifications for individualssupervising transfusion and blood banking services now found at andSection;482.27(d)(1). In addition, qualifications for individuals providing technicalsupervision in cytology currently in andSection; 405.1314(b)(9) would berepeated at new andSection; 493.403, as are the qualifications for individualsproviding technical supervision in histocompatibility currently in andSection;405.1314(b)(13). In order that new andSection; 493.403 contain all qualificationsnecessary for the range of tests performed, we would also add new requirementsfor those who supervise cytogenetics testing.We note that these requirements are new for hosptial-based laboratories.Therefore, we solicit comments on all of the requirements for technicalsupervision, with specific reference to the need and justification forthem, and whether these provisions would, if they were to be applied tophysician office or small hospital laboratories, prevent the performanceof tests that these laboratories are in fact effectively conducting.We intend to adopt the same personnel requirements in the new Part 493for all laboratories that participate in Medicare or Medicaid or are licensedunder CLIA. The proposed rule contains the provision required by section9339(d) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986 to accept forMedicare purposes individuals that meet State licensure requirements forlaboratory directors. This provision specifies that if a State provideslicensing or other standards with respect to the operation of laboratories(including those in hospitals) in the State and establishes qualificationsunder which an individual may direct a laboratory, title XVIII of the Actmay not be construed as authorizing the Secretary of HHS to require otherqualifications; this provision was effective January 1, 1987. We are developinga proposed revision to the independent laboratory requirements for Medicareapproval, CLIA licensure requirements and hospital-based laboratory rulesto incorporate this provision in a separate document.We would also include a provision to enable individuals who qualify aslaboratory directors under current regulations to continue to qualify assuch.We intend to continue to allow for the recognition of private sector certificationprograms for director level personnel as an alternative mechanism for qualificationas is currently contained in andSection;andSection; 74.30 and 405.1313. Thisprovision reduces the need for the program to evaluate the credentialsof individuals who have already been evaluated by a private sector organizationapproved by HHS and provides recognition for many of the programs in existence.We would revise the current personnel requirements for the following reasons:andbullet; It is necessary to emphasize the responsibility of the directorfor assuring the quality of the services of the laboratory and to allowthe director the maximum flexibility to choose the personnel required toachieve this goal. andbullet; Changes in technology make it difficult to develop detailed specificstandards and revise them as needed to cover the wide variety of instruments,methodology and test systems currently performed and to be performed inthe future in laboratories. andbullet; It is more reliable to depend on outcome measures such as qualitycontrol, proficiency testing and quality assurance programs, rather thandetailed personnel standards, as a mechanism to assure the quality of testing.Although it is generally believed that degreed individuals are better preparedto assume technical responsibilities to assure quality, there is limitedevidence available to correlate the degree level of an individual withthe quality of the test results produced. There have been several studies on the relationship between personnel standardsand quality of testing, including one commissioned by the Office of theAssistant Secretary for Planning and Evaluation of the Office of the Secretaryof the Department of Health and Human Services, but there are no definitivedata to show the nature of the relationship of specific standards to qualityof testing. The studies have been applied to limited areas. Although evidenceexists of some improvements in performance as a function of credentialing,these studies are limited in scope, and they are not all based on the sameassessment techniques. They also do not indicate that inaccurate or medicallyunacceptable results were produced by any particular type of level of individual.Our decision to set standards for the director, supervisor and cytotechnologistis based on the model for the current hospital standards with additionalrequirements for supervisor and cytotechnologist. The hospital laboratorypersonnel requirements have not resulted in any known adverse effects onpatient health and safety in these facilities over the past twenty years.We have heard from some parties that such a model is more relevant in thehospital setting because of the direct oversight by the medical staff.However, the majority of users of laboratory services are physicans and,if the physician is the key to the quality assurance in hospitals, thereis no reason to assume that these same physicans will be less concernedwhen testing is performed in independent laboratories. Supervision of day-to-daytesting is necessary to assure accurate and reliable test results. Sincethe director may not always be present when testing is performed, we wouldadd requirements for laboratory supervision. Moreover, the current cytotechnologistrequirements would be maintained because they are essential in assuringthe quality of cytology test performance and reporting. We would also requireeach cytotechnologist to record the number and types of slides screenedeach day in order to determine compliance with the workload requirementsin andSection;493.271(b). Proposed rules applicable to the personnel levels below the director andsupervisor would provide for maximum flexibility for the director in choosingthe laboratory staff, except for cytology where specified personnel qualificationswould be required to assure the quality of cytology results. The individualsemployed in laboratories would still have to meet State standards, if anyexist. This would place responsibility with the States to set specificcriteria for personnel to meet local needs. The director would have toensure that the personnel have the necessary training, experience, continuingeducation, receive continuous evaluation and monitoring of performancelevels and meet any State licensure requirements. The proposed personnelrequirements would allow the flexibility to utilize the various private-sectorcredentialing programs, State licensure programs and private-sector examinationsas a guide in selecting individuals for employment purposes.In proposed andSection; 493.405 we specify laboratory director responsibilitiesand emphasize the duties required of the laboratory director. The laboratorydirector would have the overall responsibility for the quality of testingperformed by the laboratory and would be responsible for establishing andmaintaining a quality assurance program and establishing performance characteristicsfor the test systems employed by the laboratory. The director would alsobe responsible for providing evidence that the laboratory can maintainthese performance levels: the director would assess factors such as staffperformance, quality control results, proficiency testing results, validationof test procedures and methodologies, and assure that the laboratory correctsall problems before reporting test results. In addition, if errors aredetected after results are reported, the director would be responsiblefor providing the necessary corrected information to the individual requestingor utilizing the test results.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart H_Quality Assurance</ITAG>In new andSection; 493.451 we would add a quality assurance condition forboth the Medicare and CLIA laboratories to require the laboratories toestablish and follow protocols that assess the effectiveness of their operations.The new condition would require the laboratory to establish proceduresfor monitoring the quality of its testing and staff performance and toassure that the laboratory's performance is within established acceptablecriteria. This section would add an additional level of quality controland place the burden on the laboratory to accept responsibility for monitoringits own performance as an adjunct to the checks placed on the facilityby the regulatory agency. The laboratory would utilize its quality controland PT data and regular staff performance evaluations to monitor and assurethe quality of testing and reporting.The responsibility for establishing and implementing a quality assuranceprogram would be placed on the laboratory director; it would serve as anadditional outcome measurement of quality and would assure accurate andreliable test performance and reporting.The director would also have the responsibility for having a program inplace to monitor and control various health and safety hazards from a varietyof biological, chemical, environmental and radiological materials or factors,which may affect testing as well as patient and worker safety. This wouldobviate the need for specifying detailed Federal regulations under Medicareand CLIA such as those now contained in 42 CFR 405.1316, which may notcover all possible contingencies. The new requirement would place responsibilityon the laboratory director for setting up and implementing an appropriateprogram, which would include assuring the compliance with the existingFederal, State, and local laws. This would reduce the need for duplicativestandards and allow the facility to develop programs to meet its own needs.This is not meant to imply a lessening of concern for employee health andsafety, including protection from various hazards, but the provision wouldimplement a more efficient mechanism for monitoring laboratory safety andemployee health.As part of the quality assurance initiative, we would also encourage laboratoriesto enroll in PT programs for analytes other than those included in thecurrent grading scheme. For the subspecialty of cytology, laboratorieswould be able to insert ``blind samples'' into their workload or exchangeslides with another laboratory for retrospective screening and comparison.In addition to soliciting comments on all the proposed revisions we arerequesting comments on alternate mechanisms of quality assurance that canbe used in a Federal regulatory program. We anticipate that these regulationswill provide the flexibility to take into account future changes but weare reviewing and intend to continue to review the need for further changesand improvements in the regulatory system. We solicit specific suggestionsfor changes in quality assurance requirements and data to support thesechanges.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart I_Inspection</ITAG>We propose to add a condition on inspection of the laboratories, andSection;493.501, which specifies the requirements a laboratory must meet for inspectionsand record retention and availability. Provisions concerning inspectionare currently in several different sections of the Medicare and CLIA regulations(42 CFR 405.1317(a)(6), 42 CFR 405.1909, and Part 74, Subpart G) and someof them are obsolete.Under this proposal, we would require the laboratory to demonstrate satisfactoryperformance on quality control and PT before inspection or approval.The proposed andSection; 493.501 would allow us to inspect a laboratory duringany hours of operation or business, would state that HHS has the rightof access to all records required to make a determination of a facility'sstatus and would require that the laboratory make these records availableto us for a reasonable period of time during the course of the inspection.The regulations would extend our authority to require the laboratory totest specimens or undertake quality control actions on patient materialsin the laboratory during the inspection to allow us to determine the competencyof the personnel and ability of the laboratory to perform tests. In additionto the Subpart C requirement for participation in a mailed PT program,we are considering the development of a methodology for evaluating laboratoryperformance through onsite PT to enhance the survey process. In 1990, weplan to select a limited number of States in which a random sampling oflaboratories would be chosen for the State survey agencies to conduct unannouncedonsite PT surveys to evaluate the feasibility of this type of PT.In addition, under the proposed requirements, DHHS would be able to reinspectthe laboratories at such frequencies as are necessary to determine complianceor continued compliance with the regulations. We propose to indicate thatdenial of access could result in revocation or denial of licensure, termination,or denial of initial approval under Medicare.Under this proposal the laboratory would also be required to notify usof changes in ownership, direction, location or services so that we candetermine the status of the laboratory and its ability to provide reliableand accurate test results. These provisions would not add new requirementsbut would serve to clarify and unify the existing Medicare and CLIA requirements.The new andSection; 493.501 would not include a number of the requirementscurrently in andSection; 405.1909. What constitutes a laboratory test (inandSection; 405.1909(a)) would not be retained since it refers to a sectionof our regulations deleted earlier. The provisions relating to specialtiesand subspecialties for licensure and approval that we would retain wouldbe relocated in Subpart F, Quality Control. The content of andSection; 405.1909(b)would be deleted since the date to which it refers has expired. The contentof andSection; 405.1909(c), the requirements for successful participationin proficiency testing, would be revised and moved to Subpart C, Participatioinin Proficiency Testing and Subpart D, Proficiency Testing Program.In addition, the specific requirement in andSection; 405.1909(c) for onsitePT would be revised in Subpart D, Proficiency Testing Programs, to allowus flexibility in determining the mechanism for compliance with PT requirementsafter a failure and the time period in which we would have to revisit thelaboratory. Specifying a specific three-month interval for onsite PT performanceor a six-month interval for evaluation of mailed PT samples does not allowsufficient flexibility. The proposed requirements in Subpart C would clarifythe conditions for successful and unsuccessful performance and this subpartwould specify that HHS may perform whatever follow-up and inspections arerequired to determine a laboratory's compliance with the standards.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart J_CLIA-Only Requirements</ITAG>In Subpart J we would place requirements applicable only to laboratoriesengaged in interstate commerce. For example, the CLIA requirements concerningrecognition of accreditation programs are different from those for Medicarelaboratories due to differences in the two statutes; CLIA allows HHS moreflexibility on the type and scope of information that can be requested.We also propose to make several modifications in the licensure proceduresfor laboratories under CLIA. We would revise the regulations to indicatethat (1) licenses will be issued or revoked by specialty and subspecialtyrather than by individual test procedures in order to achieve uniformitybetween programs, (2) we are placing increased reliance on overall outcomemeasures by restructuring of the regulations, and (3) only certain testsare subject to PT because not all tests are currently included in PT programsand some tests, such as chemical screening in urinalysis, may provide suchconsistent results that continued PT monitoring is not useful.We would also revise the exemption applicable to certain physician officelaboratories that examine specimens on referral so that we would grantexemptions in cases only in which the <T3>total</T3> number of tests performed annually is 100 or fewer ratherthan granting exemptions for each specialty or subspecialty in which 100tests or fewer are performed. This would simplify the accounting systemfor determining if a laboratory requires licensure. We cannot eliminatethe test limit since CLIA requires us to provide a low test volume exemptionmechanism. We propose to specify that HHS may determine that certain categoriesor types of tests pose a hazard to public health and no exemption willbe granted in these cases. This addition to the regulation would be consistentwith the statute and its intent. It will make the Medicare and CLIA regulationsmore congruent on this matter since the Medicare statute does not havea provision for a low volume exemption.We are also proposing to add a provision (andSection; 493.704) that wouldallow us to issue a notice that a license can continue in effect for anotheryear, rather than reissuing the formal license every year. This would meetthe intent of the statute and still permit annual renewal without inordinatepaperwork when no changes in licensure status have occurred.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Other Revisions Affecting Laboratories</ITAG>andbullet; We propose to revise andSection; 405.1909, Special requirementsapplicable to independent laboratories, to delete the current paragraphs(b) through (d), as the comparable content would be in Part 493, and toadd a definition of ``independent laboratory.'' The term ``independentlaboratory'' is still necessary for payment purposes (i.e., Medicare'ssupplementary medical insurance program (Part B), rather than hospitalinsurance program (Part A), pays for independent laboratory services);andSection; 405.1909 discusses independent laboratory services and supplementarymedical insurance. We would define an independent laboratory as a facilitymeeting the requirements of Part 493 that is maintained for the purposeof performing diagnostic laboratory tests. It would be a facility thatis not controlled, managed or supervised by a hospital, a hospital's medicalstaff, or the attending or consulting physician's office. (A physician'soffice performing tests on referral for the attending or consulting physicianwould be considered an independent laboratory.)We would also revise the last sentence in paragraph (a), which currentlyindicates that diagnostic tests performed by an attending or consultingphysician are physician's services rather than clinical laboratory services.Section 1833 (h)(1)(A) and (h)(5)(A) of the Social Security Act, as amendedon July 18, 1984, requires clinical laboratory services furnished by anyperson or entity (other than a provider of services for its inpatients)to be paid for based on a fee schedule. The current rule implies that laboratoryservices are ``physicians' services'', which are not subject to a fee schedule.Because we pay for these laboratory services based on a fee schedule, wepropose to revise the last sentence so that it no longer calls laboratoryservices ``physician services.''andbullet; We would revise the definitions found in current 42 CFR 405.2102,to clarify that histocompatibility testing determines compatibility betweena potential organ donor and recipient and not between a donor organ anda recipient. This would be a minor technical amendment to clarify the intentof the regulations.andbullet; We would also revise current andSection; 405.2171(d), Condition:Minimal service requirements for a renal transplantation center, to cross-referit to the new unified regulations for clinical laboratories, includinghistocompatibility testing for renal transplantation centers. This wouldsimplify the requirements by placing all related requirements in one sectionof the regulation. However, we would leave the requirement concerning 24-houravailability of services (andSection; 405.2171(d)(1)) as it would not applyto other laboratories.andbullet; We would revise current 42 CFR 416.49, Condition for coverage_Laboratoryand radiological services, to require laboratories in ambulatory surgicalcenters to comply with the conditions of coverage of laboratory servicesin new Part 493 if they perform laboratory testing or perform transfusionof blood and blood products.andbullet; Our revisions to andSection; 482.27 (the condition of participationconcerning hospital-based laboratories) would only delete requirementsthat would be in the new part. We intend to retain the requirements currentlyin andSection; 482.27(a) (1) and (2) as they would continue to apply onlyto hospital-based laboratories.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Regulatory Impact Analysis</ITAG>A. Introduction.Executive Order 12291 (E. O. 12291) requires us to prepare and publishan initial regulatory impact analysis for any proposed regulation thatmeets one of the E. O. criteria for a ``major rule''; that is, that wouldbe likely to result in: an annual effect on the economy of $100 millionor more; a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; or, significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.In addition, we generally prepare an initial regulatory flexibility analysisthat is consistent with the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C.601 through 612), unless the Secretary certifies that a proposed regulationwould not have a significant economic impact on a substantial number ofsmall entities. For purposes of the RFA, we treat all hospital-based andindependent laboratories as small entities. For purposes of this regulation,physician laboratories that perform any tests on referral from other physiciansalso are small entities. Individuals and states are not included in thedefinition of a small entity.In addition, Section 1102(b) of the Act requires the Secretary to preparea regulatory impact analysis for any proposed rule that may have a significantimpact on the operations of a substantial number of small rural hospitals.Such an analysis must conform to the provisions of section 603 of the RFA.For purposes of Section 1102(b) of the Act, we define a small rural hospitalas a hospital with fewer than 50 beds located outside a metropolitan statisticalarea.We do not believe that the provisions of this regulation constitute a majorrule. However, because we expect that this regulation could have a significantimpact on some laboratories, may affect some personnel employed by laboratories,and may have an effect on some States regarding State requirements, licensureand certification of laboratories, we have performed the following analysisvoluntarily.B. Anticipated Effects<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Affected Entities</ITAG>There are approximately 12,000 Federally regulated laboratories locatedin hospitals and independent settings. These facilities range from largemedical centers and corporate-operated independent laboratories to small,independent laboratories and physician's office laboratories.Although not small entities, we expect States to be affected by some additionaladministrative burden because they may have to adapt or establish a methodologyfor assessment of PT requirements and ensure compliance with these requirements.States may have to make more recommendations for termination of Medicareapproval if the PT standards are not met.We expect entities providing PT programs to be affected because of programchanges that may be necessary in order to meet the criteria for an approvedPT program and additional documentation required to perform in the Federalprogram. It is estimated that there may be more than 40,000 physician officelaboratories that perform more than 5,000 tests annually and that willbe subject to Federal standards under current law beginning in 1990. Wehave not attempted to estimate the effects of the standards in this proposalon physician office laboratories that do not perform referral tests. However,the possibility exists that cetain of these standards may also be foundto be applicable to physician office testing. Therefore, we are solicitingcomments on the effect on physician office testing of the proposed proficiencytesting, quality control, and personnel requirements were these requirementsto be applied to physician office laboratories. If there is substantialevidence that any of the standards contained in this proposed rule wouldso affect the availability of physician office testing that patient carewould be adversely affected, that evidence would be appropriate in thecontext of this rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Costs/Savings</ITAG>We expect our standards to be achievable by the majority of laboratoriesalthough some may have to incur costs to achieve the required compliancewith PT standards. Depending upon the actual costs in upgrading a specificlab to meet PT standards, the charges of that laboratory for its servicesmay rise to offset the costs of improvements. However, we believe thatin an area with sufficient competition, including that from physicians'office laboratories, the charges for services will remain stable. Therefore,since charge increases are unlikely, we assume that laboratories will seekto minimize cost increases through increased efficiencies. The regulationprovides increased flexibility over existing regulations to permit differentapproaches to achieving efficiencies.This proposed regulation would expand Medicare coverage from physicianoffice laboratories receiving 100 or more referrals to those laboratoriesreceiving any referrals. This change may create a slight increase in thenumber of laboratories requiring Medicare approval.We expect that some physician office laboratories would seek Medicare approvaland thus comply with Medicare requirements to be reimbursed for tests.We also expect that those physician office laboratories that may incura substantial increase in costs to upgrade to elect to stop doing testson referral.There may also be additional increases in the purchases of automated laboratoryequipment and computers when laboratory managers make decisions regardingthe methodology of achieving the PT standards.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Proficiency testing effects</ITAG>This regulation establishes consistent PT requirements based on data fromprofessional organizations that operate PT programs. We would require specificminimum PT passing scores for each specialty and subspecialty. Currently,passing levels for PT are set by each State and the levels vary. We expectthe PT standards to enable us to identify and take consistent action againstMedicare and CLIA laboratories whose PT performances are below the rangeof acceptability achieved by the vast majority of laboratories. A laboratory'spoor PT performance would result in a denial of Medicare or Medicaid paymentfor a failed specialty or subspecialty of testing or in loss of CLIA licensure.Even though we lack definitive data, we do not expect this regulation toaffect most laboratories adversely because most laboratories already havein place PT mechanisms, both for their own benefit and because Medicarerequires it. However, laboratories in States with less rigorous proficiencytesting program standards than we would require would be the most likelyto be adversely affected. We also expect the number of tests for whichpayment is denied by the Medicare and Medicaid programs for payment purposesto increase for those laboratories that do not improve to our designatedperformance level.Some laboratories may incur greater costs to achieve the required PT standardsthan others because of the costs that would be incurred to improve theirquality control activities and quality assurance programs.If a laboratory's PT performance is determined to be unsuccessful, paymentwould not be made for tests in the failed specialty or subspecialty. Weexpect the number of laboratories not receiving payment to increase. However,we also expect the quality of laboratory services to improve as a resultof implementation of these standards.At present, Medicare and CLIA laboratories are not required to participatein PT programs for cytology, because no such program has been established.This regulation would establish a nationwide cytology proficiency testingprogram. We are proposing certain limits and specifications concerningthe developing cytology program. This may mean additional expense for somelaboratories that have to participate in a cytology PT program for thefirst time or incur additional costs in order to perform successfully inthe cytology PT program.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Quality Control   </ITAG>This proposed regulation includes an update of quality control requirementsto account for changes in technology and instrumentation that have occurredin the laboratory field since 1971. Laboratories would be required to implementtheir own quality assurance programs that they would be expected to follow.As a result of this regulation, laboratory directors should have more flexibilityin meeting the requirements and more opportunities to assess laboratoryperformance and staff competency.   We expect this regulation to improve laboratory testing in terms of thequality of the end result or outcome while removing many of the processrequirements that current regulations specify to achieve that outcome.The laboratory would have more discretion over what type of internal controls,methodology, and equipment (such as computerized rather than manual equipment)are necessary to ensure that the required quality control standards aremet.   <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Personnel Standards   </ITAG>Our proposed regulations would place less emphasis on formal credentialingfor laboratory personnel and focus on the responsibilities of the laboratorypersonnel. As a result, the administrative burden on the States to documentand maintain more detailed personnel records to meet Federal requirementswould be reduced. These regulations would require laboratory directorsto be responsible for ensuring that the laboratory staff is competent toperform tests. We would specify education and experience requirements forthe laboratory director, technical supervision, laboratory supervisor andcytotechnologists. The qualifications of the remainder of the staff areto be determined by the laboratory director and individual State requirements.  <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Conclusion   </ITAG>We believe that these changes would result in clearer, more uniformly appliedcriteria for determining acceptability of laboratory performance. We expectsome laboratories to incur costs to upgrade their performance. We expectthese costs to be somewhat offset by savings from removel of detailed processrequirements. Overall benefits, in terms of consistent laboratory requirementsand improved quality would increase benefits to patients and would morethan offset the costs of upgrading and improvements.   We conclude, based on the analysis above, that the proposed rule is nota major rule under Executive Order 12291. Although some laboratories wouldbe adversely effected, we believe that benefits to society will outweighthe adverse effects. We expect most laboratories not to incur substantialcosts to comply with our conditions. The Secretary certifies that thisproposed regulation would not have a significant impact on the operationsof a substantial number of small rural hospitals.   <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Paperwork Reduction Act   </ITAG>Sections 493.21, 493.93, 493.99, 493.101, 493.103, 493.105, 493.201, 493.225,493.231, 493.233, 493.235, 493.237, 493.240, 493.241, 493.271, 493.273,493.277, 493.279, 493.315, 493.417, 493.451, 493.501, 493.701, 493.704,493.708, and 493.710 of this proposed rule contain information collectionrequirements that are subject to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)approval under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3504, etseq.).   Organizations and individuals desiring to submit comments on the informationcollection requirements should direct them to the agency official whosename appears in the <T2>ADDRESS </T2>section of the preamble.   Section 405.1317 of the current regulations, as recodified into andSection;andSection;493.229,493.251 and 493.253 of the proposed rule, also contains information collectionrequirements that are subject to the OMB review. These requirements wereapproved by that Office in August of 1987 in accordance with the PaperworkReduction Act under OMB approval number 0938-0368.   <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Response to Comments   </ITAG>Because of the large number of items of correspondence we normally receiveon rules requesting public comment, we are not able to acknowledge or respondto them individually. A summary of comments and our responses will be includedin our final rule.   <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. List of Subjects   </ITAG><T3>42 CFR Part 74   </T3>Administrative practice and procedure, health, laboratories, reportingand recordkeeping requirements.   <T3>42 CFR Part 405   </T3>Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays.  42 CFR Part 416   Health facilities, Health professions, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.  <T3>42 CFR Part 440 </T3>Grant programs-health, Medicaid. <T3>42 CFR Part 482   </T3>Hospitals, Medicaid, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.  <T3>42 CFR Part 488   </T3>Health facilities, Survey and certification, Forms and guidelines.   <T3>42 CFR Part 493   </T3>Laboratories, Medicare, Medicaid, Health facilities, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Derivation Table for </T4>42 <T4>CFR Part </T4>493<H1>New section</H1><H1>Old section</H1>   <ITAG tagnum="1">493.1<D>74.2, 405.1310(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.2<D>74.1, 405.1310.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.11<D>405.1311.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.21<D>Part 74, Subpart E; 405.1314(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.22<D>74.42, 405.1314(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.23<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.24<D>405.1909.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.25<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.31-493.63<D>74.42.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.91<D>405.1310(c).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.93-493.153<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.201<D>74.20, 74.53, 74.54, 405.1316(e), (f) and (g), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.221<D>74.20, 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.223<D>74.20(b), 74.55, 405.1316(b), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.225<D>74.20(b), 405,1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.227<D>74.20(b), 405.1316(b), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.229<D>74.20(c), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.231<D>74.20(d), 74.25, 74.27, 405.1316(a), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.233<D>74.20(a), 74.55, 405.1317(a) and (b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.235<D>74.20(a), 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.237<D>74.21, 74.22, 74.23, 74.25, 74.27, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.239<D>74.20(a), 74.23(a), 405.1317(a) and (b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.240<D>74.50, 405.1317(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.241<D>74.21, 74.22, 74.23, 74.24, 74.25, 74.26, 74.27, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.243<D>74.21, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.245<D>74.21(a), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.247<D>74.21, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.249<D>74.21(a), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.251<D>74.21(b), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.253<D>74.21(c), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.255<D>74.22, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.257<D>74.22, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.259<D>74.22, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.261<D>74.23, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.263<D>74.23, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.265<D>74.23, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.267<D>74.23, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.269<D>74.25, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.270<D>74.26, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.271<D>74.26(a), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.273<D>74.26(b), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.274<D>74.26(b), 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.275<D>74.27, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.277<D> 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.279<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.281<D>74.24, 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.301-493.315<D>482.27(d).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.401<D>74.30, 74.31, 405.1312, 482.27(c).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.403<D>74.30, 405.1312(b), 482.27(c), 405.1314(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.405<D>74.30, 405.1312(a), 482.27(c).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.407<D>74.30, 405.1313(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.409<D>74.30, 405.1313(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.411<D> 405.1313(a).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.413<D> 405.1317(b).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.415<D> 405.1317(c).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.417<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.419<D>482.27(c).   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.451<D>New.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.501<D>74.56.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.701<D>74.2.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.702<D>74.1.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.704<D>74.10, 74.11.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.706<D>74.60, 74.61.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.708<D>74.47.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">493.710<D>74.46(c).</D></ITAG></ITAG>  Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations would be amended, as set forthbelow:I. Chapter I is amended by removing Part 74 and reserving it as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 74_[RESERVED]</ITAG>II. Chapter IV is amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 405_[AMENDED]</ITAG>A. Part 405 is amended as follows:1. Subpart E is amended as follows:a. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1,814(b), 1832, 1833(a), 1842 (b) and (h),1861 (b) and (v), 1862(a)(14), 1866(a), 1871, 1881, 1886, 1887, and 1889of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f(b) 1395k,1395l(a), 1395u (b) and (h), 1395x (b) and (v), 1395y(a)(14), 1395cc(a),1395hh, 1395rr, 1395ww, 1395xx, and 1395zz).</ITAG>b. Paragraph (c) of andSection; 405.556 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.556</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions for payment of charges: Physician laboratory charges.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Independent laboratory services furnished to hospital inpatients.</T3>Laboratory services furnished to a hospital inpatient by an independentlaboratory (as defined in andSection; 405.1909(b) will be reimbursed on areasonable charge basis under this subpart only if they are physician laboratoryservices as described in paragraph (a) of this section. Payment for nonphysicianservices furnished to a hospital inpatient by an independent laboratorywill be made by the intermediary to the hospital in accordance with Part413 of this chapter.2. Subpart K is amended as follows:a. The authority citation continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1814, 1832, 1833, 1861, 1863, 1865, 1866,1871 of the Social Security Act; 42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f, 1395k, 1395l, 1395x,1395z, 1395bb, 1395cc, 1395hh.</ITAG>b. Section 405.1128 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.1128</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition of participation_laboratory and radiologic services.</ITAG>The skilled nursing facility has provision for promptly obtaining requiredlaboratory, X-ray, and other diagnostic services.(a) <T3>Standard: Provision for services.</T3>(1) If the skilled nursing facility furnishes its own x-ray services, itmust meet the applicable conditions established for certification of hospitalsin andSection; 482.26 of this chapter. If the facility does not provide x-rayservices, it makes arrangements to obtain these services from a physician'soffice, a participating hospital or skilled nursing facility, or a portablex-ray supplier.(2) If the skilled nursing facility furnishes its own laboratory services,it must meet the applicable conditions established for certification ofhospitals and for approval of laboratories found in andSection;andSection;482.27and Part 493 of this chapter respectively. If the facility does not providelaboratory services, it makes arrangements to obtain these services froma participating hospital or skilled nursing facility, or a laboratory meetingthe requirements of Part 493 of this chapter.(3) All x-ray and laboratory services are provided only on the orders ofthe attending physician, who is notified promptly of the findings. Thefacility assists the patient, if necessary, in arranging for transportationto and from the source of service. Signed and dated reports of a clinicallaboratory, X-ray, and other diagnostic services are filed with the patient'smedical record. (b) <T3>Standard: Blood and blood products.</T3> Blood handling and storagefacilities are safe, adequate, and properly supervised. If the facilityprovides for maintaining and transfusing blood and blood products, it meetsthe conditions established in andSection;andSection; 493.301 through 493.315of this chapter. If the facility does not provide its own facilities butdoes provide transfusion services alone, it meets at least the requirementsof andSection;andSection; 493.305, 493.307, 493.309 and 493.315 of this chapter.3-4. Subpart M (andSection;andSection; 405.1310-405.1317) is removed and reservedand the table of contents is amended to reflect this change. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart M [andSection;andSection; 405.1310-405.1317]_[Reserved] </ITAG>5. Subpart U is amended as follows: a. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1861, 1862(a), 1871, 1874, and 1881 ofthe Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395x, 1395y(a), 1395hh, 1395kk,and 1395rr).</ITAG>b. The definition of histocompatibility testing in andSection; 405.2102 isrevised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.2102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Histocompatibility testing.</T3> Laboratory test procedures which determinecompatibility between a potential organ donor and a potential organ transplantrecipient. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>c. Paragraph (d) of andSection; 405.2171 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.2171 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Minimal services requirements for a renal transplantationcenter. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Standard: laboratory services.</T3> (1) The Renal Transplantation Centermakes available, directly or under arrangements, laboratory services tomeet the needs of ESRD patients. Laboratory services are performed in alaboratory facility approved in accordance with Part 493 of this chapterto participate in the Medicare program and, for histocompatibility testingpurposes, also meets andSection;andSection; 493.221 through 493.239, 493.257,493.259, 493.277, and 493.281 of this chapter and, when services are furnishedin the subspecialty of histopathology, andSection; 493.273 of this chapter.(2) Laboratory services for cross-matching of recipient serum and donorlymphocytes for preformed antibodies by an acceptable technique are availableon a 24-hour emergency basis. B. Part 416 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 416_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1832(a)(2), 1833, 1863 and 1864 of theSocial Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395k(a)(2), 1395l, 1395z and 1395aa).</ITAG>2. Section 416.49 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 416.49</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition for coverage_Laboratory and radiologic services. </ITAG>The ASC must have procedures for obtaining routine and emergency laboratoryand radiologic services, from Medicare approved facilities, to meet theneeds of patients. The laboratory offering the services must have beenapproved in accordance with Part 493 of this chapter, except for urinalyses,hemoglobins and hematocrits performed within a few days before, or on,the day of the surgery. C. Part 440 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 440_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 1302.</ITAG>2. Section 440.30 is amended by republishing the introductory text andrevising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 440.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other laboratory and X-ray services. </ITAG>``Other laboratory and X-ray services'' means professional and technicallaboratory and radiological services_ (a) Ordered and provided by or under the direction of a physician or otherlicensed practitioner of the healing arts within the scope of his practiceas defined by State law or ordered and billed by a physician but providedby an independent laboratory as defined in andSection; 405.1909(b) of thischapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>D. Part 482 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 482_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1814(a)(6), 1861 (e), (f), (k), (r), (v)(1)(G),and (z), 1864, 1871, 1883, 1886, 1902(a)(30), and 1905(a) of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f(a)(6), 1395x (e), (f), (k), (r), (v)(1)(G),and (z), 1395aa, 1395hh, 1395tt, 1395ww, 1396a(a)(30), and 1396d(a)).</ITAG>2. Section 482.27 is revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 482.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition of participation: Laboratory services. </ITAG>(a) The hospital must maintain, or have available, adequate laboratoryservices to meet the needs of its patients. The hospital must ensure thatall laboratory services provided to its patients are performed in a facilityapproved by Medicare in accordance with Part 493 of this chapter. (b) <T3>Standard: Adequacy of laboratory services. </T3>The hospital must havelaboratory services available, either directly or through a contractualagreement with a Medicare approved hospital or independent laboratory,that meet the needs of the patients and the medical staff. (1) Emergency laboratory services must be available 24 hours a day. (2) A written description of services provided must be available to themedical staff. (3) The laboratory must make provision for proper receipt and reportingof tissue specimens. (4) The medical staff and a pathologist must determine which tissue specimensrequire a macroscopic (gross) examination and which require both macroscopicand microscopic examinations.E. Part 483 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 483_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1905 (c) and (d) of the Social SecurityAct (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1396d (c) and (d)).</ITAG>2. Section 483.460(n) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 483.460</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions of participation: Health care services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(n) <T3>Standard: Laboratory services. </T3>(1) For purposes of this section,``laboratory'' means an entity for the microbiological, serological, chemical,hematological, radiobioassay, cytological, immunohematological, pathologicalor other examination of materials derived from the human body, for thepurpose of providing information for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatmentof any disease or assessment of a medical condition. (2) If a facility chooses to provide laboratory services, the laboratorymust_ (i) Meet the management requirements specified in Part 493 of this chapter;and (ii) Provide personnel to direct and conduct the laboratory services. (A) The laboratory director must be technically qualified to supervisethe laboratory personnel and test performance and must meet licensing orother qualification standards established by the State with respect todirectors of clinical laboratories. For those States that do not have licensureor qualification requirements pertaining to directors of clinical laboratories,the director must be either_ (1) A pathologist or other doctor of medicine or osteopathy with trainingand experience in clinical laboratory services; or (2) A laboratory specialist with a doctoral degree in physical, chemicalor biological sciences, and training and experience in clinical laboratoryservices. (B) The laboratory director must provide adequate technical supervisionof the laboratory services and assure that tests, examinations and proceduresare properly performed, recorded and reported. (C) The laboratory director must ensure that the staff_ (1) Has appropriate education, experience, and training to perform andreport laboratory tests promptly and proficiently; (2) Is sufficient in number for the scope and complexity of the servicesprovided; and (3) Receives in-service training appropriate to the type and complexityof the laboratory services offered. (D) The laboratory technologists must be technically competent to performtest procedures and report test results promptly and proficiently. (3) The laboratory must meet the proficiency testing requirements specifiedin Part 493 of this chapter. (4) The laboratory must meet the quality control requirements specifiedin Part 493 of this chapter. (5) If the laboratory chooses to refer specimens for testing to anotherlaboratory, the referral laboratory must be approved by the Medicare programeither as a hospital or an independent laboratory. F. Part 488 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 488_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1102, 1814, 1861, 1865, 1866, 1871, 1880, 1881,and 1883 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f, 1395x, 1395bb,1395cc, 1395hh, 1395qq, 1395rr, and 1395tt).</ITAG>2. Section 488.52 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 488.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special requirements applicable to independent laboratories. </ITAG>(a) The services of a qualified independent laboratory for which reimbursementmay be made under the supplementary medical insurance program relate onlyto diagnostic tests performed in an independent laboratory. Diagnosticlaboratory tests for purposes of section 1861(s) (13) and (14) of the Actand for purposes of this Subpart S shall include only those clinical andanatomical pathology diagnostic tests and procedures listed in andSection;493.2 of this chapter under ``laboratory''. Such diagnostic tests performedby out-of-hospital physicians whose primary practice is directly attendingpatients and/or consultation (i.e., furnishing an attending physician withan opinion about a patient's condition or diagnosis), even though conductedpartly through diagnostic procedures, are not considered services of anindendent laboratory except when they are done on referral. (b) For purposes of this section, an independent laboratory is a facilitymeeting the requirements of Part 493 of this chapter and maintained forthe purpose of performing diagnostic laboratory tests. An independent laboratoryis not a facility that is controlled, managed or supervised by a hospitalas defined by section 1861(e) of the Act, a hospital's organized medicalstaff, or the attending or consulting physician's office.G. A new Part 493 is added as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 493_LABORATORY REQUIREMENTS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.1 Basis and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.2 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.11 Condition: Compliance with Federal, State and local laws. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Participation in Proficiency Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.21 Condition: Enrollment and testing of samples. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.22 Condition: Successful participation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.23 Condition: Successful participation before initial approvalor licensure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.24 Reinstatement after failure to participate successfully. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.25 Condition: Enhanced proficiency testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Proficiency Testing by Specialty and Subspecialty </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.31 Condition: Microbiology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.33 Standard; Bacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.35 Standard; Mycobacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.37 Standard; Mycology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.39 Standard; Parasitology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.43 Condition: Diagnostic immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.45 Standard; Syphilis serology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.47 Standard; General immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.49 Condition: Chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.51 Standard; Routine chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.53 Standard; Endocrinology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.55 Standard; Toxicology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.57 Condition: Hematology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.59 Condition: Pathology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.61 Standard; Cytology: Gynecological examinations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.63 Condition: Immunohematology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Proficiency Testing Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.91 Approval of proficiency testing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.93 Administrative responsibilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.95 Disapproved proficiency testing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.96 Process for updating proficiency testing program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Proficiency Testing Programs by Specialty and Subspecialty </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.97 Microbiology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.99 Bacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.101 Mycobacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.103 Mycology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.105 Parasitology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.107 Diagnostic immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.109 Syphilis serology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.111 General immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.115 Chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.117 Routine chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.119 Endocrinology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.121 Toxicology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.125 Hematology (including routine hematology and coagulation).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.129 Cytology: Gynecological examinations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.153 Immunohematology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Patient Test Management </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.201 Condition: Patient test management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Quality Control </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.221 Condition: General quality control. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.223 Standard; Facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.225 Standard; Adequacy of methods and equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.227 Standard; Temperature and humidity monitoring. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.229 Standard; Labeling of testing supplies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.231 Standard; Procedure manual. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.233 Standard; Equipment, maintenance, and function checks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.235 Standard; Validation of methods. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.237 Standard; Frequency of quality control. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.239 Standard; Remedial actions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.240 Standard; Quality control_records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.241 Condition: Quality control_specialties and subspecialties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.243 Condition: Microbiology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.245 Standard; Bacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.247 Standard; Mycobacteriology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.249 Standard; Mycology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.251 Standard; Parasitology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.253 Standard; Virology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.255 Condition: Diagnostic immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.257 Standard; Syphilis serology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.259 Standard; General immunology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.261 Condition: Chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.263 Standard; Routine chemistry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.265 Standard; Endocrinology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.267 Standard; Toxicology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.269 Condition: Hematology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.270 Condition: Pathology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.271 Standard; Cytology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.273 Standard; Histopathology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.274 Standard; Oral pathology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.275 Condition: Radiobioassay. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.277 Condition: Histocompatibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.279 Condition: Medical cytogenetics. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.281 Condition: Immunohematology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.301 Condition: Transfusion services and bloodbanking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.303 Standard; Immunohematological testing, processing, storageand transmission of blood and blood products. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.305 Standard; Facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.307 Standard; Arrangement for services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.309 Standard; Provision of testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.311 Standard; Storage facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.313 Standard; Retention of transfused blood. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.315 Standard; Investigation of transfusion reactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Personnel </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.401 Condition: Laboratory director. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.403 Standard; Laboratory director qualifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.405 Standard; Laboratory director responsibilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.407 Condition: Laboratory supervision. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.409 Standard; Laboratory supervisor qualifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.411 Standard; Laboratory supervisor duties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.413 Condition: Personnel performing cytology services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.415 Standard; Cytotechnologist qualifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.417 Standard; Cytotechnologist duties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.419 Condition: Technical personnel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Quality Assurance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.451 Condition: Quality Assurance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Inspection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.501 Condition: Inspection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart J_CLIA Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.701 Basis and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.702 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.704 Licensure application and issuance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.706 Revocation and suspension of licenses and letters of exemption;notice. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.708 Approval of accreditation and State licensure programs; notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">493.710 Letter of exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A_Laboratory Director Qualification Requirements Before [EffectiveDate of Regulations]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix B_Technologist Requirements Before July 1, 1971. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix C_Cytotechnologist Requirements Before [Effective Date ofRegulations].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1861(e), the sentence following 1861(s)(11),1861(s)(12) and 1861(s)(13) of the Social Security Act and sec. 353 ofthe Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 263a, 1302, the sentence followingsec. 1395 x(s)(11), and secs. 1395x(s)(12) and (13).) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis and scope. </ITAG>This part set forth the conditions that laboratories must meet in orderfor their tests to be approved for coverage under the Medicare and Medicaidprograms and in order for laboratories to be licensed to perform testingon specimens received in interstate commerce. It implements sections 1861(e)and (j), the sentence following section 1861(s)(11), sections 1861(s)(12)and (13), and 1902 of the Social Security Act, and section 353 of the PublicHealth Service Act. This part applies to: laboratories located in physicians'offices (including group medical practices) that perform any tests on referredspecimens; hospitals meeting at least the requirements specified in section1861(e) of the Act to qualify for emergency hospital services under section1814 of the Act; skilled nursing facilities; intermediate care facilitiesfor the mentally retarded; rural health clinics that perform tests on referral;ambulatory surgical centers except as provided in andSection; 416.49 of thischapter; end-stage renal disease facilities except as provided in andSection;405.2163 of this chapter; and independent laboratories, as defined in andSection;405.1909 of this chapter. It does not apply to laboratories operated bya rural health clinic or physician's office exclusively for its own patients.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this part_ ``Accredited laboratory'' means a laboratory (including a laboratory ina hospital) accredited by, with respect to hospitals, the Joint Commissionon the Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations or the American OsteopathicAssociation and, with respect to interstate licensed laboratories, theCommission on Laboratory Accreditation of the College of American Pathologists,or any other national accreditation organization that has been approvedby HHS as provided in section 353 of the Public Health Service Act. ``Authorized person'' means a person authorized under section 1861(r) ofthe Act to order and to receive test results. With respect to tests performedon individuals not receiving or seeking Medicare reimbursement, an authorizedperson is an individual not excluded under State law or by Medicaid. ``Challenge'' means, for quantitative tests, an assessment of the amountof substance or analyte present in a sample. For qualitative tests, a challengemeans the determination of the presence or the absence of an analyte, organism,or substance in a sample. ``CLIA'' means the Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967 (Section353 of the Public Health Service Act). ``Laboratory'' means a facility for the microbiological, serological, chemical,hematological, cytological, histological, pathological, immunohematological,radiobioassay, cytogenetical, toxicological, histocompatibility or otherexamination of materials derived from the human body for the purpose ofproviding information for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of anydisease or impairment, or the assessment of the health, of human beings.These examinations also include screening procedures to determine the presenceor absence of various substances and organisms in the body. Facilitiesonly collecting specimens or only serving as a mailing service and notperforming testing are not considered laboratories. ``Referee laboratory'' means a laboratory that has had a record of accurateperformance for at least one year in a specific test specialty or subspecialtyand has been designated by HHS as a referee laboratory for that specialtyor subspecialty. ``Sample'' means the material contained in a vial, a slide, or other unitthat contains material to be tested by proficiency testing program participants.When possible, samples are of human origin. ``Target value'' means either the mean of all responses after removal ofoutliers (those responses greater than 3 standard deviations from the originalmean) or the mean established by groups of 20 or more participants thatuse the same methodology (to be used only when the method bias resultsin a skewed distribution of responses). If the method group is less than20 participants, ``target value'' means the overall mean after outlierremoval (as defined above) unless acceptable scientific reasons are availableto indicate that such an evaluation is not appropriate. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition_Compliance with Federal, State and local laws. </ITAG>The laboratory must be in compliance with all applicable Federal, Stateand local laws. (a) <T3>Standard; Federal laws.</T3> The laboratory must be in compliance withapplicable Federal laws related to the health and safety of individualswhose specimens are submitted to it for testing. (b) <T3>Standard; State licensure.</T3> The laboratory must be (1) licensedif State or applicable local law requires licensure; or (2) approved asmeeting standards for licensing established by the agency of the Stateor locality responsible for licensing laboratories. (c) <T3>Standard; licensed staff.</T3> All personnel, including those individualswho collect specimens, must be licensed or meet other applicable standardsthat are required by State and local laws. (d) <T3>Standard; fire safety.</T3> The laboratory must comply with State andlocal laws related to fire safety. (e) <T3>Standard; environment and health.</T3> The laboratory must comply withFederal, State and local laws relating to the storage, handling and disposalof chemical, biological and radioactive materials. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Participation of Proficiency Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Enrollment and testing of samples.</ITAG>A laboratory must enroll in a proficiency testing program that meets thecriteria in Subpart D of this part and is approved by HHS. The laboratorymust enroll in such a program for each of the specialities and subspecialtiesfor which it seeks or have approval for Medicare or Medicaid participationor for licensure under CLIA. The laboratory must test the samples in aroutine manner.<T3>(a) Standard; Enrollment. </T3>The laboratory must notify HHS of theapproved program or programs in which it chooses to participate to meetproficiency testing requirements of this subpart. The laboratory must_(1) Designate the program to be used for each specialty and subspecialtyto determine compliance with this subpart if the laboratory participatesin more than one proficiency testing program approved by HHS;(2) For each speciality and subspecialty, participate in one approved proficiencytesting program for four quarters before designating a different programand notify HHS before any change in designation; and (3) Authorize the proficiency testing program to release to HHS all datarequired by HHS to determine the laboratory's compliance with this subpart.<T3>(b) Standard; Testing of proficiency tesing samples. </T3>The laboratorymust examine or test, as applicable, the proficiency testing samples itreceives from the proficiency testing program in the same manner as ittests patient specimens.(1) The samples must be examined or tested with the laboratory's regularpatient workload by personnel who routinely perform the testing in thelaboratory, using the laboratory's routine methods.(2) The laboratory may not test the samples in duplicate unless it routinelytests patient samples in duplicate.(3) The laboratory may not send the samples or portions of samples to anotherlaboratory for analysis.(4) The laboratory must document the handling, processing, examination,testing and reporting of results for all proficiency testing samples andthe records must be maintained for a minimum of two years from the dateof the proficiency testing shipment or testing event.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Successful participation.</ITAG>(a) Each laboratory must successfully participate in a proficiency testingprogram approved by HHS as described in Subpart D of this part for eachspecialty and subspecialty in which the laboratory seeks Medicare approvalor licensure under CLIA.(b) If the laboratory fails to participate successfully in proficiencytesting for a given specialty or subspecialty, the laboratory's Medicareapproval or licensure under CLIA, or both, will be terminated for the specialtyor subspecialty unless the laboratory enrolls within 15 days of notificationof unsuccessful speciality or subspecialty performance and successfullyparticipates in an approved enhanced proficiency testing program as describedin andSection; 493.25.(c) If the laboratory fails to perform satisfactorily for the challengeson a given analyte or test procedure, the laboratory performance for thespecialty or subspecialty in which the analyte is categorized is consideredunsuccessful. The laboratory's Medicare-approval or licensure under CLIA,or both, for the specialty or subspecialty will be terminated unless thelaboratory enrolls within 15 days of notification of unsatisfactory analyteperformance and satisfactorily performs in an approved enhanced proficiencytesting program as described in andSection; 493.25 for the failed analyte.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Successful participation before initial approval or licensure.</ITAG>Laboratories must successfully participate for three consecutive proficiencytesting shipments for each specialty and subspecialty before initial Medicareor Medicaid approval or CLIA, licensure of the specialty or subspecialty.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reinstatement after failure to participate successfully.</ITAG>(a) If a laboratory fails to participate successfully in one or more specialtiesor subspecialties, and does not request enrollment in the enhanced proficiencytesting program described in andSection; 493.25 of this subpart or voluntarilywithdraws its participation from Medicare or Medicaid or its licensureunder CLIA (or any applicable combination of the three) for the failedspecialty or subspecialty, the laboratory's participation or licensurefor the applicable specialty or subspecialty will be terminated. The laboratorymust then demonstrate sustained successful performance on three consecutiveenhanced proficiency testing shipments or onsite testing events (or combinationthereof) in a period of no less than six months before HHS will considerit for reinstatement in the specialty or subspecialty.(b) If the laboratory enrolls in and fails to participate successfullyin the enhanced proficiency tesing program for the failed specialty orsubspecialty, the laboratory's Medicare approval or licensure under CLIA,or both, for the applicable specialty or subspecialty will be terminated.The laboratory must then demonstrate sustained successful performance inthree consecutive enhanced proficiency testing shipments or testing events(or combination thereof) before HHS will consider it for reinstatementin that specialty or subspecialty.(c) The termination period for Medicare participation or period for revocationof licensure under CLIA for the failed specialty or subspecialty is fora period of not less than six months from the date of termination or revocation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Enhanced proficiency testing.</ITAG>Each laboratory that fails proficiency testing in a specialty, subspecialty(except cytology) or analyte must successfully participate in an enhancedproficiency testing program for three consecutive shipments or onsite testingevents (or combination). (These shipments or testing events may be providedquarterly or more frequently.) Enhanced proficiency testing consists ofsix specimens per shipment or testing event for the subspecialties includedwithin the specialties of diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology,and immunohematology and consists of twelve specimens per shipment forbacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology and parasitology. (Because cytologyhas its own remedial program, there is no enhanced proficiency testingfor it. See andSection; 493.61 of this subpart.) The enhanced proficiencytesting shipment or testing event consists of challenges for the overallspecialty or subspecialty when the failure in proficiency testing is fora specialty or subspecialty or consists of analyte challenges when individualanalyte(s) are failed in proficiency testing. The samples must be testedas in andSection; 493.21(b).(a) To participate successfully in enhanced proficiency testing, the laboratory_(1) Must perform successfully on each shipment or testing event of enhancedproficiency testing by achieving an overall shipment score of at least80% on each of the three shipments or testing events when unsuccessfulproficiency testing performance is in a specialty or subspecialty; and(2) Must perform satisfactorily on each shipment or testing event of enhancedproficiency testing by achieving correct responses on five of six specimensfor the first shipment or testing event; ten of 12 specimens for the firstand second shipments or testing events (or combination) and 15 of 18 specimensfor all three shipments or testing events (or combination) of the failedanalyte when unsatisfactory proficiency testing performance is for anyanalyte.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return enhanced proficiency testing results to the proficiencytesting program in the timeframes specified by the program results in ascore of 0 for the survey.(d) Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance and the criteriafor acceptable analyte performance in the enhanced proficiency testingprogram for each specialty, subspecialty and analyte is the same as thatdescribed in Subpart D for the proficiency testing program.(e) Following three shipments or testing events (or combination) of enhancedproficiency testing in which the laboratory performs successfully for thefailed specialty or subspecialty or satisfactorily for each failed analyte,the laboratory returns to proficiency testing as specified in andSection;493.21.(f) If the laboratory performs unsuccessfully on any of the three enhancedproficiency testing shipments or testing events for the failed specialtyor subspecialty or performs unsatisfactorily on any of the three enhancedproficiency testing shipments or testing events for a failed analyte thatresults in unsuccessful performance for the specialty or subspecialty inwhich the analyte is categorized, termination in the applicable specialtyor subspecialty will be effective 15 days after notification of unsuccessfulor unsatisfactory performance in the enhanced proficiency testing program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Proficiency Testing by Specialty and Subspecialty</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Microbiology.</ITAG>The specialty of microbiology includes, for purposes of proficiency testing,the subspecialties of bacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology and parasitology.(a) To participate successfully in microbiology the laboratory must attainan average score of 80% for a given testing event or shipment and may nothave a score in any subspecialty of less than 80% for any testing eventor shipment. The average score is the sum of shipment or testing eventscores for bacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology and parasitology dividedby the total number of the subspecialties for which the laboratory seeks,or has Medicare or Medicaid approval of CLIA licensure.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingservice within the timeframes specified results in a score of 0 for theshipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard: Bacteriology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a bacteriology proficiency testing program,the laboratory must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a giventesting event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the timeframes specified by the program results in scoreof 0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Mycobacteriology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a mycobacteriology proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory must attain a score of 80% acceptable responsesfor a given testing event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the timeframes specified by the program results in a scoreof 0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Mycology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a mycology proficiency testing program,the laboratory must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a giventesting event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the timeframes specified by the program results in a scoreof 0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Parasitology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a parasitology proficiency testing program,the laboratory must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a giventesting event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the timeframes specified by the program results in a scoreof 0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Diagnostic immunology.</ITAG>The specialty of diagnostic immunology includes for the purposes of proficiencytesting the subspecialties of syphilis serology and general immunology.(a) To participate successfully in diagnostic immunology the laboratorymust attain an average score of 80% for a given testing event or shipmentand may not have a score in any subspecialty of less than 80% for a giventesting event or shipment. The average score is the sum of shipment ortesting event scores for syphilis serology and general immunology dividedby the total number of subspecialties for which the laboratory seeks, orhas, Medicare or Medicaid approval or CLIA licensure.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the time frames specified results in a score of 0 for theshipment by the program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Syphilis serology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a syphilis serology proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory_(1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable; and(2) Must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses in a given testingevent or shipment. (b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the timeframes specified by the program results in a scoreof 0 for the shipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; General immunology. </ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a general immunology proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory_ (1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable; (2) For the same analyte in two consecutive testing events or shipments,may not have an unsatisfactory result on one of the two challenges; and(3) Must attain a score of 80% of acceptable responses for a given eventor shipment. (b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.49</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Chemistry. </ITAG>The specialty of chemistry includes for the purposes of proficiency testingthe subspecialties of routine chemistry endocrinology and toxicology. (a) To participate successfully in chemistry the laboratory must attainan average score of 80% for a given testing event or shipment and may nothave a score in any subspecialty of less than 80% for a testing event orshipment. The average score is the sum of the shipment scores of routinechemistry, endocrinology and toxicology divided by the total number ofthe subspecialties for which the laboratory seeks, or has, Medicare orMedicaid approval or CLIA licensure. (b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram within the time frames specified by the program results in a scoreof 0 for the shipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Routine chemistry. </ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a routine chemistry proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory_ (1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable; (2) For the same analyte in two consecutive testing events or shipments,may not have an unsatisfactory result on one of the two challenges; and(3) Must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a given testingevent or shipment. (b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Endocrinology. </ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in an endocrinology proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory: (1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable; (2) For the same analyte in two consecutive testing events or shipments,may not have an unsatisfactory result on one of the two challenges; and(3) Must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a given testingevent or shipment. (b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Toxicology. </ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a toxicology proficiency testing program,the laboratory_ (1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable; (2) For the same analyte in two consecutive testing events or shipment,may not have an unsatisfactory result on one of the two challenges; and(3) Must attain a score of 80% acceptable responses for a given testingevent or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event. (c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.57</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Hematology.</ITAG>(a) To participate successfully in a proficiency testing program for thespecialty of hematology, the laboratory_(1) For any testing event or shipment, may not have a test or analyte forwhich all results have been unacceptable;(2) For the same analyte in two consecutive testing events or shipments,may not have an unsatisfactory result on one of the two challenges; and(3) Must attain an average score of 80% for a given testing event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.59</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Pathology.</ITAG>The specialty of pathology includes, for purposes of proficiency testing,the subspecialty of cytology limited to gynecologic examinations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Cytology: Gynecologic examinations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">(Option 1. Onsite proficiency testing)</ITAG>To participate successfully in a cytology proficiency testing program forgynecologic examinations (Pap smears), the laboratory must meet the requirementsof paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) The laboratory must require each individual engaged in the examinationof cytologic preparations to be tested directly either onsite at the laboratoryor at an offsite location that is chosen by HHS.(b) The laboratory may have no individual who achieves grades of less than(80-100) \1\<NOTE/> percent for any testing event and (80-100) percent overallfor three consecutive testing events.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ We are identifying what we believe to be a range of acceptablescores and are interested in comments about the precise value that we shouldselect.(c) The first time an individual fails any part of a proficiency testingevent, the laboratory must provide him or her with immediate remedial trainingand education in the area of the failure and must review the areas passed.If the individual fails 50 percent or more of two testing events, the laboratorymust implement a more stringent form of remedial action, up to prohibitingthe individual from reporting negative slides, until the individual hasbeen retrained and scores 100 percent on two consecutive proficiency testingevents.(d) If either two or more or ten percent or more of the individuals ina laboratory, whichever number is greater, fail any proficiency testingevent, all individuals engaged in the examination of cytologic preparationsmust undergo additional training and education in addition to that requiredin Subpart G of this part and the laboratory must participate in a retrospectiveproficiency testing program until the laboratory achieves 95 percent correctresponses over three subsequent consecutive proficiency testing events.(e) If the laboratory fails to take required remedial actions as describedin paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section when individuals are found tobe failing the proficiency testing program, HHS will terminate the laboratory'sMedicare approval for gynecologic cytology testing or revoke its licensureunder CLIA, or both if applicable. If either two or more or 10 percentor more of the individuals in a laboratory, whichever number is greater,fail two or more consecutive testing events, HHS will terminate the laboratory'sMedicare approval or revoke the laboratory's CLIA license, or both if applicable,for gynecologic cytology.<ITAG tagnum="81">(Option 2. Proficiency testing by mail)</ITAG>To participate successfully in a cytology proficiency testing program forPap smears, the laboratory must meet the requirements of paragraphs (a)through (d) of this section.(a) The laboratory may test each individual engaged in the examinationof cytologic preparations using prepared materials received from the proficiencytesting program.(b) The laboratory may have no individual who achieves grades of less than(80-100) percent for any shipment and (80-100) percent overall for threeconsecutive shipments.(c) The first time an individual fails any part of a proficiency testingshipment, the laboratory must provide the individual with immediate remedialtraining and education in the area of the failure and review the areaspassed. If the individual fails 50 percent or more of two shipments, thelaboratory must implement a more stringent form of remedial action up toprohibiting the individual from reporting negative slides until the individualhas been retrained and scores 100 percent on two consecutive proficiencytesting shipments.(d) If either two or more or ten percent or more of the individuals ina laboratory, whichever number is greater, fail any shipment, all individualsengaged in the examination of cytologic preparations must undergo additionaltraining and education in addition to that required in Subpart G of thispart and the laboratory must participate in a retrospective proficiencytesting program until the laboratory achieves 95 percent correct responsesover three subsequent shipments.(e) If the laboratory fails to take required remedial actions as describedin paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section when individuals fail the proficiencytesting program, HHS will terminate the laboratory's Medicare approvalfor gynecologic cytology testing or revoke the laboratory's CLIA license(or both if applicable). If either two or more or ten percent or more ofthe individuals in a laboratory, whichever number is greater, fail twoor more consecutive shipments, HHS will terminate the laboratory's Medicareapproval or revoke the laboratory's CLIA license (or both if applicable)for gynecologic cytology.<ITAG tagnum="81">(Option 3. Combination of Options 1 and 2)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">(Reserved_Will be determined by comments to NPRM)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Immunohematology.</ITAG>(a) For the specialty of immunohematology, there is no overall specialtyscore for each shipment or testing event, since the proficiency testingin immunohematology is defined by performance in subspecialty services.To participate successfully in an immunohematology proficiency testingprogram, the laboratory must attain a score of 100% acceptable responsesfor the subspecialties of grouping, typing, antibody detection and crossmatchcompatibility for incompatible crossmatches. More than one false incompatibleresult (for a compatible sample) in any shipment or testing event willresult in failure of the shipment. For the subspecialty of antibody identification,a score of 80% is required for a given testing event or shipment.(b) Failure to participate in a shipment or testing event, except whenservices are not offered for patient testing, results in a score of 0 forthe shipment or testing event.(c) Failure to return proficiency testing results to the proficiency testingprogram in the timeframes specified by the program results in a score of0 for the shipment.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Proficiency Testing Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.91</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of proficiency testing programs. </ITAG>In order for a proficiency testing program to receive HHS approval, theprogram must, for each specialty and subspecialty for which it providestesting_ (a) Assure the quality of test samples, appropriately evaluate the testingresults, and identify performance problems in a timely manner; and (b) Demonstrate to HHS that it has_ (1) The technical ability required to prepare and distribute samples, usingrigorous quality control to assure that samples mimic actual patient specimenswhen possible and that samples are homogeneous and will be stable withinthe time frame for analysis by proficiency testing participants; (2) A scientifically defensible process for determining the correct answerfor each challenge offered by the program; (3) A program of sufficient annual challenge and frequency to establishthat a laboratory has met minimum performance requirements; and (4) The resources needed to provide, statewide or nationwide, reports toregulatory agencies on individual laboratory performance on shipments ortesting events, cumulative reports about laboratory performance, and reportsof specific laboratory failures using grading criteria acceptable to HHSon a timely basis; and (c) Meet the specific criteria for proficiency testing programs listedby specialty and subspecialty of services contained in andSection;andSection;493.91-943.153for initial approval and thereafter provide HHS, on an annual basis, witha description of program content and grading criteria. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.93</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative responsibilities. </ITAG>The proficiency testing program must_ (a) Issue reports in a format approved by HHS on each laboratory's performancesfor the individual Medicare, Medicaid or CLIA-licensed specialty or subspecialtyof service within 30 days from the date by which the laboratory must reportproficiency testing results to the proficiency testing program. Copiesof these laboratory reports must be sent to the State survey agency atthe same time reports are sent to the laboratory. (b) Furnish to HHS cumulative reports on an individual laboratory's performanceand aggregate data on Medicare approved and CLIA-licensed laboratories;(c) Provide HHS with additional information and data upon request; and(d) Maintain records of Medicare-approved and CLIA-licensed laboratories'performance for a period of five years or such time as may be necessaryfor any legal proceedings. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disapproved proficiency testing programs. </ITAG>If a proficiency testing program fails to meet the criteria contained inandSection;andSection;493.97-493.153 for approval of the proficiency testingprogram, HHS will notify the program and all laboratories that are Medicare-approvedor CLIA-licensed of the non-approval and the reasons for non-approval.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.96</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Process for updating proficiency testing program. </ITAG>HHS reviews the requirements for proficiency testing on a regular basisand considers revisions to the program based on the performance of laboratories.It will change requirements after soliciting comments from all concernedgroups regarding the need to modify the criteria for an approved proficiencytesting program. Changes in the program may be made to incorporate newanalytes, tests, or organisms of clinical significance, to delete obsoleteor well-performed tests, or to improve the valuation scheme. When HHS decidesto include new challenges or evaluation criteria in future proficiencytesting, it will notify all proficiency testing programs of the necessarychanges in proficiency testing and require these changes to be providedby approved proficiency testing programs within two years of the noticeof change.<ITAG tagnum="84">Proficiency Testing Programs by Specialty and Subspecialty</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.97 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Microbiology.</ITAG>The subspecialties under the specialty of microbiology for which a programmay offer proficiency testing are bacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology,and parasitology. Specific criteria for these subspecialties are foundat 493.99 through 493.153.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.99 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bacteriology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of laboratories. </T3>In bacteriology, for proficiency testingpurposes, there are three types of laboratories:(1) Those that interpret only Gram stains, use direct antigen techniquesto detect an organism, perform primary inoculation, or perform any combinationof these;(2) Those that_(i) May use direct antigen techniques to detect an organism or isolateaerobic and anaerobic bacteria from mixed bacterial populations; and(ii) Perform limited identification, perform antimicrobial susceptibilitytests on selected microorganisms isolated, or both; and(3) Those that_(i) Are able to identify aerobic and anaerobic bacteria from mixed bacterialpopulations to both genus and species in most instances and perform antimicrobialsusceptibility tests on the microorganisms isolated; or(ii) May use direct antigen techniques to detect an organism.(b) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for bacteriology, the annual program must provide aminimum of six samples per quarter. The samples may be provided to thelaboratory through mailed shipments or, at HHS' option, may be providedto HHS for on-site testing. An annual program must include bacterial speciesthat are representative of the six major groups of bacteria: anaerobes,Enterobacteriaceae, Gram-positive bacilli, Gram-positive cocci, Gram-negativecocci, and miscellaneous Gram-negative bacteria.(1) An approved program must, during each calendar year, furnish HHS witha description of samples that it plans to include in its annual program.Some of the bacterial species representative of the six major groups mustbe varied from year to year. At least 50% of the samples must be mixturesof the principal organism and appropriate normal flora. The program mustinclude other important emerging pathogens (as determined by HHS) and eitherorganisms commonly occurring in patient specimens or opportunistic pathogens.The program must include two types of samples and each must meet the 50percent mixed culture criterion:(i) Samples that require laboratories to report only organisms that thetesting laboratory considers to be a significant pathogen that is clearlyresponsible for a described illness. The program determines the reportableisolates, including antimicrobial susceptibility for the isolate. (ii) Samples that require laboratories to report all organisms present.Samples must contain multiple organisms frequently found in specimens suchas urine, blood, abscesses, and aspirates where multiple isolates are clearlysignificant or where specimens are derived from immunocompromised patients.The program determines the reportable isolates. (2) An approved program may vary over time. For example, the types of organismsthat might be included in an approved program over time are_<ITAG tagnum="15">Anaerobes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Bacteroides fragilis group </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Clostridium perfringens </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Peptostreptococcus anaerobius</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">Enterobacteriaceae </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Klebsiella pneumoniae </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Salmonella typhimurium </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Serratia marcescens </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Shigella sonnei </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Yersinia enterocolitica</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">Gram-positive bacilli </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Listeria monocytogenes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Corynebacterium</ITAG> Species CDC group JK<ITAG tagnum="15">Gram-positive cocci </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Staphylococcus aureus </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Streptococcus</T3> Group A <ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Streptococcus</T3> Group B <ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Streptococcus</T3> Group D (S. <T3>bovis</T3> and <T3>enterococcus) </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Streptococcus pneumoniae</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">Gram-negative cocci </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Branhamella catarrhalis </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Neisseria gonorrhoeae </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Neisseria meningitidis</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">Miscellaneous Gram-negative bacteria </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Campylobacter jejuni </T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Haemophilis influenza,</T3> Type B(3) For antimicrobial susceptibility testing, the program must provideat least one sample per quarter that includes Gram-positive or Gram-negativestrains that have a predictable pattern of sensitivity or resistance tothe common antimicrobial agents. (c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory performance.</T3> HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's responses in accordancewith paragraphs (c) (1) through (5) of this section. (1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's response, the program mustcompare the laboratory's response for each sample with the response whichreflects agreement of at least 80% of ten or more referee laboratoriesor all participating laboratories agree. Sample scores must be averagedto determine the score for the shipment or testing event. (2) For samples described in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section, failureto report the specific pathogen or reporting an additional organism asa pathogen must receive equal penalty. For samples described in paragraph(b)(1)(ii) of this section, misidentification or failure to report an isolatereceives equal penalty. The total number of correct responses divided bythe number of organisms present plus the number of incorrect organismsreported is multiplied by 100 to establish a score for each sample in eachshipment or testing event. For example, if a sample contained one principalorganism and the laboratory reported it correctly but reported the presenceof an additional organism, which was not considered reportable, the samplegrade would be 1/(1+1)andmultiply;100=50%. (3) As a laboratory is expected to perform the isolation and identificationprocess to the same extent it performs it with patient specimens, the programmust use the laboratory's type of service as determined in accordance withparagraph (a) of this section to determine the appropriateness of the laboratory'sresponse. (4) For antimicrobial susceptibility testing, laboratories must reportthose antimicrobial agents considered appropriate for the causative organismand infection site. Determination of which antimicrobial agents are appropriatemust be based on a consensus document such as a National Committee on ClinicalLaboratory Standards (NCCLS) publication. Grading is based on the numberof correct responses divided by the number of appropriate drugs tested.A laboratory must indicate which antibiotics are included in its test panel;the program may evaluate the laboratory only for those antibiotics forwhich service is offered. (5) A laboratory's shipment score for bacteriology is the score for organismidentification or, if the laboratory also performs antimicrobial susceptibilitytesting, the score determined by dividing the total number of possibleorganisms a laboratory should have identified plus the number of correctantimicrobial agent responses by the number of correctly identified organismsplus the number of additional organisms reported plus the number of appropriateantimicrobial agents tested multiplied by 100 to establish a score foreach sample in each shipment or testing event. For example, if a shipmentor testing event contained three reportable organisms and a laboratoryreported all three correctly, but reported one additional organism andmade one error in antimicrobial susceptibility testing of three appropriateagents tested, its score for bacteriology would be: (3+2)/(3+1+3)andmultiply;100=71%.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mycobacteriology. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of laboratories.</T3> In mycobacteriology, there are three typesof laboratories for proficiency testing purposes: (1) Those that perform acid-fast stains and refer cultures to another laboratoryfor identification;(2) Those that isolate and perform identification of Mycobacterium tuberculosis,but refer cultures other than M. tuberculosis to another laboratory foridentification, perform antimycobacterial susceptibility tests on the organismsisolated, or both; and(3) Those that isolate and identify all mycobacteria to the extent requiredfor correct clinical diagnosis, perform antimycobacterial susceptibilitytests on the organisms isolated, or both.(b) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for mycobacteriology, the annual program must providea minimum of six samples per quarter. The samples may be provided throughmailed shipments or, at HHS' option, provided to HHS for on-site testing.An approved program must furnish HHS a description of samples that it plansto include in its program during each calendar year.(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's performance. </T3>HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's response in accordancewith paragraphs (c) (1) through (3) of this section.(1) The program determines the reportable organisms. To determine the accuracyof a laboratory's response, the program must compare the laboratory's responsefor each sample with the response which reflects agreement of at least80% or more of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratoriesagree. Sample scores must be averaged to determine the shipment or testingevent score.(2) Since laboratories may incorrectly report the presence of organismsin addition to the correctly identified principal organism(s), the gradingsystem must provide a means of deducting credit for additional erroneousorganisms reported. Therefore, the total number of correct responses dividedby the number of organisms present plus the number of incorrect organismsreported must be multiplied by 100 to establish a score for each samplein each shipment or testing event. For example, if a sample contained oneprincipal organism and the laboratory reported it correctly but reportedthe presence of an additional organism, which was not present, the samplegrade would be 1/(1+1)andmultiply;100=50%.(3) As a laboratory is expected to perform the isolation and identificationprocess to the same extent it performs it with patient specimens, the programmust use a laboratory's type of service as determined in accordance withparagraph (a) of this section to determine the appropriateness of the laboratory'sresponse.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mycology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of laboratories. </T3>In mycology, there are three types of laboratoriesfor proficiency testing purposes that may perform different levels of servicefor yeasts, dimorphic fungi, dermatophytes, and aerobic actinomycetes:(1) Those that perform direct examination and culture, recognizing thetype of organism that is present and referring isolates to another laboratoryfor identification;(2) Those that isolate and perform identification to the genus and, insome cases, the species level or to the extent required to differentiaterecognized pathogens from others; and(3) Those that isolate and identify organisms to the extent required forcorrect clinical diagnosis.(b) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for mycology, the annual program must provide a minimumof six samples per quarter. The samples may be provided through mailedshipments or, or at HHS' option, may be provided to HHS for on-site testing.An annual program must include representatives of five major groups oforganisms: yeast or yeast-like fungi; dimorphic fungi; dematiaceous fungi;dermatophytes; and saprophytes, including opportunistic fungi.(1) An approved program must furnish HHS, during the calendar year, witha list of organisms that will be included in its annual program. Some ofthe organisms representative of the five major groups must vary from yearto year. At least 50% of the samples must be mixtures of the principalorganism and appropriate normal background flora. Other important emergingpathogens (as determined by HHS) and organisms commonly occurring in patientspecimens must be included periodically in the program.(2) An approved program may vary over time. As an example, the types oforganisms that might be included in an approved program over time are_<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Candida albicans</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Candida </T3>(other species)<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Cryptococcus neoformans</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Sporothrix schenchii</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Exophiala jeanselmei</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Fonsecaea pedrosoi</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Acremonium </T3>sp.<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Trichophyton </T3>sp.<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Aspergillus fumigatus</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Nocardia </T3>sp.<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Blastomyces dermatitidis</T3> \2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Provided as a nonviable sample.<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Zygomycetes </T3>sp.(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's performance. </T3>HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's response in accordancewith paragraphs (c)(1) through (3) of this section.(1) The program determines the reportable organisms. To determine the accuracyof a laboratory's response the program must compare the laboratory's responsefor each sample with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80%of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories agree.Sample scores must be averaged to determine the survey score.(2) Since laboratories may incorrectly report the presence of organismsin addition to the correctly identified principal organism(s), the gradingsystem must deduct credit for these additional erroneous organisms reported.Therefore, the total number of correct responses divided by the numberof organisms present plus the number of incorrect organisms reported mustbe multiplied by 100 to establish a score for each sample in each shipmentor testing event. For example, if a sample contained one principal organismand the laboratory reported it correctly but reported the presence of anadditional organism, which was not present, the sample grade would be 1/(1+1)andmultiply;100=50%.(3) As a laboratory is expected to perform the isolation and identificationprocess to the same extent it performs it with patient specimens, a laboratory'stype of service as determined in accordance with paragraph (a) of thissection must be used to determine the appropriateness of it response.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Parasitology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of laboratories. </T3>In parasitology there are three types oflaboratories for proficiency testing purposes_(1) Those that are able to recognize the presence of parasites but usuallyrefer them to another laboratory for identification;(2) Those that identify parasites to the extent required to establish acorrect clinical diagnosis without performing permanent stains for identification;and(3) Those that identify parasites to the extent required to establish acorrect clinical diagnosis and perform permanent stains.(b) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing in parasitology, a program must provide a minimum ofsix samples per quarter. The samples may be provided through mailed shipmentsor, or at HHS option, may be provided to HHS for on-site testing. An annualprogram must include parasites that are commonly encountered in the UnitedStates as well as those recently introduced into the United States. Otherimportant emerging pathogens (as determined by HHS) and organisms commonlyoccurring in patient specimens must be included periodically in the program.(1) An approved program must furnish HHS, during the calendar year, witha list of organisms that will be included in its annual program. Samplesmust include both formalinized specimens and PVA (polyvinyl alcohol) fixedspecimens and blood smears, as appropriate for a particular parasite andstage of the parasite. Samples must contain protozoa or helminths or acombination of parasites. Some samples must be devoid of parasites.(2) An approved program may vary over time. As an example, the types oforganisms that might be included in an approved program over time are_<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Entamoeba histolytica</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Entamoeba coli</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Giardia lamblia</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Endolimax nana</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Dientamoeba fragilis</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Iodamoeba butschlii</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Chilomastix mesnili</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">Hookworm</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Ascaris lumbricoides</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Strongyloides stercoralis</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Trichuris trichiura</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Enterobius vermicularis</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Diphyllobothrium latum</T3><ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Cryptosporidium </T3>sp.<ITAG tagnum="15"/><T3>Plasmodium falciparum</T3>(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's performance. </T3>HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's responses in accordancewith paragraphs (c)(1) through (3) of this section.(1) The program must determine the reportable organisms. To determine theaccuracy of a laboratory's response, the program must compare the laboratory'sresponse with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80% of tenor more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories. Samplescores must be averaged to determine the score for the shipment or testingevent.(2) Since laboratories may incorrectly report the presence of organismsin addition to the correctly identified principal organism(s), the gradingsystem must deduct credit for these additional erroneous organisms reported.Therefore, the total number of correct responses divided by the numberof organisms present plus the number of incorrect organisms reported mustbe multiplied by 100 to establish a score for each sample in each shipmentor testing event. For example, if a sample contained one principal organismand the laboratory reported it correctly but reported the presence of anadditional organism, which was not present, the sample grade would be 1/(1+1)andmultiply;100=50%.(3) As a laboratory is expected to perform the isolation and identificationprocess to the same extent as it performs it with patient specimens, alaboratory's type of service as determined in accordance with paragraph(a) of this section must be used to determine the appropriateness of itsresponse.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.107 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diagnostic immunology.</ITAG>The subspecialties under the specialty of immunology for which a programmay offer proficiency testing are syphilis serology and general immunology.Specific criteria for these subspecialties are found at andSection;andSection;493.109 and 493.111. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Syphilis serology. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge._</T3>The annual programmust provide a minimum of five samples per quarter and must provide samplesthat cover the full range of reactivity from highly reactive to nonreactive.The samples may be provided through mailed shipments or, at HHS' option,may be provided to HHS for on-site testing. (b) <T3>Challenges per quarter. </T3>The minimum challenges per quarter a programmust offer for syphilis serology are five.(c) <T3>Evaluation of analyte or test performance. </T3>HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's responses in accordancewith paragraphs (c) (1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's response for a qualitativesyphilis test, the program must compare the laboratory's response for eachchallenge with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80% often or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories agree.The proficiency testing program must indicate the minimum concentrationthat will be considered as indicating a positive response. For quantitativesyphilis tests, the program must determine the correct response for eachchallenge by the distance of the response from the target value. (2) After the target value has been established for each response, theprogram must determine the appropriateness of the response by using eitherfixed criteria or the number of standard deviations the response differsfrom the target values.(3) The criterion for acceptable performance for syphilis serology is thetarget value andplusmin; 1 dilution or (positive or negative). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.111 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General immunology. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved for proficiency testing for immunology, the annual programmust provide a minimum of two samples per quarter and must provide samplesthat cover the full range of reactivity from highly reactive to nonreactive.The samples may be provided through mailed shipments or, at HHS' option,may be provided to HHS for on-site testing. (b) <T3>Challenges per quarter. </T3>The minimum number of challenges per quarterthe program must provide for each analyte or test procedure is two. Analyte or Test Procedure <ITAG tagnum="15">Alpha-1 antitrypsin </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Alpha-fetoprotein </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Antinuclear antibody </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Antistreptolysin O </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Anti-human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Complement C3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Complement C4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Hepatitis markers (HBsAg, anti-HBc, HBeAg) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">IgA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">IgG </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">IgE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">IgM </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Infectious mononucleosis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Rheumatoid factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Rubella </ITAG>(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance. </T3>HHSapproves only those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory'sresponses in accordance with paragraphs (c) (1) through (4) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's response for qualitativeimmunology tests or analytes, the program must compare the laboratory'sresponse for each challenge with the response that reflects agreement ofat least 80% of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratoriesagree. The proficiency testing program must indicate the minimum concentrationthat will be considered as indicating a positive response. For quantitativeimmunology analytes or tests, the program must determine the correct responsefor each challenge by the distance of the response from the target value.(2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response must be determined by using either fixedcriteria or the number of standard deviations (SDs) the response differsfrom the target value.(3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance. </T3>The criteria for acceptableperformance are_<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25</C>  <H1>Analyte or Test </H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Alpha-1 antitrypsin <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alpha-fetoprotein <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Antinuclear antibody <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;1 dilution or (pos. or neg.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Antistreptolysin O <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;1 dilution or (pos. or neg.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anti-human Immunodeficiency Virus <D>Reactive or nonreactive. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Complement C3 <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Complement C4 <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hepatitis (HBsAg, anti-HBc, HBeAg) <D>Reactive (positive) or nonreactive (negative). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">IgA <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">IgE <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">IgG <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">IgM <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Infectious mononucleosis <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;1 dilution or (pos. or neg.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rheumatoid factor <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;1 dilution or (pos. or neg.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubella <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;1 dilution or (pos. or neg.).</ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Chemistry. </ITAG>The subspecialties under the specialty of chemistry for which a proficiencytesting program may offer proficiency testing are routine chemistry, endocrinologyand toxicology. Specific criteria for these subspecialties are listed in493.117 through 493.119. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.117 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Routine chemistry. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for chemistry, a program must provide a minimum oftwo samples per quarter. The annual program must provide samples that coverthe clinically relevant range of values that would be expected in patientspecimens. The specimens may be provided through mailed shipments or, atHHS' option, may be provided to HHS for on-site testing. (b) <T3>Challenges per quarter. </T3>The minimum number of challenges per quartera program must provide for each analyte or test procedure is two. Analyte or Test Procedure <ITAG tagnum="15">Alanine aminotransferase (ALT/SGPT) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Albumin </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Alkaline phosphatase </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Amylase </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Aspartate aminotransferase (AST/SGOT) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Bilirubin, total </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Blood gas pH </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">     pO</ITAG><T4>2</T4> <ITAG tagnum="15">     pCO</ITAG><T4>2</T4> <ITAG tagnum="15">Calcium, total </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Chloride</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Cholesterol, total </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Cholesterol, high density lipoprotein </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Creatine kinase </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Creatine kinase, isoenzymes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Creatinine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Glucose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Iron, total</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Lactate dehydrogenase (LDH)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">LDH isoenzymes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Magnesium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Potassium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Sodium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Triglycerides</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Urea Nitrogen</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Uric Acid</ITAG>(c)<T3> Evaluation of a laboratory analyte or test performance.</T3> HHS approvesonly those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory's responsesin accordance with paragraphs (c) (1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's response for qualitativechemistry tests or analytes, the program must compare the laboratory'sresponse for each challenge with the response that reflects agreement ofat least 80% of ten or more reference laboratories or all participatinglaboratories. For quantitative chemistry tests or analytes, the programmust determine the correct response for each challenge by the distanceof the response from the target value.(2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response must be determined by using either fixedcriteria (percentage difference from the target value) or the number ofstandard deviations (SDs) the response differs from the target value.(3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance.</T3>The criteria for acceptable performance are_<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25</C> <H1>Analyte or test</H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alanine aminotransferase (ALT/SGPT) <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Albumin <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;10%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alkaline phosphatase <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amylase <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aspartate aminotransferase (AST/SGOT) <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;10%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bilirubin, total <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.3 mg/dL or 20% (greater term).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood gas p02 <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">     pC02 <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 mm Hg or 8% (greater).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">     pH <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.04.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Calcium, total <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.8mg/dL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloride <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;5%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cholestrol, total <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;15%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cholestrol, high density lipoprotein <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Creatine kinase <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Creatine kinase isoenzymes <D>MB elevated (+ or ^) or Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Creatinine <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.2 mg/dL or 7% (greater term).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Glucose <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;10%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Iron, total <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">LDH isoenzymes <D>LDH1/LDH2 (+ or ^) or Target value </D>andplusmin; 3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Magnesium <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Potassium <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.3 mmol/L.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sodium <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 mmol/L or andplusmin;4 mmol/1 if target valueis above 150 mmol/L.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Triglycerides <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urea nitrogen <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;2 mg/dL or 9% (greater).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Uric acid <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;17%.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.119</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Endocrinology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge.</T3> To be approved forproficiency testing for endocrinology, a program must provide a minimumof two samples per quarter. The annual program must provide samples thatcover the clinically relevant range of values that would be expected inpatient specimens. The samples may be provided through mailed shipmentsor, at HHS' option, may be provided to HHS for on-site testing.(b) <T3>Challenges per quarter.</T3> The minimum number of challenges per quartera program must provide for each analyte or test procedure is two.Analyte or Test<ITAG tagnum="15">Cortisol</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Thyroid-stimulating hormone</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Thyroxine</ITAG>(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance. </T3>HHSapproves only those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory'sresponses in accordance with paragraphs (c)(1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's responses on qualitativetests or analytes, a program must compare the laboratory's response foreach challenge with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80%of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories agree.For quantitative chemistry tests or analytes, the program must determinethe correct response for each challenge by the distance of the responsefrom the target value.(2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response must be determined by using either fixedcriteria (percentage difference from the target value) or the number ofstandard deviations (SDs) the response differs from the target value.(3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance. </T3>The criteria for acceptableperformance are_<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25</C> <H1>Analyte or test </H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Cortisol <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thyroxine <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;2SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thyroid-stimulating hormone <D>Target value </D>andplusmin;3SD.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.121</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Toxicology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for toxicology, the annual program must provide a minimumof two samples per quarter. The annual program must provide samples thatcover the clinically relevant range of values that would be expected inspecimens of patients on drug therapy and that cover the level of clinicalsignificance for the particular drug. The samples may be provided throughmailed shipments or, at HHS' option, may be provided to HHS for on-sitetesting.(b) <T3>Challenges per quarter. </T3>The minimum number of challenges per quartera program must provide or for each analyte or test procedure is two.Analyte or Test Procedure<ITAG tagnum="15">Alcohol (blood)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Blood lead</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Carbamazepine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Digoxin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Ethosuximide</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Gentamicin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Lithium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Phenobarbital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Phenytoin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Primidone</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Procainamide (and metabolite)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Quinidine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Theophylline</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Valproic Acid</ITAG>(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance. </T3>HHSapproves only those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory'sresponses in accordance with paragraphs (c)(1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's responses for qualitativetests or analytes, the program must compare the laboratory's response foreach challenge with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80%of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories.For quantitative chemistry tests or analytes, the program must determinethe correct response for each challenge by the distance of the responsefrom the target value.(2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response must be determined by using either fixedcriteria (percentage difference from the target value) or the number ofstandard deviations (SDs) the response differs from the target value.(3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance. </T3>The criteria for acceptableperformance are:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25</C> <H1>Analyte or test</H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alcohol, blood<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood lead<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;15% or 6 mcg/dL (greater).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbamazepine<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Digoxin<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20% or andplusmin;.2 ng/mL (greater term).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethosuximide<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gentamicin<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lithium<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;.2 mmol/L.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phenobarbital<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;20%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phenytoin<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Primidone<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Procainamide (and metabolite)<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Quinidine<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Theophylline<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Valproic Acid<D>Target value </D>andplusmin;25%.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.125</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hematology (including routine hematology and coagulation).</ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge. </T3>To be approved forproficiency testing for hematology, a program must provide a minimum oftwo samples per quarter. The annual program must provide samples that coverthe full range of values that would be expected in patient specimens. Thesamples may be provided through mailed shipments or, at HHS' option, maybe provided to HHS for on-site testing.(b) <T3>Challenges per quarter. </T3>The minimum number of challenges per quartera program must provide for each analyte or test procedure is two.Analyte or Test Procedure<ITAG tagnum="15">Cell identification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">White cell differential</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Erythrocyte count</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Hematocrit</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Hemoglobin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Leukocyte count</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Platelet count</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Fibrinogen</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Partial thromboplastin time</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Prothrombin time</ITAG>(c) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance. </T3>HHSapproves only those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory'sresponses in accordance with paragraphs (c) (1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's responses for qualitativetests or analytes, the program must compare the laboratory's response foreach challenge with the response that reflects agreement of at least 80%of ten or more referee laboratories or all participating laboratories.For quantitative hematology tests or analytes, the program must determinethe correct response for each challenge by the distance of the responsefrom the target value.(2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response is determined using either fixed criteria(percentage difference from the target value) or the number of standarddeviations (SDs) the response differs from the target value.(3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance. </T3>The criteria for acceptableperformance are: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25</C> <H1>Analyte or test</H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Cell identification<D>80% consensus on identification.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">White cell differentiation<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Erythrocyte count<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or 6% (lesser).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hematocrit<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or 6% (lesser).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hemoglobin<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or 5% (lesser).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Leukocyte count<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or 10% (lesser).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Platelet count<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or 25% (lesser).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fibrinogen<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Partial thromboplastin time<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or andplusmin;15% (greater).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Prothrombin time<D>Target </D>andplusmin;3 SD or andplusmin;15% (greater).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.129</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cytology: Gynecologic examinations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">(Option 1_Onsite PT)</ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge</T3>. To be approved forproficiency testing for gynecologic examinations (Pap smears) in cytology,a program must provide onsite testing. The testing may be at the laboratoryor at another site. The program must provide (5 to 12) \3\ challenges pertesting event (1 to 4) \3\<NOTE/> times per year. Each testing event must include normal challenges,infectious agents, benign reactive processes, premalignant processes, andmalignant processes.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ We are inviting comments on the number of challenges andtheir frequency and are proposing what we consider to be realistic ranges.(b) <T3>Evaluation of an individual's performance</T3>. HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the responses of each individual engaged in the examinationof cytologic preparations. The program must assess the accuracy of eachindividual's response by using slides that have been referenced.(1) A slide with atypical results is referenced if there has been a confirmationby tissue biopsy.(2) A slide with negative results is referenced if there is 95 per centconsensus agreement. The reference review must be conducted before testingthe laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="81">(Option 2_Mailed PT)</ITAG>(a) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge</T3>. To be approved forproficiency testing for gynecologic examinations (Pap smears) in cytology,a program must provide (5-12) challenges per shipment (1 to 4) times peryear. Each shipment must include normal challenges, infectious agents,benign reactive processes, premalignant processes, and malignant processes.(b) <T3>Evaluation of an individual's performance</T3>. HHS approves only thoseprograms that assess the responses of each individual engaged in the examinationof cytologic preparations. The program must assess the accuracy of eachindividual's response by using slides that have been referenced.(1) A slide with atypical results is referenced if there has been a confirmationby tissue biopsy.(2) A slide with negative results is referenced if there is 95 per centconsensus agreement. The reference review must be conducted before testingthe laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.153 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Immunohematology.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of laboratories</T3>. In immunohematology, there are three typesof laboratories for proficiency testing purposes_(1) Those that perform ABO and/or Rh typing but do not perform irregularantibody detection or identification;(2) Those that perform ABO and/or Rh typing, compatibility testing, irregularantibody detection and crossmatching but do not perform antibody identification;and(3) Those that perform ABO and/or Rh typing, compatibility testing, irregularantibody detection and crossmatching and also perform antibody identification.(b) <T3>Program content and frequency of challenge</T3>. To be approved forproficiency testing for immunohematology, a program must provide a minimumof two samples per quarter. The annual program must provide samples thatcover the full range of interpretation that would be expected in patientspecimens. The samples may be provided through mailed shipments or, atHHS' option, may be provided to HHS for on-site testing.(c) <T3>Challenges per quarter.</T3> The minimum number of challenges per quartera program must provide for each analyte or test procedure is two. <ITAG tagnum="73">Analyte or Test Procedure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">ABO grouping </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Rh typing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Antibody detection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Antibody identification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Crossmatch compatibility </ITAG>(d) <T3>Evaluation of a laboratory's analyte or test performance.</T3> HHSapproves only those programs that assess the accuracy of a laboratory'sresponse in accordance with paragraphs (d)(1) through (3) of this section.(1) To determine the accuracy of a laboratory's response, a program mustcompare the laboratory's response for each challenge with the responsethat reflects agreement of at least 90% of ten or more referee laboratoriesor all participating laboratories. (2) After the target value has been established for each response, theappropriateness of the response is determined using either fixed criteria(percentage difference from the target value) or the number of standarddeviations (SDs) the response differs from the target value. (3) <T3>Criteria for acceptable performance.</T3> The criteria for acceptableperformance are_ <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25 </C>  <H1>Analyte or test </H1><H1>Criteria for acceptable performance </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">ABO grouping <D>100% accuracy on 95% consensus. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rh typing <D>100% accuracy on 95% consensus. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Antibody detection <D>100% accuracy on 90% consensus. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Antibody identification <D>80% accuracy on 90% consensus. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Crossmatch compatibility <D>100% accuracy on 95% consensus for incompatible crossmatches and nomore than one false incompatible result for a compatible sample.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Patient Test Management </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Patient test management. </ITAG>The laboratory must maintain and employ a system that provides for properreceipt and processing of patient specimens and accurate reporting of patienttest results. (a) <T3>Standard; Procedures for specimen submission.</T3> The laboratory musthave written policies and procedures regarding collection, labeling, preservationor fixation, and transportation of specimens that, when followed, assureaccurate and reliable test results. The laboratory must follow these practicesand make available to clients instructions for specimen collection, handling,preservation and transportation as a means of ensuring that specimens submittedare satisfactory for testing. (b) <T3>Standard; Specimen requisition.</T3> The laboratory must perform testsonly at the written or electronic request of an authorized person and maintainrecords of test requistions for at least two years. The laboratory mustassure that the requisition includes_ (1) The patient's name or other method of specimen identification to assureaccurate reporting of results; (2) The name or other suitable identifier of the person who ordered thetest or the name of the clinical laboratory submitting the specimen; (3) The date of specimen collection and the time of specimen collection,if pertinent; (4) The source of specimen and type of test ordered; and (5) For cytology specimens_ (i) Patient age; (ii) Pertinent clinical information; and (iii) For Pap smears, the last menstrual period and indication whetherthe patient is at risk for developing cervical cancer or its presursors.(c) <T3>Standard; Specimen records.</T3> The laboratory must maintain a systemof reliable specimen identification, document each step in processing patientspecimens and testing to assure accurate test reporting, and retain recordsof patient testing for at least two years. This system must provide_ (1) The laboratory number or other identification of the specimen; (2) The patient's name or other method of specimen identification to assureaccurate reporting of results; (3) The name or other suitable identifier of the person who ordered thetest or the name of the clinical laboratory submitting the specimen; (4) The date of specimen collection; the time of specimen collection, ifpertinent; and the date of specimen receipt in the laboratory; (5) The source of specimen and type of test ordered; (6) The condition or disposition of specimens that do not meet the laboratory'scriteria for specimen acceptability; and (7) The records and dates of performance of each step in patient testingleading to the final report to assure proper identification and reliablereporting of test results. (d) <T3>tandard; test report. </T3>The laboratory report must be sent promptlyto the authorized person or laboratory that initially requested the testand a legally reproduced record of each test result must be preserved bythe testing laboratory for a period of at least two years after the dateof reporting. For cytology, test reports must be maintained at least tenyears after the date of reporting. (1) The legally reproduced copies of test reports must be filed in thelaboratory in a manner that permits ready identification and accessibility.(2) The results of transcripts of laboratory tests or procedures must bereleased only to authorized persons. (3) Pertinent ``normal'' ranges, as determined by the laboratory performingthe tests, must be available to the authorized person who ordered or whoutilizes the test results. (4) The laboratory must establish special reporting procedures for potentiallife-threatening laboratory results or panic values. In addition, the laboratorymust immediately alert the individual requesting the test when any resultindicating a life-threatening condition is obtained. (5) The laboratory must indicate on the test report any information regardingthe condition or disposition of specimens that do not meet the laboratory'scriteria for acceptability. (6) The laboratory must upon request make available to clients a list oftest methods employed by the laboratory and a basis for the listed ``normal''ranges. In addition, information that may affect the interpretation oftest results, such as test interferences, if known, and performance claimsincluding, where applicable, detection limits, sensitivity, specificity,accuracy, precision and validity of test measurement and other pertinenttest characteristics must be provided to the individual requesting thetest. Updates on testing information must be provided to clients wheneverchanges occur that affect the test results or interpretation of test results.(7) The test report must include the name and address of each laboratoryperforming each test. (e) <T3>Standard; referral of specimens. </T3>The laboratory may refer specimensfor testing only to a laboratory that is Medicare-approved or CLIA-licensed(or exempted from CLIA-licensure) for the appropriate speciality or subspecialty.(1) The authorized person who orders a test or procedure must be notifiedby the referring laboratory of the name and address of each laboratorythat performs a laboratory test. (2) If the referring laboratory interprets or revises in any way the testresults provided by the testing laboratory, the referring laboratory mustnotify the authorized person who requested the test or procedure and thetesting laboratory. The referring laboratory must maintain a legally reproducedcopy of such interpretations, alterations or revisions and of the noticeto the client and testing laboratory. (3) The referring laboratory may permit each testing laboratory to sendthe test result directly to the authorized person who initially requestedthe test. In such case, the referring laboratory must maintain a legallyreproduced copy of each testing laboratory's report. (4) The test report must include the name and address of each testing laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Quality Control</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.221 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: General quality control. </ITAG>The laboratory must impose and practice quality control procedures thatprovide and assure accurate, reliable and valid test results and reportsand that meet the standards in andSection;andSection; 493.223 through 493.239of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.223 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Facilities.</ITAG>The laboratory must be constructed, arranged and maintained to ensure adequatespace, facilities and essential utilities for the performance and reportingof tests. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.225 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Adequacy of methods and equipment. </ITAG>The laboratory must employ methodologies and equipment that provide accurateand reliable test results and reports. (a) The laboratory must have sufficient equipment and instruments to performthe type and volume of testing offered by the laboratory. (b) The instrumentation used must be capable of providing test resultswithin the laboratory's stated performance characteristics. These performancecharacteristics include detection limits, precision, accuracy, specificity,sensitivity as well as freedom from interferences and related test variables.(c) Test methods are performed in a manner that permits the laboratoryto provide test results within the laboratory's stated performance characteristics,including precision, accuracy, sensitivity, specificity, detection limits,as well as freedom from interference and related test variables. In determiningtest methodology, the laboratory must consider factors such as utilizingthe appropriate test system to give the performance characteristics specifiedby the laboratory, assuring a statistically valid number of counts to giveaccurate and reliable test results for systems such as cell counters, radioactivecounters, spectrophotometers and other equipment for which this is a criticalvariable. (d) The laboratory must have adequate systems in place to report resultsin an accurate and reliable manner and within the time frames establishedby the laboratory. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.227 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Temperature and humidity monitoring. </ITAG>Temperature and humidity must be maintained and monitored within an acceptablerange of values to assure_ (a) Proper storage of specimens, reagents and supplies; and (b) Accurate and reliable test performance and reporting. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.229 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Labeling of testing supplies. </ITAG>(a) Reagents, solutions, culture media, controls and calibrators and othermaterials must be labeled to indicate_ (1) Identity, and, when significant, titer, strength or concentration;(2) Recommended storage requirements; and (3) Preparation or expiration date and other pertinent information. (b) The laboratory may not use materials that have exceeded their expirationdate, are of substandard reactivity, or have deteriorated. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.231 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Procedure manual. </ITAG>(a) Personnel examining specimens and performing related procedures withina specialty or subspecialty have available in the testing area completewritten instructions and descriptions related to_ (1) The current analytical methods used by personnel; (2) Specimen processing procedures; (3) Preparation of solutions, reagents, and stains; (4) Calibration procedures; (5) Microscopic examination; (6) Quality control procedures; (7) Quality assurance policies; (8) Limitations in methodologies; (9) Actions to be followed when quality control results deviate from expectedvalues or patterns; (10) Procedures for reporting patient results; (11) Pertinent literature references; and (12) Alternative methods for performing tests or storing the test specimensin the event that a test system becomes inoperable. (b) Procedures and changes in procedures must be approved and signed anddated by the current director of the laboratory. (c) The laboratory must maintain, for a period of up to two years, recordsof each procedure it uses and the span of time the procedure was in use.(d) Textbooks may be used as supplements to these written descriptionsbut may not be used in their place. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.233 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Equipment maintenance and function checks. </ITAG>The laboratory establishes and employs policies and procedures for_ (a) The proper maintenance of equipment, instruments and test systems by_(1) Defining its preventive maintenance program for each instrument andpiece of equipment based on the manufacturer's instructions. If the laboratorychoose to perform preventive maintenance less frequently than the manufacturerrecommends or the manufacturer does not specify a frequency, the laboratorymust document the validity of its preventive maintenance program; and (2) Documenting the performance of its preventive maintenance program.(b) Performing function checks on equipment, including spectrophotometers,radioactive counters, cell counters, automated analyzers, centrifuges,densitometer and data processors to assure proper performance and the productionof accurate and reliable test results by_ (1) Calibrating, recalibrating, or rechecking each instrument or deviceor test system at least once each day of use; (2) Performing the function checks with at least the frequency specifiedby the manufacturer unless the laboratory has data that document that alesser frequency will not alter the performance characteristics of thesystem. The laboratory must establish performance criteria for each testor procedure if the manufacturer of the test system or equipment has notspecified the type of maintenance and function checks to perform; and (3) Performing all necessary baseline or background checks on radioactivecounters, cell counters, refractometers, spectrophotometers and other equipmentrequiring such measurements. The laboratory may not report test resultsunless the background or baseline checks are within acceptable limits.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.235 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Validation of methods </ITAG>The laboratory must have a written protocol and documentation for the validationof each method that verifies that the method produces test results withinthe laboratory's stated performance characteristics. (a) The linearity of each quantitative method, if applicable, must be established.(b) In the case of qualitative and screening tests, the laboratory mustestablish and define the basis for specifying reportable results as positive,negative, degree of reactivity, or in accordance with another reportingsystem. The laboratory must follow these established limits in reportingtest results. (c) A method used by the laboratory must be validated before it is usedand documentation of the validation must be available for the period duringwhich the procedure is used by the laboratory or for two years, whicheveris longer. (d) The laboratory must have documentation of the level of precision, accuracy,sensitivity, and specificity that the laboratory claims for each methodin use and for which it reports results. (e) The laboratory must maintain documentation verifying that test systemsperform according to the laboratory's specifications. This documentationmust be available to the authorized persons ordering or receiving testresults. (f) The laboratory must define the basis for reporting patient test results.(g) The laboratory may not report patient test results if it does not havedata to verify the specified test performance characteristics and reportinglimits. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.237 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Frequency of quality control. </ITAG>The laboratory must perform quality control at the frequencies specifiedin this section unless another frequency is specified in andSection;andSection;493.241through 493.315 or HHS approves a lesser frequency in Appendix C of theState Operational Manual (HCFA Pub. 7). (a) The laboratory must establish and document a schedule for calibration,recalibration or calibration verification of each automated and manualmethod. (1) The laboratory must perform procedural calibration or recalibrationat least once every six months using a complete range of calibrators and,in addition, when any of the following occur: (i) A complete change of reagents for a procedure is introduced. If allof the reagents for a test are packaged together, the laboratory is notrequired to recalibrate for each package of reagents, provided the reagentsare received in the same shipment and contain the same lot number; (ii) There is major preventive maintenance or replacement of critical parts,such as an excitor lamp; (iii) Controls begin to reflect an unusual trend or are outside of acceptablelimits; (iv) The manufacturer's recommendation specify more frequent recalibration;or (v) The laboratory's established schedule requires more frequent recalibration.(2) The number of calibrators the laboratory uses to verify calibration(recalibration) varies by method_ (i) For methods in which a linear relationship exists between concentrationand direct instrument reading, at least three points and a zero or minimumvalue are required; and (ii) For methods in which a nonlinear relationship exists between concentrationand direct instrument readings, at least five points and a zero or minimumvalue are required. (3) The calibrators must cover the entire range of expected patient valuesto be reported for the test procedures. (4) For patient values above the maximum calibration point or below theminimum calibration point_ (i) The laboratory must report the patient results as greater than theupper limit or less than the lower limit or an equivalent designation;or (ii) The laboratory must dilute the sample and the diluted sample mustfall within the linear range of the method if results are to be reported.If a dilution method is employed, the laboratory must be able to provideevidence that the dilution process can yield accurate, reliable and validtest results. (b) For quantitative tests, the laboratory must include two calibratorsamples, one calibrator sample and one control sample, or two control samplesin each run of unknown samples when these reference samples are available.(1) A run is an interval within which the accuracy and precision of a measuringsystem is expected to be stable but must not exceed a period of 24 hoursand must not exceed the manufacturer's specification for including controls.(2) The laboratory must use the calibrator samples, the control samples,or combination thereof, and monitor both the abnormal and normal rangeof reportable patient values. (i) If calibrators are not used, two controls of different concentrationsmust be used; (ii) If controls are not used, two calibrators of different concentrationsmust be used. Two separate dilutions from a stock calibrator must be preparedor a calibrator and a sample spiked with a calibrator must be used; (iii) Other exceptions apply as HHS approves in Appendix C of the StateOperations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7); and (iv) If calibrators and controls are not available, the laboratory musthave a mechanism to assure the quality, accuracy and precision of the testresults. (3) A laboratory does not have to meet the requirements of this sectionwhen calibrators and controls are not available because of the nature ofthe instruments or the tests performed. (4) For qualitative tests, the laboratory must include a positive and negativecontrol with each run of specimens unless otherwise specified by HHS underthe provision of these regulations. (c) The laboratory must determine its statistical limits for each lot numberof controls through repetitive testing. The laboratory may use the manufacturer'slimits, provided they are verified by the laboratory, represent the actualwithin-laboratory analytical range expected and the stated limits correspondto the methods employed by the laboratory. Acceptable limits for unassayedmaterials must be established by the laboratory through concurrent testingwith an assayed or laboratory-defined control material. (d) Initially, the laboratory must check each batch or shipment of reagents,discs, stains, antisera and identification system (systems using two ormore substrates and antigen detection systems) for positive and negativereactivity. (e) Each day of use, unless otherwise specified in this subpart of AppendixC of the State Operations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7), the laboratory must teststaining materials for intended reactivity by concurrent application tosmears of microorganisms with predictable staining characteristics. (f) Each day of use, the laboratory must test direct antigen detectionsystems using positive and negative control organisms that evaluate boththe extraction and reaction phases. (g) The laboratory must check each batch or shipment of media for sterility,ability to support growth and, if appropriate, selectivity/inhibition and/orbiochemical response. The laboratory may use a commercial manufacturer'squality control checks of media if the laboratory has documentation toverify that the manufacturer has used the quality assurance practices thathave been approved by HHS in Appendix C of the State Operations Manual(HCFA Pub. 7). The laboratory must document that the physical characteristicsof the media are not compromised and report any deterioration in the mediato the manufacturer. The laboratory must follow the manufacturer's specificationsfor using the media and be responsible for the test results. (h) A batch of media (solid or liquid) must_ (1) Consist of all tubes, plates, or containers of medium prepared at thesame time and in the same laboratory; or (2) If received from an outside source or commercial supplier, all of theplates, tubes or containers must have the same lot numbers and be receivedin a single shipment. (i) Results must not be reported unless all controls are within acceptablelimits. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.239 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Remedial actions. </ITAG>The laboratory must establish and employ policies and procedures for actionsto be taken when_ (a) Test systems do not meet established criteria including_ <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Quality control results are outside of acceptable limits; </ITAG>(2) Equipment or methodologies perform outside of established operatinglimits;(3) Test results are outside of acceptable linear limits; and(4) Proficiency test results are not within acceptable limits;(b) It cannot test samples within specified times that it has established.The laboratory must establish and follow criteria for referring or forstoring specimens. The laboratory must notify the authorized person whoordered the test if the laboratory cannot run a specimen because test resultsmay be affected;(c) It detects errors in the reported patient results. The laboratory mustestablish and follow policies for correcting reporting errors and notifythe authorized person ordering and utilizing the test results promptly;or (d) It does not report test results within its established timeframes.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.240 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Quality control_records.</ITAG>The laboratory must document all quality control activities and retainrecords for at least two years.(a) The laboratory must maintain records of the following_(1) Preventive maintenance activities;(2) Equipment function checks;(3) Procedural calibrations; and (4) Validation procedures.(b) The laboratory must maintain records of each step in the processingand testing of quality control samples to assure that the quality controlsamples are tested in the same manner as patient samples; the laboratorymust document quality control results.(c) The laboratory must maintain records of remedial activities taken whentest systems do not meet established criteria and samples cannot be testedwithin timeframes established by the laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.241 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Quality control_specialties and subspecialties.</ITAG>The laboratory must establish and follow policies and procedures for anacceptable quality control program that include verification and assessmentof accuracy, measurement of precision and detection of error for all analysesand procedures performed by the laboratory. In addition to the generalrequirements specified in andSection;andSection; 493.221 through 493.240, thelaboratory must meet the applicable requirements of andSection;andSection;493.243 through 493.315 for each specialty and subspecialty for which thelaboratory is licensed (CLIA) or approved (Medicare and Medicaid). Failureto meet any of the applicable conditions in andSection;andSection; 493.243through 493.315 will result in the loss of approval, licensure, or letterof exemption for the entire specialty to which the condition applies; failureto meet any of the standards in andSection;andSection; 493.243 through 493.315will result in the loss of approval, licensure or exemption from licensurefor the subspecialty to which the standard applies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.243 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Microbiology.</ITAG>The laboratory must meet the applicable quality control requirements inandSection;andSection; 493.221 through 493.240 and in andSection;andSection; 493.245through 493.253 for the subspecialties for which it is Medicare or Medicaidapproved or CLIA-licensed under the specialty of microbiology.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.245 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Bacteriology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for bacteriology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) The laboratory must check positive and negative reactivity with controlorganisms_(1) Each time of use for fluorescent stains and DNA probes based on radioisotopesmethods;(2) Each day of use for catalase, coagulase, and oxidase reagents;(3) Each week of use for Gram and acid-fast stains, bacitracin, optochin,ONPG, XV, strips, discs and X, V discs or strips; and(4) Each month of use for antisera.(b) For antimicrobial susceptibility tests, the laboratory must check eachnew batch of media and each lot of antimicrobial discs before, or concurrentwith, initial use, using approved reference organisms.(c) The laboratory's zone sizes or minimum inhibitory concentration forreference organisms must be within established limits.(d) Each day tests are performed, the laboratory must use the appropriatecontrol organism(s) to check the procedure, unless the laboratory can establishprecision and accuracy to be within the limits established by HHS in AppendixC of the State Operations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.247 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Mycobacteriology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for mycobacteriology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) Each day of use, the laboratory must check the iron uptake test withat least one acid-fast organism that produces a positive reaction and withan organism that produces a negative reaction and check all other reagentsused for Mycobacteria identification with at least one acid-fast organismthat produces a positive reaction.(b) The laboratory must check fluorescent stains for positive and negativereactivity each time of use.(c) The laboratory must check each week of use acid-fast stains with anacid-fast organism that produces a positive reaction.(d) For susceptibility tests performed on <T3>Mycobacterium tuberculosis </T3>isolates, the laboratory must checkthe procedure each week of use with a control strain of <T3>Mycobacterium tuberculosis.</T3><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.249 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Mycology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for mycology, the laboratory mustcomply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221 through493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section.(a) Each day of use, the laboratory must check the nitrate reagent witha peptone control.(b) Each week of use, the laboratory must check acid-fast stains for positiveand negative reactivity.(c) For susceptibility tests, the laboratory must test each drug each dayof use with at least one control strain that is susceptible to the drug.The laboratory must establish control limits.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.251 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Parasitology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for parasitology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements of andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section.(a) The laboratory must have available a reference collection of slides,photographs or gross specimens for identification of parasites availableand use it in the laboratory for appropriate comparison with diagnosticspecimens.(b) The laboratory must use a calibrated ocular micrometer for determiningthe size of ova and parasites, if size is a critical parameter.(c) Each month of use, the laboratory must check permanent stains usingfecal samples.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.253 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Virology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for virology, the laboratory mustcomply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221 through493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section.(a) The laboratory must have available host systems for the isolation ofviruses and test methods for the identification of viruses that cover theentire range of viruses that are etiologically related to clinical diseasesfor which services are offered.(b) The laboratory must maintain records that reflect the systems usedand the reactions observed.(c) In tests for the identification of viruses, the laboratory must employuninoculated cell or cell substrate controls to detect erroneous identificationresults.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.255 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Diagnostic immunology. </ITAG>The laboratory must meet the applicable quality control requirements inandSection;andSection;493.221 through 493.240 and andSection;andSection;493.257through 493.259 for the subspecialties for which it is Medicare or Medicaidapproved or CLIA-licensed under the specialty of diagnostic immunology.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.257 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Syphilis serology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for syphilis serology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (e) of this section. (a) For laboratories performing syphilis testing, the equipment, glassware,reagents, controls, and techniques for tests for syphilis must conformto manufacturers' specifications. (b) The laboratory must run serologic tests on unknown specimens concurrentlywith a positive serum control, known titer or controls of graded reactivityplus a negative control unless otherwise specified by HHS in Appendix Cof the State Operations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7). (c) The laboratory must employ controls for all test components to ensurereactivity and uniform dosages. (d) The laboratory may not report test results unless the predeterminedreactivity pattern is observed. (e) All facilities transfusing blood and blood products or serving as referrallaboratories for these facilities must meet the syphilis serology testingrequirements of 21 CFR 640.5(a). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.259 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; General immunology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for general immunology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section. (a) The laboratory must run serologic tests on unknown specimens concurrentlywith a positive serum control, known titer or controls of graded reactivityplus a negative control unless otherwise specified by HHS in Appendix Cof the State Operations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7). (b) The laboratory must employ controls for all test components (antigens,complement, erythrocyte indicator systems, etc.) to ensure reactivity anduniform dosages. (c) The laboratory may not report test results unless the predeterminedreactivity pattern is observed. (d) All facilities transfusing blood and blood products or serving as referrallaboratories for these facilities must meet: (1) The HIV testing requirements of 21 CFR 610.45; and (2) Hepatitis testing requirements of 21 CFR 610.40. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.261 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Chemistry. </ITAG>The laboratory must meet the applicable quality control requirements inandSection;andSection;493.221 through 493.240 and andSection;andSection;493.263through 493.267 for the subspecialties for which it is Medicare or Medicaidapproved or CLIA-licensed under the specialty of chemistry. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.263 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Routine chemistry. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for routine chemistry, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (a) For blood gas analyses, the laboratory must include two calibratorsand a control material each eight hours of testing in addition to includinga calibrator or control each time patients are tested. (b) For urinalysis qualitative or screening tests, the laboratory mustinclude a positive control each day of testing to check the reactivityof each constituent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.265 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Endocrinology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for endocrinology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements contained in andSection;andSection;493.21through 493.240. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.267 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Toxicology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for toxicology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221through 493.240. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.269 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Hematology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for hematology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (b) of this section. (a) For each eight hours of operation, the laboratory must have two levelsof control except for manual cell counts, in which one level of controlis required for each eight hours of operation. (b) The laboratory must run tests for coagulation in duplicate. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.270 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Pathology. </ITAG>The laboratory must meet the applicable quality control requirements inandSection;andSection;493.221 through 493.240 and andSection;andSection;493.271through 493.274 for the subspecialties for which it is Medicare or Medicaidapproved or CLIA-licensed under the specialty of pathology. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.271 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Cytology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for cytology, the laboratory mustcomply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221 through493.240 and paragraphs (a) and (h) of this section. (a) The laboratory must assure that_(1) All gynecologic smears are stained using a Papanicolaou staining method;(2) Gynecologic and non-gynecologic specimens are stained separately; and(3) Staining solutions are discarded or filtered after staining body fluids.(b) The individual providing technical supervision of cytology must assurethat_(1) All genecological smears interpreted to be in the ``suspicious'' orpositive category are confirmed by the technical supervisor in cytology.The report must be signed to reflect the review or, if a computer reportis generated, it must reflect an electronic signature authorized by thetechnical supervisor. (2) All nongynecological cytological preparations, positive and negative,are reviewed by the technical supervisor in cytology. The report must besigned to reflect technical supervisory review or, if a computer reportis generated, it must reflect an electronic signature authorized by thetechnical supervisor. (3) Provision is made for documenting and evaluating each cytotechnologist'sside examination performance, including feedback on the suspicious or abnormalcases referred to the technical supervisor in cytology, and on each cytotechnologist'sperformance evaluation through the rescreening of negative cases. (c) The laboratory must establish and follow a program designed to detecterrors in the performance of cytological examinations and the reportingof results. (1) The laboratory must establish a program that includes on a regularbasis a review of slides screened by each individual responsible for theexamination of slides; records of initial examinations and rescreeningresults must be available. The review must meet the requirements of paragraph(c)(1)(i) or (c)(1)(ii) of this section. (i) At least ten percent of the gynecologic cases reviewed by each cytotechnologistinterpreted to be negative must be rescreened by a second cytotechnologistor the technical supervisor in cytology before reporting patient results;or (ii) All gynecologic cases that are interpreted to be negative and thatare from patients who are identified as having a high probability of developingcervical cancer, as defined in andSection; 493.201(b)(5)(iii), must be rescreenedby a second cytotechnologist or the technical supervisor before reportingpatient results. (2) The laboratory must compare clinical information with cytology reportsand, for all abnormal cytology reports, must compare the cytology reportwith the histopathology report, if available, and determine the causesof any discrepancies. (3) The laboratory must review all prior cytologic specimens, if available,for each abnormal cytology result. (4) The laboratory must establish and document an annual statistical evaluationof the number of cytology cases examined, number of specimens processedby specimen type, volume of patients reported by diagnosis, false-negativeand false-positive rates, number of unsatisfactory specimens submittedby each physician or laboratory and number of complaints received fromindividuals ordering or receiving test reports. (5) The laboratory must evaluate each cytotechnologist's individual casereviews against its overall statistical rates, document any discrepancies,including reasons for the deviation, and document corrective action, ifappropriate. (d) The laboratory report must_(1) Distinguish between inadequate smear and negative result; (2) Contain narrative descriptions for any abnormal or suspicious results;(3) Include the presence of endometrial cells if endometrial cells arepresent out of cycle; (4) Indicate evidence of viral infection if present; and (5) Contain appropriate provisions for follow-up recommendations. (e) Corrected reports issued by the laboratory must indicate basis forcorrection. (f) The laboratory must retain all negative slides for five years fromthe date of examination. (g) The laboratory must retain all abnormal slides and slides from patientswith a history of suspicious or abnormal cytology results for ten yearsfrom the date of examination. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.273 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Histopathology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for histopathology, a laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section.(a) The laboratory must control all special stains for intended level ofreactivity by use of positive slides and records must document the qualitycontrol checks of the stain materials.(b) The laboratory must retain stained slides at least ten years from thedate of examination and retain specimen blocks at least two years fromthe date of examination.(c) The laboratory must retain remnants of tissue specimens in a fixativesolution until the portions submitted for microscopic examination havebeen examined and a diagnosis made by an individual qualified under andSection;493.403(b)(2) of this part. In addition, an individual who meets the requirementsof andSection; 493.403(b)(3) may examine and provide reports for specimensfor skin pathology; an individual meeting the requirements of andSection;493.407(b)(4) may examine and provide reports for specimens for oral pathology.(d) The laboratory must utilize acceptable terminology of a recognizedsystem of disease nomenclature in reporting results.(e) The laboratory must report results of all biopsy-confirmed cases ofcervical cancer to an established cancer registry.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.274 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Oral pathology.</ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for oral pathology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and 493.273.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.275 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Radiobioassay.</ITAG>To meet quality control requirements for radiobioassay, the laboratorymust meet the specific requirements of andSection;andSection; 493.221 through493.240 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.277 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Histocompatibility.</ITAG>In addition to meeting the requirements for general quality control inandSection;andSection; 493.221 through 493.240, for quality control for generalimmunology in andSection; 493.259 of this subpart and for immunohematologyin andSection; 493.281 of this subpart, the laboratory must comply with theapplicable requirements in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) For renal allotransplantation the laboratory must meet requirementof paragraphs (a)(1) through (23) of this section.(1) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for selectingappropriate patient serum samples for crossmatching;(2) The laboratory must have available results of final crossmatches beforean organ or tissue is transplanted.(3) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for the techniqueused in crossmatching;(4) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for preparationof donor lymphocytes for crossmatching.(5) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for reportingcrossmatch results.(6) The laboratory must have available serum specimens for all potentialtransplant recipients at initial typing, for periodic screening, for pretransplantationcrossmatch and following sensitizing events, such as transfusion and transplantloss.(7) The laboratory's storage and maintenance of both recipient sera andreagents must_(i) Be at an acceptable temperature range for sera and components;(ii) Use a temperature alarm system and have an emergency plan for alternatestorage; and(iii) Be well-organized with all specimens properly identified and easilyretrievable.(8) The laboratory's reagent typing sera inventory (applicable only tolocally constructed trays) must indicate source, bleeding date and identificationnumber, and volume remaining.(9) The laboratory must properly label and store cells, complement, buffer,dyes, etc.(10) The laboratory must type all potential transplant recipient cells.(11) The laboratory must type cells from organ donors referred to the laboratory.(12) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for the preparationof lymphocytes for HLA-A, B and DR typing.(13) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for selectingtyping reagents, whether locally or commercially prepared.(14) The laboratory must have available and follow criteria for the assignmentof HLA antigens.(15) The laboratory's reagent tray or trays for typing recipient and donorcells must be adequate to define all HLA-A, B and DR specificities as requiredto determine splits and cross-reactivity.(16) The laboratory must have a written policy that it follows that establisheswhen antigen redefinition and retyping are required.(17) The laboratory must screen recipient sera for preformed antibodieswith a suitable lymphocyte panel that assures that_(i) Potential transplant recipient serum are screened for HLA-A and B content;and(ii) Screening is performed on initial typing of living related donorsand cadaver organs. The laboratory must also screen at monthly intervalsafter initial screening and following sensitizing events. (18) The laboratory must use a suitable cell panel for screening patientsera (antibody screen), a screen that contains all the major HLA specificitiesand common splits_(i) If the laboratory does not use commercial panels, it must maintaina list of individuals for fresh panel bleeding; and(ii) If the laboratory uses frozen panels, there must be a suitable storagesystem. (19) The laboratory must use testing such as the mixed lymphocyte cultureto determine cellularly defined antigens.(20) (i) If the laboratory reports the patient's ABO blood grouping andRh typing, it must perform the testing in accordance with andSection; 493.281of this subpart. (ii) If the laboratory performs an ABO blood grouping to purify cell population,a control for the ABO must be included. (21) The laboratory must include positive and negative controls on eachtray. The laboratory must determine the reactivity of cell panels usedfor antibody detection by testing the various components of the antigenpanel with positive and negative controls when the panel is used. The entirepanel does not have to be tested at one time.(22) The laboratory must, at least once each month, give each individualperforming tests a previously tested specimen as an unknown to verify hisor her ability to reproduce test results. The laboratory must maintainrecords of the results for each individual. (23) The laboratory must participate in at least one national or regionalcell exchange program, if available, or develop an exchange system withanother laboratory in order to validate interlaboratory reproducibility.(b) For laboratories performing only transfusions, bone marrow transplants,and other nonrenal transplantation, the laboratory must meet all the requirementsspecified in this section except for the performance of mixed lymphocytecultures. (c) For laboratories performing only disease-associated studies, the laboratorymust meet all the requirements specified in this section except for therequirements for those concerning the performance of mixed lymphocyte cultures.(d) For laboratories performing tests for organ transplantation, the laboratorymust test the donor for HIV reactivity using the same protocols as requiredunder andSection; 493.301 of this part for the transfusion of blood and bloodproducts, unless the organ recipient (or an individual authorized to acton his or her behalf) waives the tests because of medical circumstances.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.279 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Medical cytogenetics. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for cytogenetics, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements of andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) The laboratory examination of X and Y chromatin counts must be basedon an examination of an adequate number of cells. (b) The laboratory must have records that document the number of cellscounted, the number of cells karyotyped, the number of chromosomes countedfor each metaphase spread, and the quality of the banding; that the resolutionis sufficient to support the reported results; and that an adequate numberof karyotypes are prepared for each patient. (c) The laboratory also must have policies and procedures for assuringan adequate patient sample identification during the process of accessioning,photographing or other image reproduction technique, cell preparation andphotographic printing, and storage and reporting of results or photographs.(d) The laboratory report must include the summary and interpretation ofthe observations and number of cells counted and the use of appropriatenomenclature.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.281</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Immunohematology. </ITAG>To meet the quality control requirements for immunohematology, the laboratorymust comply with the applicable requirements in andSection;andSection; 493.221through 493.240 and with paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section.(a) The laboratory must perform ABO and Rh<T2>0</T2>(D) grouping, antibody detection and identification and compatibilitytesting in accordance with 21 CFR Part 606 (with the exception of 21 CFR606.20a, Personnel) and 21 CFR 640 et seq.(b) The laboratory must perform ABO grouping by testing unknown red cellswith anti-A and anti-B grouping serums. For confirmation of ABO grouping,the unknown serum must be tested with known A<T2>1</T2> and B red cells.(c) The laboratory must determine the Rh<T2>0</T2>(D) group by testing unknown red cells with anti-D (anti-Rh<T2>0</T2>) blood grouping reagent.(d) The laboratory must employ a control system capable of detecting falsepositive Rh test results.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Transfusion services and bloodbanking. </ITAG>If a facility provides services for the transfusion of blood and bloodproducts, the facility must ensure that there are facilities for procurement,safekeeping and transfusion of blood and blood products and that bloodproducts provided are readily available. This condition is met by complyingwith the standards in andSection;andSection; 493.303 through 493.315 of thissubpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Immunohematological testing, processing, storage and transmissionof blood and blood products. </ITAG>In addition to the requirements in this section, the facility must alsomeet the applicable quality control requirements in andSection;andSection;493.221 through 493.240 of this part.(a) Blood and blood product collection, processing and distribution mustcomply with 21 CFR Part 640 and 21 CFR Part 606, and the testing laboratorymust be Medicare-approved.(b) Dating periods for blood and blood products must conform to 21 CFR610.53.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Facilities. </ITAG>The facility must maintain, at a minimum, proper blood storage facilitiesunder the adequate control and supervision of the pathologist or otherdoctor of medicine or osteopathy meeting the qualifications in andSection;493.403(b)(7).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Arrangement for services. </ITAG>In the case of services provided outside the blood bank, the facility musthave an agreement reviewed and approved by the director that governs theprocurement, transfer and availability of blood.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.309</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Provision of testing. </ITAG>There must be provision for prompt blood grouping, antibody detection,compatibility testing and for laboratory investigation of transfusion reactions,either through the facility or under arrangement with an approved facilityon a continuous basis, under the supervision of a pathologist or otherdoctor of medicine or osteopathy.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.311</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Storage facilities. </ITAG>The blood storage facilities must have an adequate temperature alarm systemthat is regularly inspected.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.313</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Retention of transfused blood. </ITAG>According to the facility's established procedures, samples of each unitof transfused blood must be retained for further testing in the event ofreactions. The facility must promptly dispose of blood not retained forfurther testing that has exceeded its expiration date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.315</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Investigation of transfusion reactions. </ITAG>The facility, according to its established procedures, must promptly investigateall transfusion reactions occurring in its own facility for which it hasinvestigational responsibility and make recommendations to the medicalstaff regarding improvements in transfusion procedures. The facility mustdocument that all necessary remedial actions are taken to prevent futurerecurrences and that all policies and procedures are reviewed to assurethat they are adequate to ensure the safety of individuals being transfusedwithin the facility.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Personnel</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Laboratory director. </ITAG>The laboratory must be directed by an individual who is qualified to provideoverall management and supervision of laboratory services.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.403</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Laboratory director qualifications. </ITAG>The laboratory director must be qualified to provide day-to-day managementof the laboratory personnel and test performance.(a) The director must be_(1) A pathologist or other doctor of medicine or osteopathy;(2) A laboratory specialist with a doctoral degree from an accredited universityin physical, chemical or biological sciences;(3) An individual who before [the effective date of these regulations]was properly qualified and served as a laboratory director in accordancewith the requirements specified in Appendix A to this part;(4) An individual who qualifies under State law to direct the laboratory;or(5) An individual who has been approved by a certification board acceptableto HHS.(b) If the laboratory performs services in any of following specialtiesor subspecialties, specific qualifications are required for the individualproviding technical supervision.(1) Cytology_In the case of tests limited to cytology, the individual isa physician who_(i) Is certified in anatomic pathology by the American Board of Pathologyor the American Osteopathic Board of Pathology;(ii) Is certified by the American Society of Cytology; or(iii) Possesses qualifications that are equivalent to those required forcertification by the Boards specified in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section;and(iv) Has had three months' experience in cytology.(2) Histopathology_In the case of tests limited to histopathology, theindividual is a physician who meets the requirements of paragraphs (b)(1)(i)or (b)(1)(iii) of this section.(3) Dermatopathology_In the case of tests limited to dermatopathology,the individual_(i) Is a physician who meets the requirements of paragrpah (b)(1)(i) or(b)(1)(iii) of this section;(ii) Is certified in dermatopathology by the American Board of Dermatology,the American Osteopathic Board of Dermatology, the American Board of Pathology,or the American Osteopathic Board of Pathology; or(iii) Possesses qualifications that are equivalent to those required forcertification as specified by the Boards specified in paragraph (b)(2)(i)of this section.(4) Oral pathology_In the case of tests limited to oral pathology, theindividual_(i) Is a physician who meets the requirements of paragraph (b)(1)(i) or(b)(1)(iii) of this section;(ii) Is certified in oral pathology by the American Board of Oral Pathology;or(iii) Possesses qualifications that are equivalent to those required forcertification as specified by the Boards specified in paragrah (b)(3)(i)of this section.(5) Histocompatibility_In the case of tests limited to histocompatibility,the individual_(i) Holds an earned doctoral degree in a biological science or is a physician;and(ii) Has had four years of experience in immunology, two of which havebeen in histocompatibility testing.(6) Cytogenetics_The individual_(i) Holds an earned doctoral degree in a biological science or is a physician;and(ii) Has had four years of experience in immunology or genetics, two ofwhich have been in cytogenetics.(7) Transfusion services and blood banking_The individual is a pathologistor other doctor of medicine or osteopathy with training and experiencein transfusion services.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.405 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Laboratory director responsibilities.</ITAG>The laboratory director must be responsible for the overall technical supervisionof the laboratory personnel, for the performance and reporting of testingprocedures and for assuring compliance with the applicable regulations.(a) The laboratory director must provide technical supervision of the laboratoryservices and assure that technical supervision is provided by individualsas required under andSection; 493.403(b).(b) The laboratory director must_(1) Assure that tests, examinations and procedures are properly performed,recorded and reported;(2) Assure that the laboratory maintains an ongoing quality assurance program;(3) Assure that when tests are being performed there is a supervisor onthe premises who meets the qualifications of andSection; 493.409; and(4) Assure compliance with the applicable regulations.(c) The laboratory director must ensure that the staff_(1) Has the appropriate education, experience and training to perform andreport laboratory tests promptly and proficiently;(2) Is sufficient in number for the scope and complexity of the servicesprovided;(3) Receives regular in-service training appropriate for the type and complexityof the laboratory services offered; and(4) Maintains competency to perform test procedures and report test resultspromptly and proficiently.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.407</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Laboratory supervision.</ITAG>(a) Laboratory services must be supervised by an individual who meets therequirements of this subpart and is on the laboratory premises at all timeswhen tests are being performed.(b) Exception: When there is an emergency outside regularly scheduled hoursof duty, an individual who qualifies as a supervisor under this sectionis not required to be on the premises, provided that the supervisor reviewsthe emergency test results during the next duty period and that a recordis maintained to reflect the actual review.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.409</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Laboratory supervisor qualifications.</ITAG>The laboratory supervisor is qualified to provide onsite day-to-day supervisionof laboratory test performance and test reporting. The supervisor_(a) Qualifies as a laboratory director under andSection; 493.401 of thispart;(b) Has earned a bachelor's degree in medical technology from an accreditedcollege or university;(c) Has successfully completed three years of academic study (a minimumof 90 semester hours or equivalent) in an accredited college or universitythat met the specific requirements for entrance into a school of medicaltechnology accredited by an accrediting agency approved by HHS and hassuccessfully completed a course of training of at least 12 months in sucha school of medical technology;(d) Has earned a bachelor's degree in one of the chemical, physical, orbiological sciences and, in addition, has at least one year of pertinentfull-time laboratory experience, training, or both, in the specialty orsubspecialty in which the individual performs tests;(e) Has successfully completed three years (90 semester hours or equivalent)in an accredited college or university with the following distributionof courses:(1) <T3>For those whose training was completed before September 15, 1963. </T3>Atleast 24 semester hours in chemistry and biology courses of which:(i) At least six semester hours were in inorganic chemistry <T3>and </T3>at least three semester hours were in other chemistry courses;and(ii) At least 12 semester hours were in biology courses pertinent to themedical sciences; <T3>or</T3>(2) <T3>For those whose training was completed after September 14, 1963.</T3>(i) Sixteen semester hours in chemistry courses that are acceptable towarda major in chemistry, including at least six semester hours in inorganicchemistry;(ii) Sixteen semester hours in biology courses that are pertinent to themedical sciences and are acceptable toward a major in the biological sciences;and(iii) Three semester hours of mathematics; and(3) Has experience, training, or both, covering several fields of medicallaboratory work of at least one year and of such quality as to providehim or her with education and training in medical technology equivalentto that described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section;(f) Met the requirements of Appendix B to this part before [effective dateof these regulations]; or(g) Has qualified as a technologist in a Medicare-approved or CLIA-licensedlaboratory before July 1, 1971 in accordance with the requirements of AppendixB to this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.411</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Laboratory supervisor duties.</ITAG>The laboratory supervisor, under the general direction of the laboratorydirector, supervises laboratory personnel, test performance, and test reporting.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.413</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Personnel performing cytology services.</ITAG>All cytological preparations must be examined by an individual meetingthe qualifications of andSection; 493.403(b)(1) or the requirements of andSection;493.415.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.415</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Cytotechnologist qualifications.</ITAG>The cytotechnologist_(a) Has successfully completed two years in an accredited college or universitywith a least 12 semester hours in science, eight hours of which are inbiology, and(1) Has had 12 months of training in a school of cytotechnology accreditedby an accrediting agency approved by HHS; or(2) Has received six months of formal training in a school of cytotechnologyaccredited by an accrediting agency approved by HHS and six months of full-timeexperience in cytotechnology in a laboratory acceptable to the pathologistwho directed the formal six months of training; or(b) Met the requirements of Appendix C to this part before [the effectivedate of these regulations].<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.417</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard; Cytotechnologist duties.</ITAG>The cytotechnologist must_(a) Document the gynecologic and non-gynecologic cases examined; and(b) Record slide interpretation results of each gynecologic and non-gynecologiccase reviewed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.419</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Technical personnel.</ITAG>The laboratory staff must be technically competent to perform test proceduresand report test results promptly and proficiently.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Quality Assurance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.451</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition_Quality assurance.</ITAG>The laboratory must establish and follow policies and procedures for anongoing quality assurance program designed to monitor and evaluate quality;identify and correct problems; assure the accurate, reliable and promptreporting of test results; and assure the adequacy and competency of thestaff.(a)<T3> Standard.</T3> The laboratory must have an ongoing system under whichit monitors and evaluates quality control and proficiency testing datafor the purpose of substantiating that all tests performed and reportedby the laboratory conform to the laboratory's specified performance criteria.These criteria include: precision, accuracy, detection limits, interferences,linearity, sensitivity, specificity, validity and adequacy.(b)<T3> Standard.</T3> The laboratory must have a mechanism for assuring theaccurate and timely reporting of test results. Reporting times must bewithin the acceptable time periods established by the laboratory.(c)<T3> Standard.</T3> The laboratory must have a mechanism for assuring that_(1) All quality control data are reviewed;(2) Patient test results are not reported when control values are outsidethe acceptable range established by the laboratory; and(3) Actions are taken to correct the problems which led to the unsatisfactoryquality control results and the corrective actions are documented.(d)<T3> Standard. </T3>The laboratory must have a mechanism for assuring thatcorrective action is taken and is documented on all unacceptable proficiencytesting results.(e)<T3> Standard.</T3> The laboratory must have a mechanism to assure thatspecimens are not tested unless the laboratory's established criteria foracceptability are met and that the authorized person ordering the testis notified of the condition of specimens not meeting the laboratory'scriteria for a satisfactory specimen suitable for testing or any limitationson the reliability of the test results.(f)<T3> Standard.</T3> The laboratory must have policies and procedures foran ongoing program to assure that employees are competent, and maintaintheir competency, to perform their duties as specified by the laboratory.Policies and procedures may include direct observation of routine patienttest performance as well as analysis of unknowns, monitoring the reportingof test results, or other activities identified by the laboratory. Thelaboratory must evaluate employee performance by_(1) Retesting specimens of previously analyzed specimens, internal blindproficiency test samples, or external proficiency test samples (that havealready been reported to approved proficiency testing programs) to assessthe performance levels of each staff member responsible for performingand supervising testing; or(2) Enrolling in external proficiency testing programs to the extent thatthere are programs available to cover all analyses performed, to assessan individual's laboratory performance. (The proficiency test samples arein addition to those required in Subpart C of this part.) For cytology,the laboratory may insert into the workload slides from previously reportedcases as blind samples or may arrange to exchange cases with another laboratoryfor the purpose of rescreening slides and comparing results.(g) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must have a mechanism for assessing problemsidentified during quality assurance reviews and discussing them with thestaff. The laboratory must take necessary corrective actions to preventrecurrences and make available to HHS documentation of corrective action.(h) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must evaluate all data analysis and testreporting systems to assure that the systems perform according to specificationsand provide accurate and reliable reporting, transmittal, storage and retrievalof data.(i) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must establish and follow policies andprocedures to assure that all complaints and problems reported by individualsor facilities who order, receive and use its test results are investigatedand that all necessary corrective actions are instituted and documented.(j) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must maintain records of its qualityassurance program and document all corrective actions taken to remedy problemsit has identified.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Inspection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition: Inspection.</ITAG>HHS or its designees may conduct an unannounced inspection of any laboratoryat any time during its hours of operation. HHS may deny approval to a laboratoryfor a period of at least one year for violation of any of the requirementsof this part or of the Social Security Act, subject to the appeal rightsspecified in Part 498 of this chapter.(a) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory may be required, as part of this inspection,to_(1) Test samples (including proficiency testing samples) or perform proceduresas HHS requires;(2) Allow an interview of all employees of the laboratory;(3) Allow employees to be observed performing tests (including proficiencytesting specimens provided by the inspection team), data analysis and reporting;and(4) Provide copies to HHS of all records and data it requires.(b) <T3>Standard. </T3>All records and data must be readily accessible andretrievable within a reasonable time frame during the course of the inspection.All records must be available for at least two years unless other timeframes are specified in this part or HHS specifies a different intervalin Appendix C of the State Operations Manual (HCFA Pub. 7).(c) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must provide all information and dataneeded to make a determination of the laboratory's status; this informationmay be requested before, during or after the inspection.(d) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must notify HHS within 30 days of theeffective date of all changes in directors, ownership and control, location,test specialties and subspecialties offered, and hours of operation.(e) <T3>Standard. </T3>The laboratory must successfully participate in an approvedproficiency testing program for up to one year before inspection, issuanceof a CLIA license (or letter of exemption) or Medicare or Medicaid approvalcan take place, if HHS so requires. The laboratory must submit the resultsof the testing to HHS before inspection, approval or licensure of the facilitycan take place.(f) <T3>Standard. </T3>HHS may reinspect a laboratory at anytime necessaryto evaluate the ability of the laboratory to provide accurate and reliabletest results.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_CLIA Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.701 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis and scope. </ITAG>(a) This subpart applies to laboratories engaged in the laboratory examinationof, or other laboratory procedures relating to, human specimens solicitedor accepted in interstate commerce, directly or indirectly, for the purposeof providing information for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment ofany disease or impairment, or the assessment of the health, of human beings.All screening procedures are included as well as quantitative testing ofspecimens for the presence or absence of any substance, pathogen or otheranalytes. (b) This subpart does not apply to_ (1) Any laboratory that performs 100 or fewer tests during any calendaryear; however, the laboratory must_ (i) Hold an unrevoked or unsuspended letter of exemption for low volumefrom HHS; (ii) Provide information to HHS upon request, permit inspections, and makerecords available as required by andSection;493.501 of this part for licensedlaboratories; and (iii) Perform testing that HHS has determined poses no significant threatto public health; (2) Any laboratory operated by a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist,or podiatrist, or group of these individuals in any combination who performslaboratory tests or procedures solely as an adjunct to the treatment ofthe practitioner's or practitioners' own patients; (3) Any laboratory performing tests or other procedures solely for thepurpose of determining whether to write an insurance contract or determineeligibility or continued eligibility for insurance payments; and (4) Any laboratory exempted under section 353(1) of the Public Health ServiceAct. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.702 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this subpart_ ``Act'' means the Public Health Service Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 201,et seq., also known as the Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967(CLIA). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;493.704 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Licensure application and issuance. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Licensure application. </T3>(1) An application for the issuance orrenewal of a license must be made for each laboratory location by the owner,director or authorized representative of the laboratory on the form orforms prescribed by HHS. (2) The application for renewal of a license may not be submitted lessthan 30 days nor more than 60 days before the expiration date of the license.(b) <T3>Licensure issuance or renewal. </T3>(1) As a part of the review ofthe application for issuance or renewal of licensure, HHS may require thelaboratory to furnish additional information needed to consider the application.HHS also reviews the results of an onsite inspection of the laboratory'spremises, performance in proficiency testing and compliance with this part.If HHS determines that the laboratory complies with the standards and otherrequirements of CLIA and provides consistent performance of accurate andreliable test procedures and services, HHS issues an initial or a renewallicense with respect to one or more specialties or subspecialties as specifiedin andSection;andSection;493.243 through 493.281 of this part. (2) HHS issues initial or renewal licenses for a period of at least oneyear. If no changes occur that affect the licensure status of the laboratory,HHS notifies the laboratory of its continued approval for at least anotheryear. If changes occur that affect the licensure status of the laboratory,HHS issues a revised license reflecting those changes. (3) If HHS does not issue or renew a license (in whole or in part), HHSgives the laboratory reasonable notice and issues a statement of groundson which it proposes to not issue or renew the license or any part of it.The laboratory is also given an opportunity to request a hearing in accordancewith the provisions of Part 498 of this chapter. (4) If a laboratory applies for licensure in any specialty or subspecialtyfor which a license has been revoked or application for a license has beendenied by HHS, licensure for that specialty or subspecialty will not beapproved until at least one year elapses from the effective date of theadverse action. HHS may waive this one year period if the laboratory submitsgood cause for the waiver. A laboratory that requests reinstatement afterthis one year period must provide assurance that it complies with thissubpart. (c) <T3>Exception. </T3>These standards for issuance and renewal of licensesdo not apply to accredited laboratories if_ (1) HHS determines that the standards applied by an accrediting organizationare equal to or more stringent than the requirements of CLIA and of theseregulations; (2) The accrediting organization assures that its standards are met bythe laboratory;  (3) The accrediting organization and accredited laboratories make availableto HHS all records and information required by these regulations and permitinspections as required by HHS.(4) The laboratory holds an unrevoked and unsuspended letter of exemptionissued in accordance with andSection; 493.710 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.706 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revocation and suspension of licenses and letters of exemption; notice.</ITAG>(a) A laboratory license or letter of exemption may be revoked or suspendedwhenever HHS, after reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing tothe owner or director of the laboratory as provided in Part 498 of thischapter, finds_(1) In the case of a license, that the owner, director or any employeeof the laboratory has committed any of the actions specified in section353(e) of CLIA or has not met the requirements of this part; or(2) In the case of a letter of exemption, that the laboratory is no longereligible for its letter of exemption.(b) Any notice issued under paragraph (a) of this section will containa statement of the proposed action and of the grounds upon which HHS proposesto act.(c) If HHS proposes to suspend a license or letter of exemption the noticewill state_(1) The period of such proposed suspension or the action required to endthe suspension; and(2) That the license or letter will be revoked if the appropriate remedialaction is not taken within the suspension period.(d) If HHS proposes to revoke a license or letter of exemption, the noticewill state the specialty or subspecialty with respect to which the licenseor letter of exemption will no longer apply.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.708 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of accreditation and State licensure programs; notice.</ITAG>(a) Approval of accreditation and State licensure programs is based onHHS' determination that these programs have requirements at least as stringentas those contained in CLIA. HHS, in making this evaluation, considers eachprogram's standards, standards enforcement and survey procedures relatedto: quality control; maintenance of records, equipment and facilities;qualifications of personnel; proficiency testing; program administrationrelated to renewal of accreditation; frequency and comprehensiveness ofonsite inspections; and maintenance and availability of data and recordsrelated to accredited laboratories.(b) In filing an application for approval, the accrediting organizationor State must initially provide all information and data HHS determinesnecessary to determine if a program can be approved and thereafter mustprovide all information needed by HHS to determine a program's continuedapproval. The accrediting organization or State licensure program must_(1) Provide information regarding the accreditation or licensure, specialtiesor subspecialties for which accreditation or licensure is applicable whichaccreditation or licensure is applicable at a frequency required by HHS;and(2) Notify HHS within five days of any changes in accreditation or licensure.(c) HHS may require an accrediting organization or State licensure programto sign a written agreement specifying the terms of approval.(d) If HHS determines at any time that the accrediting organization's orState licensure program's requirements are no longer at least as stringentas CLIA requirements, HHS will notify the accrediting organization or Statelicensure program and provide a reasonable period of time for revision.If the organization or State licensure program does not provide satisfactoryevidence on a timely basis of its continued acceptability, HHS will notifythe accrediting organization or State licensure program of the bases forrevoking approval. The notice will state that the provisions of section353 of CLIA and 42 CFR Part 493 requiring licensure will apply to all itsaccredited or licensed laboratories effective 30 days after the date thenotice is received. HHS will also notify each laboratory affected by thisdetermination that its exemption from CLIA licensure is not in effect 30days after the date the notice is received by the accreditation organizationor State licensure program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 493.710 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Letter of exemption.</ITAG>(a) HHS may issue a letter of exemption to a laboratory provided that_(1) The laboratory owner or authorized representative of the laboratorysigns an agreement to permit inspections as required by HHS and makes availablerecords and other information HHS requires; and(2) The laboratory submits an application form provided by HHS that certifiesthat the laboratory is accredited or licensed by an approved organizationor State licensure program and specifies the specialties and subspecialtiesfor which the laboratory is accredited or licensed and the date or datesof accreditation or licensure.(b) If a laboratory fails to comply with the requirements of this part,the laboratory will no longer be eligible for a letter of exemption andis subject to the revocation and suspension procedures described in andSection;493.706 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A_Laboratory Director Qualification Requirements Before [EffectiveDate of Regulations] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">With respect to individuals first qualifying as laboratory directorsbefore July 1, 1971, an individual who was responsible for the directionof a clinical laboratory for 12 months between July 1, 1961, and January1, 1968, and, in addition, met one of the following requirements in paragraphs(a) through (d) by July 1, 1971, is qualified to be a laboratory directorunder andSection;493.401. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The individual was a physician and after graduation had at least4 years of pertinent full-time clinical laboratory experience; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The individual held a master's degree from an accredited institutionwith a chemical, physical, or biological science as a major subject andafter graduation had at least four years of pertinent full-time clinicallaboratory experience; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The individual held a bachelor's degree from an accredited institutionwith a chemical, physical, or biological science as a major subject andafter graduation had at least six years of pertinent full-time clinicallaboratory experience; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) The individual achieved a satisfactory grade through an examinationconducted by or under sponsorship of the U.S. Public Health Service onor before July 1, 1970.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The January 1, 1968 date for meeting the 12 months laboratorydirection requirement in this appendix may be extended one year for eachyear of full-time clinical laboratory experience obtained before January1, 1968 required by State law for a clinical laboratory director license.An exception to the July 1, 1971 qualifying date was made provided theindividual requested approval of his or her qualifications by October 21,1975 and had been employed in an approved clinical laboratory for at leastthree of the five years preceding the date of submission of his or herqualifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix B_Technologist Requirements before July 1, 1971 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">With respect to individuals first qualifying as technologist beforeJuly 1, 1971, an individual who met the following requirements in paragraphs(a) and (b) is now qualified to be a supervisor under andSection;493.409.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The individual was performing the duties of a clinical laboratorytechnologist at any time between July 1, 1961, and January 1, 1968, and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The individual has had at least ten years of pertinent clinicallaboratory experience before January 1, 1968. This required experiencemay be substituted by education as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A minimum of 30 semester hours of credit from an approved school ofmedical technology or toward a bachelor's degree from an accredited institutionwith a chemical, physical, or biological science as his or her major subjectis equivalent to two years of experience. Additional education is equatedat the rate of 15 semester hours of credit for one year of experience.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Before [effective date of these regulations], the individual achieveda satisfactory grade in a proficiency examination approved by HHS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix C_Cytotechnologist Requirements Before [Effective Date ofRegulations] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">With respect to individuals first qualifying as a cytotechnologistbefore July 1, 1969, an individual who met one of the following requirementsin paragraph (a) and (b) is qualified to be cytotechnologist under andSection;493.415.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Before January 1, 1969, the individual has: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Been graduated from high school; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Completed six months of training in cytotechnology in a laboratorydirected by a pathologist or other physician recognized as a specialistin cytology; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Completed two years of full-time supervised experience in cytotechnology.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Before [effective date of these regulations], the individual achieveda satisfactory grade in a proficiency examination approved by HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Programs No. 13.714_Medical AssistanceProgram; No. 13.773, Medicare_Hospital Insurance Program; No. 13.774, Medicare_SupplementaryMedical Insurance Program)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: June 22, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William L. Roper, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Health Care Financing Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: June 24, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-17623 Filed 8-2-88; 3:04 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4120-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>